<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALEX/ALEX-8K-20120613060349.txt.gz
TIME:20120613060349
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 1.01               Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
The information included in Item 3.03 of this Current Report on Form 8-K with respect to the Rights Agreement (as defined therein) is incorporated by reference into this item.
 
Item 3.03
                                            
Material Modification to Rights of Security Holders.
 
On June 8, 2012, the Board of Directors of A & B II, Inc. (the "") declared a dividend distribution of one preferred stock purchase right (a "") for each outstanding share of the Company's common stock, without par value (the "").  The distribution is payable to Alexander & Baldwin Holdings, Inc. (""), the Company's sole stockholder of record at the close of business on June 8, 2012.  Each Right issued will be subject to the terms of a rights agreement, dated as of June 8, 2012 (the ""), between the Company and Computershare Shareowner Services LLC, as Rights Agent. In connection with the Rights Agreement, the Company filed with the Director of the Department of Commerce & Consumer Affairs of the State of Hawaii a resolution authorizing 150,000 shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock (the "").
Company
Right
Common Stock
Holdings
Rights Agreement
Resolutions
 
The Rights initially trade with, and are inseparable from, the Company's Common Stock.  Initially, the Rights are not represented by separate certificates.  New Rights will accompany any new shares of Common Stock the Company issues until the date on which the Rights are separated from the Company's Common Stock and exercisable as described below.
 
Until the date the Rights become exercisable, certificated or book-entry ownership of Common Stock will evidence the Rights, and any transfer of shares of Common Stock (including the distribution of shares of Common Stock by Holdings to its shareholders in the previously-announced spin-off of the Company) will constitute a transfer of the Rights associated with the shares of Common Stock.  After the date the Rights separate from the Common Stock and become exercisable, the Rights will be evidenced by book-entry credits or by rights certificates that the Company mails to all eligible holders of Common Stock.  Any of the Rights held by an acquiring person (as described below) will be void and may not be exercised.
 
Exercisability
. Each Right will not be separated from the Common Stock and exercisable until:
 
                 
ten business days after the public announcement that a person or group has become an "acquiring person" by acquiring beneficial ownership of 15% or more of the outstanding shares of Common Stock, other than as a result of repurchases of stock by the Company or certain inadvertent actions by institutional or certain other shareholders, or, if earlier,
 
                 
ten business days (or a later date determined by the Board) after a person or group commences a tender or exchange offer that, if completed, would result in that person or group becoming an acquiring person.
 
Exercise Price
.  Each Right allows its holder to purchase from the Company one one-thousandth of a share (a "") of the Company's Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, without par value (the ""), for $125 per Unit, subject to adjustment, once the Rights become separated from the Common Stock and exercisable.  Prior to its exercise, a Right does not give its holder any dividend, voting or liquidation rights.  While the distribution of the Rights will not be taxable to stockholders or to the Company, stockholders may, depending upon the circumstances, recognize taxable income in the event that the Rights become exercisable for Common Stock (or other consideration) of the Company or for common stock of the acquiring company or in the event of the redemption of the Rights as set forth below.
Unit
Preferred Stock
Preferred Share Provisions
.  Each share of Preferred Stock purchasable upon exercise of the Rights:
 
                 
will not be redeemable;
 
                 
when, as and if declared by the Board out of funds legally available for the purpose, will entitle holders to quarterly dividends payable in cash equal to the greater of $10 per share or a per share amount equal to 1,000 times the dividend paid on one share of Common Stock;
 
                 
will entitle holders upon liquidation to receive a preferential liquidation payment equal to $1,000 per share plus any accrued and unpaid dividends and distributions;
 
                 
will have 1,000 votes voting together with the Common Stock, unless at any time dividends on any shares of Preferred Stock are in arrears in an amount equal to six quarterly dividends, in which case holders of all the preferred stock of the Company (including the Preferred Stock) with dividends in arrears in an amount equal to six quarterly dividends, voting as a class, shall have the right to elect two directors; and
 
                 
in the event shares of Common Stock are exchanged in a merger, consolidation, combination or similar transaction, will entitle holders to a receive 1,000 times the amount received for one share of Common Stock.
 
The value of one one-thousandth interest in a share of Preferred Stock should approximate the value of one share of Common Stock.
 
Consequences of a Person or Group Becoming an Acquiring Person
.
 
                 
Flip In
. If a person or group becomes an acquiring person, all holders of the Rights except the acquiring person may, for $125 per Right, purchase shares of the Company's Common Stock with a market value of $250, based on the market price of the Company's Common Stock (determined pursuant to the terms of the Rights Agreement) prior to such acquisition.
 
                 
Flip Over
. If the Company is later acquired in a merger or similar transaction after the date the Rights become exercisable, all holders of the Rights except the acquiring person may, for $125 per Right, purchase shares of the acquiring corporation with a market value of $250, based on the market price of the acquiring corporation's stock (determined pursuant to the terms of the Rights Agreement) prior to such transaction.
 
Expiration
.  The Rights expire at 5:00 P.M., New York City time, on June 8, 2013, unless the Rights are earlier redeemed, exchanged or terminated.
 
Redemption
.  The Board may redeem the Rights for $0.001 per Right at any time up to ten business days after a person or group acquires beneficial ownership of 15% or more of the outstanding shares of Common Stock.  If the Board redeems any of the Rights, it must redeem all of the Rights.  Once the Rights are redeemed, the only right of the holders of the Rights will be to receive the redemption price of $0.001 per Right.  The redemption price will be adjusted if the Company has a stock split or issues stock dividends on the Common Stock.
 
Exchanges
.  After a person or group becomes an acquiring person, but before an acquiring person owns 50% or more of outstanding Common Stock, the Board may extinguish the Rights by exchanging one share of Common Stock or an equivalent security for each Right, other than Rights held by the acquiring person.
 
Anti-Dilution Provisions
.  The purchase price for one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock, the number of shares of Preferred Stock issuable upon the exercise of a Right and the number of outstanding Rights may be subject to adjustment in order to prevent dilution that may occur from a stock dividend, a stock split or a reclassification of the Preferred Stock.  No adjustments to the purchase price of Preferred Stock will be required until the cumulative adjustments would amount to at least 1% of the purchase price.
Amendments
.  The terms of the Rights Agreement may be amended by the Company in any manner without the consent of the holders of the Company's Common Stock until the Rights separate from the Common Stock and become exercisable.  After such date, the Company may not amend the agreement in a way that adversely affects the interests of the holders of the Rights.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, no amendment may be made at such time as the Rights are not redeemable, except to cure any ambiguity or correct or supplement any provision contained in the Rights Agreement which may be defective or inconsistent with any other provision therein.
 
Anti-Takeover Effects.
  The Rights may have certain anti-takeover effects.  The Rights may cause substantial dilution to any person or group that attempts to acquire the Company without the approval of the Board.  As a result, the overall effect of the Rights may be to make more difficult a merger, tender offer or other business combination involving the Company that is not supported by the Board.
 
The Rights Agreement and the Resolutions are attached as Exhibits 4.1 and 3.1, respectively, to this Current Report on Form 8-K and are incorporated by reference into this item. This summary description of the Rights Agreement does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to these exhibits.
 
Item 5.03
                                            
Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
 
The Company filed the Resolutions for its Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock with the Director of the Department of Commerce & Consumer Affairs of the State of Hawaii.  Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall have the rights, preferences and privileges as further described in Item 3.03 of this Current Report on Form 8-K.  As of the date of this Current Report on Form 8-K, none of the shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock has been issued.  The description of the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Resolutions, a copy of which is attached as Exhibit 3.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01
                                            
Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)     Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 3.1
WHEREAS, A & B II, Inc. (the "Corporation") has an authorized capital stock of one hundred fifty million (150,000,000) shares of common stock, without par value ("Common Stock"), and fifteen million (15,000,000) shares of preferred stock, without par value ("Preferred Stock");
 
WHEREAS, the Corporation acting through its Board of Directors (the "Board") has power under the Hawaii Business Corporation Act ("HBCA") and the Corporation's Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation (the "Articles of Incorporation"), to issue its authorized Preferred Stock in one or more series having such terms, preferences, voting powers, restrictions and qualifications as shall be fixed in the resolutions authorizing each such series; and
 
WHEREAS, it is deemed advisable that the Corporation authorize a series of Preferred Stock, without par value, designated as the Corporation's Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock and having the preferences, voting powers, restrictions and qualifications thereof hereinafter set forth.
 
NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that pursuant to the authority granted to and vested in the Board in accordance with the provisions of the Articles of Incorporation and the HBCA, a series of Preferred Stock of the Corporation be and it hereby is created, and that the designation and amount thereof and the voting powers, preferences and relative, participating, optional and other special rights of the shares of such series, and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions thereof are as follows:
 
Section 1.
                                           
Designation and Amount
.  The shares of such series shall be designated as "Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock" and the number of shares constituting such series shall be 150,000.  Such number of shares may be increased or decreased by resolution of the Board; provided, that no decrease shall reduce the number of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock to a number less than the number of shares then outstanding plus the number of shares reserved for issuance upon the exercise of outstanding options, rights or warrants or upon the exercise of any options, rights or warrants issuable upon conversion of any outstanding securities issued by the Corporation convertible into Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock.
 
 
Section 2.
                                           
Dividends and Distributions
.
 
(A)
                             
Subject to the prior and superior rights of the holders of any shares of any series of Preferred Stock ranking prior and superior to the shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock with respect to dividends, the holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, in preference to the holders of the Common Stock, and of any other junior stock, shall be entitled to receive, when, as and if declared by the Board out of funds legally available for the purpose, quarterly dividends payable in cash on the fifteenth day of January, April, July and October in each year (each such date being referred to herein as a "Quarterly Dividend Payment Date"), commencing on the first Quarterly Dividend Payment Date after the first issuance of a share or fraction of a share of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, in an amount per share (rounded to the nearest cent) equal to the greater of (a) $10.00 or (b) subject to the provision for adjustment hereinafter set forth, 1,000 times the aggregate per share amount of all cash dividends, and 1,000 times the aggregate per share amount (payable in kind) of all non-cash dividends or other distributions other than a dividend payable in shares of Common Stock or a subdivision of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (by reclassification or otherwise), declared on the Common Stock since the immediately preceding Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, or, with respect to the first Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, since the first issuance of any share or fraction of a share of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock.  In the event the Corporation shall at any time after June 8, 2012 (the "Rights Dividend Declaration Date") (i) declare or pay any dividend on Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding Common Stock, or (iii) combine or consolidate the outstanding Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, then in each such case the amount to which holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock were entitled immediately prior to such event under clause (b) of the preceding sentence shall be adjusted by multiplying such amount by a fraction the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event.
 
(B)
                               
The Corporation shall declare a dividend or distribution on the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock as provided in Paragraph (A) above immediately after it declares a dividend or distribution on the Common Stock (other than a dividend payable in shares of Common Stock); provided that, in the event no dividend or distribution shall have been declared on the Common Stock during the period between any Quarterly Dividend Payment Date and the next subsequent Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, a dividend of $10.00 per share on the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall nevertheless be payable on such subsequent Quarterly Dividend Payment Date.
 
(C)
                               
Dividends shall begin to accrue and be cumulative on outstanding shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock from the Quarterly Dividend Payment Date next preceding the date of issue of such shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, unless the date of issue of such shares is prior to the record date for the first Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, in which case dividends on such shares shall begin to accrue from the date of issue of such shares, or unless the date of issue is a Quarterly Dividend Payment Date or is a date after the record date for the determination of holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock entitled to receive a quarterly dividend and before such Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, in either of which events such dividends shall begin to accrue and be cumulative
 
from such Quarterly Dividend Payment Date.  Accrued but unpaid dividends shall not bear interest.  Dividends paid on the shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock in an amount less than the total amount of such dividends at the time accrued and payable on such shares shall be allocated pro rata on a share-by-share basis among all such shares at the time outstanding.  The Board may fix a record date for the determination of holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock entitled to receive payment of a dividend or distribution declared thereon, which record date shall be no more than 30 days prior to the date fixed for the payment thereof.
 
Section 3.
                                           
Voting Rights
.  The holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall have the following voting rights:
 
(A)
                             
Subject to the provision for adjustment hereinafter set forth, each share of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall entitle the holder thereof to 1,000 votes on all matters submitted to a vote of the stockholders of the Corporation.  In the event the Corporation shall at any time after the Rights Dividend Declaration Date (i) declare or pay any dividend on Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding Common Stock, or (iii) combine or consolidate the outstanding Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, then in each such case the number of votes per share to which holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock were entitled immediately prior to such event shall be adjusted by multiplying such number by a fraction the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event.
 
(B)
                               
Except as otherwise provided herein or by law, the holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock and the holders of shares of Common Stock shall vote together as one class on all matters submitted to a vote of stockholders of the Corporation.
 
(C)
 
(i)
                                    
If at any time dividends on any Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall be in arrears in an amount equal to six quarterly dividends thereon, the occurrence of such contingency shall mark the beginning of a period (herein called a "default period") that shall extend until such time when all accrued and unpaid dividends for all previous quarterly dividend periods and for the current quarterly dividend period on all shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock then outstanding shall have been declared and paid or set apart for payment.  During each default period, all holders of Preferred Stock (including holders of the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock) with dividends in arrears in an amount equal to six quarterly dividends thereon, voting as a class, irrespective of series, shall have the right to elect two directors.
 
(ii)
                                 
During any default period, such voting right of the holders of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock may be exercised initially at a special meeting called pursuant to subparagraph (iii) of this Section 3(C) or at any annual meeting of stockholders, and thereafter at annual meetings of stockholders, provided that neither such voting right nor the right of the holders of any other series of Preferred Stock,
 
if any, to increase, in certain cases, the authorized number of directors shall not be exercised unless the holders of ten percent (10%) in number of shares of Preferred Stock outstanding shall be present in person or by proxy.  The absence of a quorum of the holders of Common Stock shall not affect the exercise by the holders of Preferred Stock of such voting right.  At any meeting at which the holders of Preferred Stock shall exercise such voting right initially during an existing default period, they shall have the right, voting as a class, to elect directors to fill such vacancies, if any, on the Board as may then exist up to two directors or, if such right is exercised at an annual meeting, to elect two directors.  If the number that may be so elected at any special meeting does not amount to the required number, the holders of the Preferred Stock shall have the right to make such increase in the number of directors as shall be necessary to permit the election by them of the required number.  After the holders of the Preferred Stock shall have exercised their right to elect directors in any default period and during the continuance of such period, the number of directors shall not be increased or decreased except by vote of the holders of Preferred Stock as herein provided or pursuant to the rights of any equity securities ranking senior to or with the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock.
pari
passu
 
(iii)
                              
Unless the holders of Preferred Stock shall, during an existing default period, have previously exercised their right to elect directors, the Board may order, or any stockholder or stockholders owning in the aggregate not less than ten percent (10%) of the total number of shares of Preferred Stock outstanding, irrespective of series, may request, the calling of a special meeting of the holders of Preferred Stock, which meeting shall thereupon be called by the President, a Vice-President or the Secretary of the Corporation.  Notice of such meeting and of any annual meeting at which holders of Preferred Stock are entitled to vote pursuant to this Paragraph (C)(iii) shall be given to each holder of record of Preferred Stock by mailing a copy of such notice to him at his last address as the same appears on the books of the Corporation.  Such meeting shall be called for a time not earlier than 20 days and not later than 60 days after such order or request or in default of the calling of such meeting within 60 days after such order or request, such meeting may be called on similar notice by any stockholder or stockholders owning in the aggregate not less than ten percent (10%) of the total number of shares of Preferred Stock outstanding.  Notwithstanding the provisions of this Paragraph (C)(iii), no such special meeting shall be called during the period within 60 days immediately preceding the date fixed for the next annual meeting of the stockholders.
 
(iv)
                             
In any default period, the holders of Common Stock, and other classes of stock of the Corporation if applicable, shall continue to be entitled to elect the whole number of directors until the holders of Preferred Stock shall have exercised their right to elect two directors voting as a class, after the exercise of which right (x) the directors so elected by the holders of Preferred Stock shall not be a member of Class I, Class II or Class III of the Board but shall continue in office until their successors shall have been elected by such holders or until the expiration of the default period, and (y) any vacancy on the Board may (except as provided in Paragraph (C)(ii) of this Section 3) be filled by vote of a majority of the remaining directors theretofore elected by the holders of the class of stock that elected the director whose office shall have become
 
vacant.  References in this Paragraph (C) to directors elected by the holders of a particular class of stock shall include directors elected by such directors to fill vacancies as provided in clause (y) of the foregoing sentence.
 
(v)
                                
Immediately upon the expiration of a default period, (x) the right of the holders of Preferred Stock as a class to elect directors shall cease, (y) the term of any directors elected by the holders of Preferred Stock as a class shall terminate, and (z) the number of directors shall be such number as may be provided for in the Articles of Incorporation or bylaws of the Corporation (as may be amended from time to time, the "Bylaws") irrespective of any increase made pursuant to the provisions of Paragraph (C)(ii) of this Section 3 (such number being subject, however, to change thereafter in any manner provided by law or in the Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws).  Any vacancies on the Board effected by the provisions of clauses (y) and (z) in the preceding sentence may be filled by a majority of the remaining directors.
 
(D)
                              
Except as set forth herein, holders of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall have no special voting rights and their consent shall not be required (except to the extent they are entitled to vote with holders of Common Stock as set forth herein) for taking any corporate action.
 
Section 4.
                                           
Certain Restrictions
.
 
(A)
                             
Whenever quarterly dividends or other dividends or distributions payable on the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock as provided in Section 2 are in arrears, thereafter and until all accrued and unpaid dividends and distributions, whether or not declared, on shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock outstanding shall have been paid in full, the Corporation shall not:
 
(i)
                                    
declare or pay dividends on, make any other distributions on, or redeem or purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration any shares of stock ranking junior (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) to the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock;
 
(ii)
                                 
declare or pay dividends on or make any other distributions on any shares of stock ranking on a parity (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) with the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, except dividends paid ratably on the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock and all such parity stock on which dividends are payable or in arrears in proportion to the total amounts to which the holders of all such shares are then entitled;
 
(iii)
                              
redeem or purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration shares of any stock ranking on a parity (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) with the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, provided that the Corporation may at any time redeem, purchase or otherwise acquire shares of any such parity stock in exchange for shares of any stock of the Corporation ranking junior (either as to dividends or upon dissolution, liquidation or winding up) to the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock; or
 
(iv)
                             
purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration any shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, or any shares of stock ranking on a parity with the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, except in accordance with a purchase offer made in writing or by publication (as determined by the Board) to all holders of such shares upon such terms as the Board, after consideration of the respective annual dividend rates and other relative rights and preferences of the respective series and classes, shall determine in good faith will result in fair and equitable treatment among the respective series or classes.
 
(B)
                               
The Corporation shall not permit any subsidiary of the Corporation to purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration any shares of stock of the Corporation unless the Corporation could, under Paragraph (A) of this Section 4, purchase or otherwise acquire such shares at such time and in such manner.
 
Section 5.
                                           
Reacquired Shares
.  Any shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock purchased or otherwise acquired by the Corporation in any manner whatsoever shall be retired and cancelled promptly after the acquisition thereof.  All such shares shall upon their cancellation become authorized but unissued shares of Preferred Stock and may be reissued as part of a new series of Preferred Stock to be created by resolution or resolutions of the Board, subject to the conditions and restrictions on issuance set forth herein.
 
Section 6.
                                           
Liquidation, Dissolution or Winding Up
.
 
(A)
                             
Upon any liquidation (voluntary or otherwise), dissolution or winding up of the Corporation, no distribution shall be made to the holders of shares of stock ranking junior (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) to the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock unless, prior thereto, the holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall have received an amount equal to $1,000 per share of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, plus an amount equal to accrued and unpaid dividends and distributions thereon, whether or not declared, to the date of such payment (the "Series A Liquidation Preference").  Following the payment of the full amount of the Series A Liquidation Preference, no additional distributions shall be made to the holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock unless, prior thereto, the holders of shares of Common Stock shall have received an amount per share (the "Common Adjustment") equal to the quotient obtained by dividing (i) the Series A Liquidation Preference by (ii) 1,000 (as appropriately adjusted as set forth in subparagraph (C) below to reflect such events as stock splits, stock dividends and recapitalizations with respect to the Common Stock) (such number in clause (ii), the "Adjustment Number").  Following the payment of the full amount of the Series A Liquidation Preference and the Common Adjustment in respect of all outstanding shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock and Common Stock, respectively, holders of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock and holders of shares of Common Stock shall receive their ratable and proportionate share of the remaining assets to be distributed in the ratio of the Adjustment Number to 1 with respect to such Preferred Stock and Common Stock, on a per share basis, respectively.
 
(B)
                               
In the event, however, that there are not sufficient assets available to permit payment in full of the Series A Liquidation Preference and the liquidation preferences of
 
all other series of preferred stock, if any, that rank on a parity with the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, then such remaining assets shall be distributed ratably to the holders of such parity shares in proportion to their respective liquidation preferences.  In the event, however, that there are not sufficient assets available to permit payment in full of the Common Adjustment, then such remaining assets shall be distributed ratably to the holders of Common Stock.
 
(C)
                               
In the event the Corporation shall at any time after the Rights Dividend Declaration Date (i) declare or pay any dividend on Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding Common Stock, or (iii) combine or consolidate the outstanding Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, then in each such case the Adjustment Number in effect immediately prior to such event shall be adjusted by multiplying such Adjustment Number by a fraction the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event.
 
Section 7.
                                           
Consolidation, Merger, etc.
  In case the Corporation shall enter into any consolidation, merger, combination or other transaction in which the shares of Common Stock are exchanged for or changed into other stock or securities, cash and/or any other property, then in any such case the shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall at the same time be similarly exchanged or changed in an amount per share (subject to the provision for adjustment hereinafter set forth) equal to 1,000 times the aggregate amount of stock, securities, cash and/or any other property (payable in kind), as the case may be, into which or for which each share of Common Stock is changed or exchanged.  In the event the Corporation shall at any time after the Rights Dividend Declaration Date (i) declare or pay any dividend on Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding Common Stock, or (iii) combine or consolidate the outstanding Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, then in each such case the amount set forth in the preceding sentence with respect to the exchange or change of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall be adjusted by multiplying such amount by a fraction the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event.
 
Section 8.
                                           
No Redemption
.  The shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall not be redeemable.
 
Section 9.
                                           
Ranking
.  The Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall rank junior to all other series of the Corporation's Preferred Stock as to the payment of dividends and the distribution of assets, unless the terms of any such series shall provide otherwise.
 
Section 10.
                                     
Amendment
.  At any time when any shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock are outstanding, the Articles of Incorporation shall not be amended in any manner that would materially alter or change the powers, preferences or special rights of the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock so as to affect them adversely without the affirmative vote of the holders of at least 66-2/3% of the outstanding shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, voting separately as a class.
 
Section 11.
                                     
Fractional Shares
.  Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock may be issued in fractions of a share that shall entitle the holder, in proportion to such holder's fractional shares, to exercise voting rights, receive dividends, participate in distributions and to have the benefit of all other rights of holders of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock.
 
FURTHER RESOLVED, that any officer of the Corporation be, and hereby is, authorized and directed to execute and file with the Department of Commerce and Consumer Affairs of the State of Hawaii a "Statement of Issuance of Shares of Preferred or Special Classes in Series," to which these resolutions shall be annexed.

Exhibit 4.1
 
Execution Copy
 
 
 
RIGHTS AGREEMENT, dated as of June 8, 2012 (this "Agreement"), between A & B II, Inc., a Hawaii corporation (the "Company"), and Computershare Shareowner Services LLC, a New Jersey limited liability company (the "Rights Agent").
 
WHEREAS, on June 8, 2012 (the "Rights Dividend Declaration Date"), the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Board") authorized and declared a dividend distribution of one Right (as hereinafter defined) for each share of Common Stock (as hereinafter defined) outstanding at the Close of Business (as hereinafter defined) on June 8, 2012 (the "Record Date"), and has authorized the issuance of one Right (as such number may hereinafter be adjusted pursuant to the provisions of Section 11(p) hereof) for each share of Common Stock issued (whether as an original issuance or from the Company's treasury) between the Record Date and the Distribution Date (as hereinafter defined) and in certain other circumstances provided herein, each Right initially representing the right to purchase one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock (as hereinafter defined), upon the terms and subject to the conditions hereinafter set forth (the "Rights"); and
 
WHEREAS, the Board of Directors of Alexander & Baldwin Holdings, Inc., a Hawaii corporation ("Holdings"), and the holder of all of the issued and outstanding shares of Common Stock on the date hereof, has approved the spin-off of the Company (the "Separation"), by way of a pro rata distribution of all of the issued and outstanding shares of Common Stock to holders of Holdings common stock to be consummated on June 29, 2012 (the "Separation Date").
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the mutual agreements herein set forth, the parties hereby agree as follows:
 
Section 1.
                              
Certain Definitions
.  For purposes of this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings indicated:
 
(a)
                    
"Acquiring Person" shall mean any Person who or which, together with all Affiliates and Associates of such Person, shall be the Beneficial Owner of fifteen percent (15%) or more of the shares of Common Stock then outstanding, but shall not include (i) any Exempt Person (as hereinafter defined), (ii) any Person who becomes the Beneficial Owner of fifteen percent (15%) or more of the shares of Common Stock then outstanding as a result of a reduction in the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding due to the repurchase of shares of Common Stock by the Company unless and until such Person, after becoming aware that such Person has become the Beneficial Owner of fifteen percent (15%) or more of the then outstanding shares of Common Stock, acquires beneficial ownership of additional shares of Common Stock representing one percent (1%) or more of the shares of Common Stock then outstanding, or (iii) any such Person who has reported or is required to report such ownership (but less than 20%) on Schedule 13G under the Exchange Act (or any comparable or successor report) or on Schedule 13D under the Exchange Act (or any comparable or successor report) which Schedule 13D does not state any intention to or reserve the right to control or influence
the management or policies of the Company or engage in any of the actions specified in Item 4 of such schedule (other than the disposition of the Common Stock) and, within 10 Business Days of being requested by the Company to advise it regarding the same, certifies to the Company that such Person acquired shares of Common Stock in excess of 14.9% inadvertently or without knowledge of the terms of the Rights and who or which, together with all Affiliates and Associates, thereafter does not acquire additional shares of Common Stock while the Beneficial Owner of 15% or more of the shares of Common Stock then outstanding; , , that if the Person requested to so certify fails to do so within 10 Business Days or breaches or violates such certification, then such Person shall become an Acquiring Person immediately after such 10-Business-Day period or such breach or violation.  For the avoidance of doubt, a Person other than any Exempt Person shall be an "Acquiring Person" if such Person, together with all Affiliates and Associates of such Person, at any time after the Separation Date, is or becomes the Beneficial Owner of fifteen percent (15%) or more of the shares of Common Stock then outstanding, whether such Person or such Person's Affiliates and Associates become such a Beneficial Owner by way of the receipt of shares of Common Stock in the distribution by Holdings in the Separation, as a result of purchases in the "when-issued" market prior to the Separation or otherwise.  For the purposes of this Agreement, Holdings and it subsidiaries shall not be deemed to be the Beneficial Owner of any shares of Common Stock on or before the Separation Date.
provided
however
 
(b)
                    
"Act" shall mean the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
 
(c)
                     
"Adjustment Shares" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(a)(ii) hereof.
 
(d)
                    
"Affiliate" and "Associate" shall have the respective meanings ascribed to such terms in Rule 12b-2 of the General Rules and Regulations under the Exchange Act.
 
(e)
                     
"Agreement" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in the preamble.
 
(f)
                      
A Person shall be deemed the "Beneficial Owner" of, and shall be deemed to "beneficially own," any securities:
 
(i)
            
that such Person or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates, directly or indirectly, owns or has the right to acquire (whether such right is exercisable immediately or only after the passage of time or upon the satisfaction of one or more conditions (whether or not within the control of such Person), compliance with regulatory requirements or otherwise) pursuant to any agreement, arrangement or understanding (whether or not in writing) or upon the exercise of conversion rights, exchange rights, other rights, warrants or options, or otherwise; , , that a Person shall not be deemed the "Beneficial Owner" of, or to "beneficially own," (A) securities tendered pursuant to a tender or exchange offer made by such Person or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates until such tendered securities are accepted for purchase or exchange, (B) securities issuable upon exercise of Rights at any time prior to the occurrence
provided
however
of a Triggering Event (as hereinafter defined), or (C) securities issuable upon exercise of Rights from and after the occurrence of a Triggering Event which Rights were acquired by such Person or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates prior to the Distribution Date (as hereinafter defined) or pursuant to Section 3(a) or Section 22 hereof (the "Original Rights") or pursuant to Section 11(i) hereof in connection with an adjustment made with respect to any Original Rights; or
(ii)
         
that such Person or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates, directly or indirectly, has the right to vote or dispose of or has "beneficial ownership" of (as determined pursuant to Rule 13d-3 of the General Rules and Regulations under the Exchange Act), including pursuant to any agreement, arrangement or understanding, whether or not in writing; , , that a Person shall not be deemed the "Beneficial Owner" of, or to "beneficially own," any security under this subparagraph (ii) as a result of an agreement, arrangement or understanding to vote such security if such agreement, arrangement or understanding: (A) arises solely from a revocable proxy given in response to a public proxy or consent solicitation made pursuant to, and in accordance with, the applicable provisions of the General Rules and Regulations under the Exchange Act, and (B) is not reportable by such Person on Schedule 13D under the Exchange Act (or any comparable or successor report); or
provided
however
 
(iii)
      
that are beneficially owned, directly or indirectly, by any other Person (or any Affiliate or Associate thereof) with which such Person (or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates) has any agreement, arrangement or understanding (whether or not in writing), for the purpose of acquiring, holding, voting (except pursuant to a revocable proxy as described in the proviso to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph (f)) or disposing of any voting securities of the Company; or
 
(iv)
     
that such Person or any such Person's Affiliates or Associates are determined to Constructively Own;
 
provided
, , that nothing in this paragraph (f) shall cause a Person engaged in business as an underwriter of securities to be the "Beneficial Owner" of, or to "beneficially own," any securities acquired through such Person's participation in good faith in a firm commitment underwriting until the expiration of forty days after the date of such acquisition, and then only if such securities continue to be owned by such Person at such expiration of forty days.  For all purposes of this Agreement, the phrase "then outstanding," when used with reference to the percentage of the then outstanding securities "beneficially owned" by a Person, shall mean the number of securities then issued and outstanding together with the number of such securities not then actually issued and outstanding which such Person would be deemed to "beneficially own" hereunder.
however
 
(g)
                     
"Board" shall have the meaning set forth in the recitals of this Agreement.
(h)
                    
"Business Day" shall mean any day other than a Saturday, Sunday or a day on which banking institutions in the State of New York or the State of New Jersey are authorized or obligated by law or executive order to close.
 
(i)
                        
"Close of Business" on any given date shall mean 5:00 P.M., New York City time on such date; , , that if such date is not a Business Day it shall mean 5:00 P.M., New York City time on the next succeeding Business Day.
provided
however
 
(j)
                       
"Common Stock" shall mean the common stock, without par value, of the Company, except that "Common Stock" when used with reference to any Person other than the Company shall mean the capital stock of such Person with the greatest voting power, or the equity securities or other equity interest having power to control or direct the management, of such Person.
 
(k)
                    
"Common Stock Equivalents" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(a)(iii) hereof.
 
(l)
                        
"Company" shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble to this Agreement.
 
(m)
                
A Person shall be deemed to "Constructively Own" shares of Common Stock in respect of which such Person has a Synthetic Long Position, calculated in the manner set forth below.  The number of shares of Common Stock in respect of a Synthetic Long Position that shall be deemed to be Constructively Owned is the notional or other number of shares of Common Stock in respect of such Synthetic Long Position that is specified in a filing by such Person or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates with the Securities and Exchange Commission or in the documentation evidencing such Synthetic Long Position as the basis upon which the value or settlement amount of such right or derivative, or the opportunity of the holder of such right or derivative to profit or share in any profit, is to be calculated in whole or in part, and in any case (or if no such number of shares of Common Stock is specified in any filing or documentation), as determined by the Board in good faith to be the number of shares of Common Stock to which such Synthetic Long Position relates.
 
(n)
                    
"Current Market Price" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(d)(i) hereof.
 
(o)
                    
"Current Value" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(a)(iii) hereof.
 
(p)
                    
"Customer Identification Program" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 36 hereof.
 
(q)
                    
"Distribution Date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 3(a) hereof.
 
(r)
                       
"Equivalent Preferred Stock" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(b) hereof.
(s)
                      
"Exchange Act" shall mean the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
 
(t)
                       
"Exchange Ratio" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 24(a) hereof.
 
(u)
                    
"Exempt Person" shall mean (i) the Company, (ii) any Subsidiary of the Company or (iii) any employee benefit plan of the Company, or of any Subsidiary of the Company, or any Person or entity organized, appointed or established by the Company for or pursuant to the terms of any such plan.
 
(v)
                    
"Expiration Date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 7(a) hereof.
 
(w)
                  
"Final Expiration Date" shall mean 5:00 P.M., New York City time, on June 8, 2013.
 
(x)
                    
"Holdings" shall have the meaning set forth in the recitals of this Agreement.
 
(y)
                    
"NASDAQ" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(d) hereof.
 
(z)
                     
"Original Rights" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1(f)(i) hereof.
 
(aa)
             
"Person" shall mean any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, trust, association, syndicate or other entity and includes, without limitation, an unincorporated group of persons who, by formal or informal agreement or arrangement, have embarked on a common purpose or act.
 
(bb)
             
"Preferred Stock" shall mean shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, without par value, of the Company having the rights, powers and preferences set forth in Exhibit A hereto and, to the extent that there are not a sufficient number of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock authorized to permit the full exercise of the Rights, any other series of preferred stock of the Company designated for such purpose containing terms substantially similar to the terms of the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock.
 
(cc)
               
"Principal Party" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 13(b) hereof.
 
(dd)
             
"Purchase Price" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4(a) hereof.
 
(ee)
               
"Record Date" shall have the meaning set forth in the recitals of this Agreement.
 
(ff)
                 
"Redemption Price" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 23(a) hereof.
(gg)
             
"Rights" shall have the meaning set forth in the recitals of this Agreement.
 
(hh)
             
"Rights Agent" shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble of this Agreement.
 
(ii)
                     
"Rights Certificates" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 3(a) hereof.
 
(jj)
                     
"Rights Dividend Declaration Date" shall have the meaning set forth in the recitals of this Agreement.
 
(kk)
               
"Section 11(a)(ii) Event" shall mean any event described in Section 11(a)(ii) hereof.
 
(ll)
                     
"Section 11(a)(ii) Trigger Date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(a)(iii) hereof.
 
(mm)
         
"Section 13 Event" shall mean any event described in clauses (x), (y) or (z) of Section 13(a) hereof.
 
(nn)
             
"Separation" shall have the meaning set forth in the recitals of this Agreement.
 
(oo)
             
"Separation Date" shall have the meaning set forth in the recitals of this Agreement.
 
(pp)
             
"Spread" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(a)(iii) hereof.
 
(qq)
             
"Stock Acquisition Date" shall mean the first date of public announcement (which, for purposes of this definition, shall include, without limitation, a report filed or amended pursuant to Section 13(d) under the Exchange Act) by the Company or an Acquiring Person that a Person has become an Acquiring Person.
 
(rr)
                   
"Subsidiary" shall mean, with reference to any Person, any corporation or other entity of which an amount of securities or other ownership interests having ordinary voting power sufficient to elect at least a majority of the directors or other Persons having similar functions of such corporation or other entity are at the time, directly or indirectly, beneficially owned, or otherwise controlled by such Person.
 
(ss)
               
"Substitution Period" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(a)(iii) hereof.
 
(tt)
                   
"Summary of Rights" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 3(b) hereof.
 
(uu)
             
"Synthetic Long Position" shall mean any option, warrant, convertible security, stock appreciation right, swap agreement or other security, contract right or
derivative position, whether or not presently exercisable, that has an exercise or conversion privilege or a settlement payment or mechanism at a price related to the value of Common Stock or a value determined in whole or part with reference to, or derived in whole or in part from, the value of Common Stock and that increases in value as the value of Common Stock increases or that provides to the holder an opportunity, directly or indirectly, to profit or share in any profit derived from any increase in the value of Common Stock, in any case without regard to whether (i) such derivative conveys any voting rights in such securities to such Person or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates, (ii) such derivative is required to be, or capable of being, settled through delivery of such securities, or (iii) such Person or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates may have entered into other transactions that hedge the economic effect of such derivative.  A Synthetic Long Position shall not include any interests, rights, options or other securities set forth in Rule 16a-1(c)(1)-(5) or (7) of the General Rules and Regulations under the Exchange Act.
(vv)
             
"Trading Day" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(d)(i) hereof.
 
(ww)
         
"Triggering Event" shall mean any Section 11(a)(ii) Event or any Section 13 Event.
 
Section 2.
                               
Appointment of Rights Agent
.  The Company hereby appoints the Rights Agent to act as agent for the Company in accordance with the express terms and conditions hereof (and no implied terms or conditions), and the Rights Agent hereby accepts such appointment.  The Company may from time to time appoint such co-rights agents as it may deem necessary or desirable. The Rights Agent shall have no duty to supervise, and in no event shall be liable for, the acts or omissions of any such co-Rights agent.
 
Section 3.
                               
Issuance of Rights Certificates
.
 
(a)
                     
Until the earlier of (i) the Close of Business on the tenth Business Day after the Stock Acquisition Date (or, if the tenth Business Day after the Stock Acquisition Date occurs before the Record Date, the Close of Business on the Record Date), or (ii) the Close of Business on the tenth Business Day (or such later date as the Board shall determine) after the date that a tender or exchange offer by any Person (other than any Exempt Person) is first published or sent or given within the meaning of Rule 14d-2(a) of the General Rules and Regulations under the Exchange Act, if upon consummation thereof, such Person would become an Acquiring Person (the earlier of (i) and (ii) being herein referred to as the "Distribution Date"), (x) the Rights will be evidenced (subject to the provisions of paragraph (b) and (c) of this Section 3) by the certificates for the Common Stock registered in the names of the holders of the Common Stock (which certificates for Common Stock shall be deemed also to be certificates for Rights) and not by separate certificates (or, for shares participating in the direct registration system, by notations in the respective book entry accounts for the Common Stock), and (y) the Rights will be transferable only in connection with the transfer of the underlying shares of Common Stock (including a transfer to the Company).  As soon as practicable after the Distribution Date, but subject to the following sentence, the Company will prepare and execute, the Rights Agent will countersign and if provided with all necessary information and documents will send at the expense of the Company and by such means as may be selected by the Company,
to each record holder of the Common Stock as of the Close of Business on the Distribution Date, at the address of such holder shown on the records of the Company, one or more rights certificates, in substantially the form of Exhibit B hereto (the "Rights Certificates"), evidencing one Right for each share of Common Stock so held, subject to adjustment as provided herein.  To the extent that a Triggering Event under Section 11(a)(ii) hereof has also occurred, the Company may implement such procedures, as it deems appropriate in its sole discretion, to minimize the possibility that Rights are received by Persons for whom the Rights would be void under Section 7(e) hereof.  In the event that an adjustment in the number of Rights per share of Common Stock has been made pursuant to Section 11(p) hereof, at the time of distribution of the Rights Certificates, the Company shall make the necessary and appropriate rounding adjustments (in accordance with Section 14(a) hereof) so that Rights Certificates representing only whole numbers of Rights are distributed and cash is paid in lieu of any fractional Rights.  As of and after the Distribution Date, the Rights will be evidenced solely by such Rights Certificates.
(b)
                    
The Company will make available, as promptly as practicable following the Record Date, a copy of a Summary of Rights, in substantially the form attached hereto as Exhibit C (the "Summary of Rights"), to any holder of Rights who may so request from time to time prior to the Expiration Date.  With respect to certificates for the Common Stock outstanding as of the Record Date, or issued subsequent to the Record Date, unless and until the Distribution Date shall occur, the Rights will be evidenced by such certificates for the Common Stock (or, in the case of shares reflected on the direct registration system, the notations in the book entry account) and the registered holders of the Common Stock shall also be the registered holders of the associated Rights.  Until the earlier of the Distribution Date or the Expiration Date, the transfer of any shares of Common Stock in respect of which Rights have been issued shall also constitute the transfer of the Rights associated with such shares of Common Stock.
 
(c)
                     
Rights shall be issued in respect of all shares of Common Stock that are issued (whether originally issued or from the Company's treasury) after the Record Date but prior to the earlier of the Distribution Date or the Expiration Date.  Certificates representing such shares of Common Stock shall also be deemed to be certificates for Rights, and shall bear the following or substantially similar legend if such certificates are issued after the Record Date but prior to the earlier of the Distribution Date or the Expiration Date:
 
This certificate also evidences and entitles the holder hereof to certain Rights as set forth in the Rights Agreement between A & B II, Inc. (the "Company") and the Rights Agent thereunder, as originally executed and as it may be amended or restated from time to time (the "Rights Agreement"), the terms of which are hereby incorporated herein by reference and a copy of which is on file at the principal offices of the Company.  Under certain circumstances, as set forth in the Rights Agreement, such Rights will be evidenced by separate certificates and will no longer be evidenced by this certificate.  The Company will mail to the holder of this certificate a copy of the Rights Agreement, as in effect on the date of mailing, without charge, promptly after receipt of a written request therefor.  Under certain circumstances set forth in the Rights Agreement, Rights issued to, or held by, any Person who is, was or becomes an Acquiring Person or any Affiliate or Associate thereof (as such terms are defined in the Rights
Agreement), whether currently held by or on behalf of such Person or by any subsequent holder, may become null and void.
With respect to such certificates containing the foregoing legend, until the earlier of (i) the Distribution Date or (ii) the Expiration Date, the Rights associated with the Common Stock represented by such certificates shall be evidenced by such certificates alone and registered holders of Common Stock shall also be the registered holders of the associated Rights, and the transfer of any of such certificates shall also constitute the transfer of the Rights associated with the Common Stock represented by such certificates.  Similarly, during such time periods, transfers of shares participating in the direct registration system shall also be deemed to be transfers of the associated Rights.  In the case of any shares participating in the direct registration system, the Company shall cause the transfer agent for the Common Stock to include on each transaction advice with respect thereto issued prior to the Distribution Date a notation to the effect that the Company will furnish the stockholder without charge a copy of the Rights Agreement, as in effect on the date of mailing, upon written request to the Secretary of the Company, 822 Bishop Street, Honolulu, Hawaii 96813 (or such other address as may be appropriate) or that otherwise indicates that any notation reflecting shares of Common Stock also reflects a corresponding number of Rights (subject to adjustment in accordance with the terms hereof). In the event that shares of the Common Stock are not represented by certificates, references in this Agreement to certificates shall be deemed to refer to the notations in the book entry accounts reflecting ownership of such shares.
 
 
Section 4.
                               
Form of Rights Certificates
.
 
(a)
                     
The Rights Certificates (and the forms of election to purchase and of assignment to be printed on the reverse thereof) shall each be substantially in the form set forth in Exhibit B hereto and may have such marks of identification or designation and such legends, summaries or endorsements printed thereon as the Company may deem appropriate (but which do not affect the rights, duties, obligations or immunities of the Rights Agent) and as are not inconsistent with the provisions of this Agreement, or as may be required to comply with any applicable law or with any rule or regulation made pursuant thereto or with any rule or regulation of any stock exchange on which the Rights may from time to time be listed, or to conform to usage.  Subject to the provisions of Section 11 and Section 22 hereof, the Rights Certificates, whenever distributed, shall be dated as of the Record Date and on their face shall entitle the holders thereof to purchase such number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock as shall be set forth therein at the price set forth therein (such exercise price per one one-thousandth of a share, the "Purchase Price"), but the amount and type of securities purchasable upon the exercise of each Right and the Purchase Price thereof shall be subject to adjustment as provided herein.
 
(b)
                    
Any Rights Certificate issued pursuant to Section 3(a), Section 11(i) or Section 22 hereof that represents Rights beneficially owned by: (i) an Acquiring Person or any Associate or Affiliate of an Acquiring Person, (ii) a transferee of an Acquiring Person (or of any such Associate or Affiliate) who becomes a transferee after the Acquiring Person becomes such, or (iii) a transferee of an Acquiring Person (or of any such Associate or Affiliate) who becomes a transferee prior to or concurrently with the Acquiring Person becoming such and receives such Rights pursuant to either (A) a transfer (whether or not for consideration) from the Acquiring
Person to holders of equity interests in such Acquiring Person or to any Person with whom such Acquiring Person has any continuing agreement, arrangement or understanding (whether or not in writing) regarding the transferred Rights or (B) a transfer that the Board has determined is part of a plan, arrangement or understanding that has as a primary purpose or effect the avoidance of Section 7(e) hereof, and any Rights Certificate issued pursuant to Section 6 or Section 11 hereof upon transfer, exchange, replacement or adjustment of any other Rights Certificate referred to in this sentence, shall contain (to the extent the Rights Agent has knowledge thereof and to the extent feasible) the following legend:
The Rights represented by this Rights Certificate are or were beneficially owned by a Person who was or became an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of an Acquiring Person (as such terms are defined in the Rights Agreement).  Accordingly, this Rights Certificate and the Rights represented hereby may become null and void in the circumstances specified in Section 7(e) of the Rights Agreement.
 
Section 5.
                               
Countersignature and Registration
.
 
(a)
                     
The Rights Certificates shall be executed on behalf of the Company by its Chairman of the Board, its President or any Vice President (or more senior officer of the Company), either manually or by facsimile signature, and shall have affixed thereto the Company's seal or a facsimile thereof that shall be attested by the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary of the Company, either manually or by facsimile signature.  The Rights Certificates shall be countersigned by the Rights Agent, either manually or by facsimile signature, and shall not be valid for any purpose unless so countersigned.  In case any officer of the Company who shall have signed any of the Rights Certificates shall cease to be such officer of the Company before countersignature by the Rights Agent and issuance and delivery by the Company, such Rights Certificates, nevertheless, may be countersigned by the Rights Agent and issued and delivered by the Company with the same force and effect as though the person who signed such Rights Certificates had not ceased to be such officer of the Company; and any Rights Certificates may be signed on behalf of the Company by any person who, at the actual date of the execution of such Rights Certificate, shall be a proper officer of the Company to sign such Rights Certificate, although at the date of the execution of this Agreement any such person was not such an officer.
 
(b)
                    
Following the Distribution Date, the Rights Agent will keep or cause to be kept, at its office or offices designated as the appropriate place for surrender of Rights Certificates upon exercise or transfer, books for registration and transfer of the Rights Certificates issued hereunder.  Such books shall show the names and addresses of the respective holders of the Rights Certificates, the number of Rights evidenced on its face by each of the Rights Certificates and the date of each of the Rights Certificates.
 
Section 6.
                               
Transfer, Split Up, Combination and Exchange of Rights Certificates; Mutilated, Destroyed, Lost or Stolen Rights Certificates
.
 
(a)
                     
Subject to the provisions of Section 4(b), Section 7(e) and Section 14 hereof, at any time after the Close of Business on the Distribution Date, and at or prior to the
Close of Business on the Expiration Date, any Rights Certificate or Certificates (other than Rights Certificates representing Rights that may have been exchanged pursuant to Section 24 hereof) may be transferred, split up, combined or exchanged for another Rights Certificate or Certificates, entitling the registered holder to purchase a like number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (or, following a Triggering Event, Common Stock, other securities, cash or other assets, as the case may be) as the Rights Certificate or Certificates surrendered then entitles such holder (or former holder in the case of a transfer) to purchase.  Any registered holder desiring to transfer, split up, combine or exchange any Rights Certificate or Certificates shall make such request in writing delivered to the Rights Agent, and shall surrender the Rights Certificate or Certificates to be transferred, split up, combined or exchanged at the office or offices of the Rights Agent designated for such purpose.  The Right Certificates are transferable only on the registry books of the Rights Agent.  Neither the Rights Agent nor the Company shall be obligated to take any action whatsoever with respect to the transfer of any such surrendered Rights Certificate until the registered holder shall have completed and signed the certificate contained in the form of assignment on the reverse side of such Rights Certificate and shall have provided such additional evidence of the identity of the Beneficial Owner (or former Beneficial Owner) or Affiliates or Associates thereof as the Company or the Rights Agent shall reasonably request.  Thereupon the Rights Agent shall, subject to Section 4(b), Section 7(e), Section 14 and Section 24 hereof, countersign (by manual or facsimile signature) and deliver to the Person entitled thereto a Rights Certificate or Rights Certificates, as the case may be, as so requested.  The Company may require payment from any holder of a Rights Certificate of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or governmental charge that may be imposed in connection with any transfer, split up, combination or exchange of Rights Certificates.  The Rights Agent shall have no duty or obligation to take any action under any Section of this Rights Agreement which requires the payment by a Rights holder of applicable taxes and charges unless and until the Rights Agent is satisfied that all such taxes and/or charges have been paid.
(b)
                    
Upon receipt by the Company and the Rights Agent of evidence reasonably satisfactory to them of the loss, theft, destruction or mutilation of a Rights Certificate, and, in case of loss, theft or destruction, of indemnity or security satisfactory to the Company and the Rights Agent, and reimbursement to the Company and the Rights Agent of all reasonable expenses incidental thereto, and upon surrender to the Rights Agent and cancellation of the Rights Certificate if mutilated, the Company will execute and deliver a new Rights Certificate of like tenor to the Rights Agent for countersignature and delivery to the registered owner in lieu of the Rights Certificate so lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated.
 
Section 7.
                               
Exercise of Rights; Purchase Price; Expiration Date of Rights
.
 
(a)
                     
Subject to Section 7(e) hereof, at any time after the Distribution Date the registered holder of any Rights Certificate may exercise the Rights evidenced thereby (except as otherwise provided herein including, without limitation, the restrictions on exercisability set forth in Section 9(c), Section 11(a)(iii) and Section 23(a) hereof) in whole or in part upon surrender of the Rights Certificate, with the form of election to purchase and the certificate on the reverse side thereof duly executed, to the Rights Agent at the office or offices of the Rights Agent designated for such purpose, together with payment of the aggregate Purchase Price with respect to the total number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (or other securities, cash or other assets, as the case may be) as to which such surrendered Rights are then
exercisable and an amount equal to any tax or charge required to be paid under Section 9(e), at or prior to the earlier of (i) the Final Expiration Date or (ii) the time at which the Rights are redeemed or exchanged as provided in Section 23 and Section 24 hereof (the earlier of (i) and (ii) being herein referred to as the "Expiration Date").
(b)
                    
The Purchase Price for each one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock pursuant to the exercise of a Right initially shall be $125 and shall be subject to adjustment from time to time as provided in Section 11 and Section 13(a) hereof and shall be payable in accordance with paragraph (c) below.
 
(c)
                     
Upon receipt of a Rights Certificate representing exercisable Rights, with the form of election to purchase and the certificate duly executed, accompanied by payment, with respect to each Right so exercised, of the Purchase Price per one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock (or other shares, securities, cash or other assets, as the case may be) to be purchased as set forth below and an amount equal to any applicable tax, the Rights Agent shall, subject to Section 7(f) and Section 20(k) hereof, thereupon promptly (i) (A) requisition from any transfer agent of the shares of Preferred Stock (or make available, if the Rights Agent is the transfer agent for such shares) certificates for the total number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock to be purchased and the Company hereby irrevocably authorizes its transfer agent to comply with all such requests, or (B) if the Company shall have elected to deposit the total number of shares of Preferred Stock issuable upon exercise of the Rights hereunder with a depositary agent, requisition from the depositary agent depositary receipts representing such number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock as are to be purchased (in which case certificates for the shares of Preferred Stock represented by such receipts shall be deposited by the transfer agent with the depositary agent) and the Company will direct the depositary agent to comply with such request, (ii) requisition from the Company the amount of cash, if any, to be paid in lieu of fractional shares in accordance with Section 14 hereof, (iii) after receipt of such certificates or depositary receipts, cause the same to be delivered to or, upon the order of the registered holder of such Rights Certificate, registered in such name or names as may be designated by such holder, and (iv) after receipt thereof, deliver such cash, if any, to or upon the order of the registered holder of such Rights Certificate.  The payment of the Purchase Price (as such amount may be reduced pursuant to Section 11(a)(iii) hereof) and any taxes or charges required to be paid under Section 9(e) hereof, shall be made in cash or by certified bank check or bank draft payable to the order of the Company.  In the event that the Company is obligated to issue other securities (including Common Stock) of the Company, pay cash and/or distribute other property pursuant to Section 11(a) hereof, the Company will make all arrangements necessary so that such other securities, cash and/or other property are available for distribution by the Rights Agent, if and when appropriate.  The Company reserves the right to require prior to the occurrence of a Triggering Event that, upon any exercise of Rights, a number of Rights be exercised so that only whole shares of Preferred Stock would be issued.
 
(d)
                    
In case the registered holder of any Rights Certificate shall exercise less than all the Rights evidenced thereby, a new Rights Certificate evidencing the Rights
remaining unexercised shall be issued by the Rights Agent and delivered to, or upon the order of, the registered holder of such Rights Certificate, registered in such name or names as may be designated by such holder, subject to the provisions of Section 14 hereof.
(e)
                     
Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, from and after the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event, any Rights beneficially owned by (i) an Acquiring Person or an Associate or Affiliate of an Acquiring Person, (ii) a transferee of an Acquiring Person (or of any such Associate or Affiliate) who becomes a transferee after the Acquiring Person becomes such, or (iii) a transferee of an Acquiring Person (or of any such Associate or Affiliate) who becomes a transferee prior to or concurrently with the Acquiring Person becoming such and receives such Rights pursuant to either (A) a transfer (whether or not for consideration) from the Acquiring Person to holders of equity interests in such Acquiring Person or to any Person with whom the Acquiring Person has any continuing agreement, arrangement or understanding (whether or not in writing) regarding the transferred Rights or (B) a transfer that the Board has determined is part of a plan, arrangement or understanding (whether or not in writing) that has as a primary purpose or effect the avoidance of this Section 7(e), shall become null and void without any further action and no holder of such Rights shall have any rights whatsoever with respect to such Rights, whether under any provision of this Agreement or otherwise.  The Company shall use all reasonable efforts to insure that the provisions of this Section 7(e) and Section 4(b) hereof are complied with, but shall have no liability to any holder of Rights Certificates or any other Person as a result of its failure to make any determinations with respect to an Acquiring Person or any of its Affiliates or Associates or their respective transferees hereunder.
 
(f)
                       
Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, neither the Rights Agent nor the Company shall be obligated to undertake any action with respect to a registered holder upon the occurrence of any purported exercise as set forth in this Section 7 unless such registered holder shall have (i) completed and signed the certificate contained in the form of election to purchase set forth on the reverse side of the Rights Certificate surrendered for such exercise, and (ii) provided such additional evidence of the identity of the Beneficial Owner (or former Beneficial Owner) or Affiliates or Associates thereof as the Company or the Rights Agent shall reasonably request.
 
Section 8.
                               
Cancellation and Destruction of Rights Certificates
.  All Rights Certificates surrendered for the purpose of exercise, transfer, split up, combination, redemption or exchange shall, if surrendered to the Company or any of its agents, be delivered to the Rights Agent for cancellation or in cancelled form, or, if surrendered to the Rights Agent, shall be cancelled by it, and no Rights Certificates shall be issued in lieu thereof except as expressly permitted by any of the provisions of this Agreement.  The Company shall deliver to the Rights Agent for cancellation and retirement, and the Rights Agent shall so cancel and retire, any other Rights Certificate purchased or acquired by the Company otherwise than upon the exercise thereof.  The Rights Agent shall deliver all cancelled Rights Certificates to the Company, or shall, at the written request of the Company, destroy, or cause to be destroyed, such cancelled Rights Certificates, and in such case shall deliver a certificate of destruction thereof to the Company.
Section 9.
                               
Reservation and Availability of Capital Stock
.
(a)
                     
The Company covenants and agrees that it will cause to be reserved and kept available out of its authorized and unissued shares of Preferred Stock (and, following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, out of its authorized and unissued shares of Common Stock and/or other securities or out of its authorized and issued shares held in its treasury), the number of shares of Preferred Stock (and, following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, Common Stock and/or other securities) that, as provided in this Agreement, including Section 11(a)(iii) hereof, will be sufficient to permit the exercise in full of all outstanding Rights.
 
(b)
                    
So long as the shares of Preferred Stock (and, following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, Common Stock and/or other securities) issuable and deliverable upon the exercise of the Rights may be listed on any national securities exchange, the Company shall use its best efforts to cause, from and after such time as the Rights become exercisable, all shares reserved for such issuance to be listed on such exchange upon official notice of issuance upon such exercise.
 
(c)
                     
The Company shall use its best efforts to (i) file, as soon as practicable following the earliest date after the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event on which the consideration to be delivered by the Company upon exercise of the Rights has been determined in accordance with Section 11(a)(iii) hereof, a registration statement under the Act, with respect to the securities purchasable upon exercise of the Rights on an appropriate form, (ii) cause such registration statement to become effective as soon as practicable after such filing, and (iii) cause such registration statement to remain effective (with a prospectus at all times meeting the requirements of the Act) until the earlier of (A) the date as of which the Rights are no longer exercisable for such securities, and (B) the Expiration Date.  The Company will also take such action as may be appropriate under, or to ensure compliance with, the securities or "blue sky" laws of the various states in connection with the exercisability of the Rights.  The Company may temporarily suspend, for a period of time not to exceed ninety (90) days after the date set forth in clause (i) of the first sentence of this Section 9(c), the exercisability of the Rights in order to prepare and file such registration statement and permit it to become effective.  Upon any such suspension, the Company shall issue a public announcement stating that the exercisability of the Rights has been temporarily suspended, as well as a public announcement at such time as the suspension has been rescinded.  In addition, if the Company shall determine that a registration statement is required following the Distribution Date, the Company may temporarily suspend the exercisability of the Rights until such time as a registration statement has been declared effective.  Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, the Rights shall not be exercisable in any jurisdiction if the requisite qualification in such jurisdiction shall not have been obtained, the exercise thereof shall not be permitted under applicable law, or a registration statement shall not have been declared effective.
 
(d)
                    
The Company covenants and agrees that it will take all such action as may be necessary to ensure that all one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (and, following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, Common Stock and/or other securities) delivered upon exercise of Rights shall, at the time of delivery of the certificates for such shares (subject to payment of the Purchase Price), be duly and validly authorized and issued and fully paid and nonassessable.
(e)
                     
The Company further covenants and agrees that it will pay when due and payable any and all taxes and charges that may be payable in respect of the issuance or delivery of the Rights Certificates and of any certificates for a number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) upon the exercise of Rights.  The Company shall not, however, be required to pay any tax that may be payable in respect of any transfer or delivery of Rights Certificates to a Person other than, or the issuance or delivery of a number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) in respect of a name other than that of the registered holder of the Rights Certificates evidencing Rights surrendered for exercise, nor shall the Company be required to issue or deliver any certificates (or make any entries in the book entry account) for a number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) in a name other than that of the registered holder upon the exercise of any Rights until such tax shall have been paid (any such tax being payable by the holder of such Rights Certificate at the time of surrender) or until it has been established to the Company's and the Rights Agent's satisfaction that no such tax is due.
 
Section 10.
                       
Preferred Stock Record Date
.  Each person in whose name any certificate (or notation in the book entry account) for a number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) is issued upon the exercise of Rights shall for all purposes be deemed to have become the holder of record of such fractional shares of Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) represented thereby on, and such certificate shall be dated, the date upon which the Rights Certificate evidencing such Rights was duly surrendered and payment of the Purchase Price (and all applicable transfer taxes) was made; , , that if the date of such surrender and payment is a date upon which the Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) transfer books of the Company are closed, such Person shall be deemed to have become the record holder of such shares (fractional or otherwise) on, and such certificate (or notation in the book entry account) shall be dated, the next succeeding Business Day on which the Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) transfer books of the Company are open.  Prior to the exercise of the Rights evidenced thereby, the holder of a Rights Certificate shall not be entitled to any rights of a stockholder of the Company with respect to shares for which the Rights shall be exercisable, including, without limitation, the right to vote, to receive dividends or other distributions or to exercise any preemptive rights, and shall not be entitled to receive any notice of any proceedings of the Company, except as provided herein.
provided
however
 
Section 11.
                       
Adjustment of Purchase Price, Number and Kind of Shares or Number of Rights
.  The Purchase Price, the number and kind of shares covered by each Right and the number of Rights outstanding are subject to adjustment from time to time as provided in this Section 11.
 
(a)
                   
(i)  In the event the Company shall at any time after the date of this Agreement (A) declare a dividend on the Preferred Stock payable in shares of Preferred Stock, (B) subdivide or split the outstanding shares of Preferred Stock, (C) combine or consolidate the outstanding shares of Preferred Stock into a smaller number of shares through a reverse stock split or otherwise, or (D) issue any shares of its capital stock in a reclassification of the Preferred Stock (including any such reclassification in connection with a consolidation or merger in which the Company is the continuing or surviving corporation), except as otherwise provided in this
Section 11(a) and Section 7(e) hereof, the Purchase Price in effect at the time of the record date for such dividend or of the effective date of such subdivision, split, combination, consolidation or reclassification, and the number and kind of shares of Preferred Stock or capital stock, as the case may be, issuable on such date, shall be proportionately adjusted so that the holder of any Right exercised after such time shall be entitled to receive, upon payment of the Purchase Price then in effect, the aggregate number and kind of shares of Preferred Stock or capital stock, as the case may be, which, if such Right had been exercised immediately prior to such date and at a time when the Preferred Stock transfer books of the Company were open, such holder would have owned upon such exercise and been entitled to receive by virtue of such dividend, subdivision, split, combination, consolidation or reclassification.  If an event occurs that would require an adjustment under both this Section 11(a)(i) and Section 11(a)(ii) hereof, the adjustment provided for in this Section 11(a)(i) shall be in addition to, and shall be made prior to, any adjustment required pursuant to Section 11(a)(ii) hereof.
(ii)
         
Subject to Section 24 hereof, in the event any Person shall, at any time after the Rights Dividend Declaration Date, become an Acquiring Person, unless the event causing such Person to become an Acquiring Person is a transaction set forth in Section 13(a) hereof, then, promptly following the occurrence of such event, proper provision shall be made so that each holder of a Right (except as provided below and in Section 7(e) hereof) shall thereafter have the right to receive, upon exercise thereof at the then current Purchase Price in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, in lieu of a number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock, such number of shares of Common Stock of the Company as shall equal the result obtained by (x) multiplying the then current Purchase Price by the then number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock for which a Right was exercisable immediately prior to the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event, and (y) dividing that product (which, following such first occurrence, shall thereafter be referred to as the "Purchase Price" for each Right and for all purposes of this Agreement) by 50% of the Current Market Price (determined pursuant to Section 11(d) hereof) per share of Common Stock on the date of such first occurrence (such number of shares, the "Adjustment Shares").
 
(iii)
      
In the event that the number of shares of Common Stock that is authorized by the Company's Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation, as amended from time to time, but not outstanding or reserved for issuance for purposes other than upon exercise of the Rights, is not sufficient to permit the exercise in full of the Rights in accordance with the foregoing subparagraph (ii) of this Section 11(a), the Company shall (A) determine the value of the Adjustment Shares issuable upon the exercise of a Right (the "Current Value"), and (B) with respect to each Right (subject to Section 7(e) hereof), make adequate provision to substitute for the Adjustment Shares, upon the exercise of a Right and payment of the applicable Purchase Price, (1) cash, (2) a reduction in the Purchase Price, (3) Common Stock or other equity securities of the Company (including, without limitation, shares, or units of shares, of preferred stock, such as the Preferred Stock, that the Board has deemed to have essentially the same value or economic rights as shares of Common Stock (such shares of preferred stock being referred to as "Common Stock Equivalents")), (4) debt securities of the Company, (5) other assets, or (6) any combination of the foregoing, having an aggregate value equal to the Current Value (less the amount of any reduction in the Purchase Price), where such aggregate value has been determined by the Board based upon the advice of a nationally recognized investment banking firm selected by the Board; , , that if the Company shall not have made adequate provision to
provided
however
deliver value pursuant to clause (B) above within thirty (30) days following the later of (x) the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event and (y) the date on which the Company's right of redemption pursuant to Section 23(a) expires (the later of (x) and (y) being referred to herein as the "Section 11(a)(ii) Trigger Date"), then the Company shall be obligated to deliver, upon the surrender for exercise of a Right and without requiring payment of the Purchase Price, shares of Common Stock (to the extent available) and then, if necessary, cash, which shares and/or cash have an aggregate value equal to the Spread.  For purposes of the preceding sentence, the term "Spread" shall mean the excess of (i) the Current Value over (ii) the Purchase Price.  If the Board determines in good faith that it is likely that sufficient additional shares of Common Stock could be authorized for issuance upon exercise in full of the Rights, the thirty (30) day period set forth above may be extended to the extent necessary, but not more than ninety (90) days after the Section 11(a)(ii) Trigger Date, in order that the Company may seek stockholder approval for the authorization of such additional shares (such thirty (30) day period, as it may be extended, is herein called the "Substitution Period").  To the extent that the Company determines that action should be taken pursuant to the first and/or third sentences of this Section 11(a)(iii), the Company (1) shall provide, subject to Section 7(e) hereof, that such action shall apply uniformly to all outstanding Rights, and (2) may suspend the exercisability of the Rights until the expiration of the Substitution Period in order to seek such stockholder approval for such authorization of additional shares and/or to decide the appropriate form of distribution to be made pursuant to such first sentence and to determine the value thereof.  In the event of any such suspension, the Company shall issue a public announcement stating that the exercisability of the Rights has been temporarily suspended, as well as a public announcement at such time as the suspension is no longer in effect.  For purposes of this Section 11(a)(iii), the value of each Adjustment Share shall be the Current Market Price per share of the Common Stock on the Section 11(a)(ii) Trigger Date and the per share or per unit value of any Common Stock Equivalent shall be deemed to equal the Current Market Price per share of the Common Stock on such date.
(b)
                    
In case the Company shall fix a record date for the issuance of rights, options or warrants to all holders of shares of Preferred Stock entitling them to subscribe for or purchase (for a period expiring within 45 calendar days after such record date) shares of Preferred Stock (or shares having the same rights, privileges and preferences as the shares of Preferred Stock ("Equivalent Preferred Stock")) or securities convertible into Preferred Stock or Equivalent Preferred Stock at a price per share of Preferred Stock or per share of Equivalent Preferred Stock (or having a conversion price per share, if a security convertible into Preferred Stock or Equivalent Preferred Stock) less than the Current Market Price (as determined pursuant to Section 11(d) hereof) per share of Preferred Stock on such record date, the Purchase Price to be in effect after such record date shall be determined by multiplying the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to such record date by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of shares of Preferred Stock outstanding on such record date, plus the number of shares of Preferred Stock that the aggregate offering price of the total number of shares of Preferred Stock and/or Equivalent Preferred Stock so to be offered (and/or the aggregate initial conversion price of the convertible securities so to be offered) would purchase at such Current Market Price, and the denominator of which shall be the number of shares of Preferred Stock outstanding on such record date, plus the number of additional shares of Preferred Stock and/or Equivalent Preferred Stock to be offered for subscription or purchase (or into which the convertible securities so to be offered are initially convertible).  In case such subscription price may be paid by delivery of consideration part or all of which may be in a form other than cash, the value of such
consideration shall be as determined in good faith by the Board, whose determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent and shall be binding on the Rights Agent and the holders of the Rights.  Shares of Preferred Stock owned by or held for the account of the Company shall not be deemed outstanding for the purpose of any such computation.  Such adjustment shall be made successively whenever such a record date is fixed, and in the event that such rights or warrants are not so issued, the Purchase Price shall be adjusted to be the Purchase Price that would then be in effect if such record date had not been fixed.
(c)
                     
In case the Company shall fix a record date for a distribution to all holders of shares of Preferred Stock (including any such distribution made in connection with a consolidation or merger in which the Company is the continuing or surviving corporation) of cash (other than a regular quarterly cash dividend out of the earnings or retained earnings of the Company), assets (other than a dividend payable in Preferred Stock, but including any dividend payable in stock other than Preferred Stock) or evidences of indebtedness, or of subscription rights or warrants (excluding those referred to in Section 11(b) hereof), the Purchase Price to be in effect after such record date shall be determined by multiplying the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to such record date by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the Current Market Price (as determined pursuant to Section 11(d) hereof) per share of Preferred Stock on such record date, less the fair market value (as determined in good faith by the Board, whose determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent) of the portion of the cash, assets or evidences of indebtedness so to be distributed or of such subscription rights or warrants applicable to a share of Preferred Stock, and the denominator of which shall be such Current Market Price (as determined pursuant to Section 11(d) hereof) per share of Preferred Stock.  Such adjustments shall be made successively whenever such a record date is fixed, and in the event that such distribution is not so made, the Purchase Price shall be adjusted to be the Purchase Price that would have been in effect if such record date had not been fixed.
 
(d)
                    
(i)  For the purpose of any computation hereunder, other than computations made pursuant to Section 11(a)(iii) hereof, the "Current Market Price" per share of Common Stock on any date shall be deemed to be the average of the daily closing prices per share of such Common Stock for the thirty (30) consecutive Trading Days immediately prior to such date, and for purposes of computations made pursuant to Section 11(a)(iii) hereof, the Current Market Price per share of Common Stock on any date shall be deemed to be the average of the daily closing prices per share of such Common Stock for the ten (10) consecutive Trading Days immediately following such date; , , that in the event that the Current Market Price per share of the Common Stock is determined during a period following the announcement by the issuer of such Common Stock of (A) a dividend or distribution on such Common Stock payable in shares of such Common Stock or securities convertible into shares of such Common Stock (other than the Rights), or (B) any subdivision, combination or reclassification of such Common Stock, and the ex-dividend date for such dividend or distribution, or the record date for such subdivision, combination or reclassification shall not have occurred prior to the commencement of the requisite thirty (30) Trading Day or ten (10) Trading Day period, as set forth above, then, and in each such case, the Current Market Price shall be properly adjusted to take into account ex-dividend trading.  The closing price for each day shall be the last sale price, regular way, or, in case no such sale takes place on such day, the average of the closing bid and asked prices, regular way, in either case as reported in the principal consolidated transaction reporting system with respect to securities listed or admitted to
provided
however
trading on the New York Stock Exchange or, if the shares of Common Stock are not listed or admitted to trading on the New York Stock Exchange, as reported in the principal consolidated transaction reporting system with respect to securities listed on the principal national securities exchange on which the shares of Common Stock are listed or admitted to trading or, if the shares of Common Stock are not listed or admitted to trading on any national securities exchange, the last quoted price or, if not so quoted, the average of the high bid and low asked prices in the over-the-counter market, as reported by the National Association of Securities Dealers Automated Quotations System ("NASDAQ") or such other system then in use, or, if on any such date the shares of Common Stock are not quoted by any such organization, the average of the closing bid and asked prices as furnished by a professional market maker making a market in the Common Stock selected by the Board.  If on any such date no market maker is making a market in the Common Stock, the fair value of such shares on such date as determined in good faith by the Board shall be used.  The term "Trading Day" shall mean a day on which the principal national securities exchange on which the shares of Common Stock are listed or admitted to trading is open for the transaction of business or, if the shares of Common Stock are not listed or admitted to trading on any national securities exchange, a Business Day.  If the Common Stock is not publicly held or not so listed or traded, the Current Market Price per share shall mean the fair value per share as determined in good faith by the Board, whose determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent and shall be conclusive for all purposes.
(ii)
         
For the purpose of any computation hereunder, the Current Market Price per share of Preferred Stock shall be determined in the same manner as set forth above for the Common Stock in clause (i) of this Section 11(d) (other than the last sentence thereof).  If the Current Market Price per share of Preferred Stock cannot be determined in the manner provided above or if the Preferred Stock is not publicly held or listed or traded in a manner described in clause (i) of this Section 11(d), the Current Market Price per share of Preferred Stock shall be conclusively deemed to be an amount equal to 1,000 (as such number may be appropriately adjusted for such events as stock splits, stock dividends and recapitalizations with respect to the Common Stock occurring after the date of this Agreement) multiplied by the Current Market Price per share of the Common Stock.  If neither the Common Stock nor the Preferred Stock is publicly held or so listed or traded, Current Market Price per share of the Preferred Stock shall mean the fair value per share as determined in good faith by the Board, whose determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent and shall be conclusive for all purposes.
 
(e)
                     
Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, no adjustment in the Purchase Price shall be required unless such adjustment would require an increase or decrease of at least one percent (1%) in the Purchase Price; , , that any adjustments that by reason of this Section 11(e) are not required to be made shall be carried forward and taken into account in any subsequent adjustment.  All calculations under this Section 11 shall be made to the nearest cent or to the nearest ten-thousandth of a share of Common Stock or other share or one-millionth of a share of Preferred Stock, as the case may be.  Notwithstanding the first sentence of this Section 11(e), any adjustment required by this Section 11 shall be made no later than the earlier of (i) three years from the date of the transaction that mandates such adjustment, or (ii) the Expiration Date.
provided
however
(f)
                      
If as a result of an adjustment made pursuant to Section 11(a)(ii) or Section 13(a) hereof, the holder of any Right thereafter exercised shall become entitled to receive any shares of capital stock other than Preferred Stock, thereafter the number of such other shares so receivable upon exercise of any Right and the Purchase Price thereof shall be subject to adjustment from time to time in a manner and on terms as nearly equivalent as practicable to the provisions with respect to the Preferred Stock contained in Sections 11(a), (b), (c), (e), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k) and (m), and the provisions of Sections 7, 9, 10, 13 and 14 hereof with respect to the Preferred Stock shall apply on like terms to any such other shares.
 
(g)
                     
All Rights originally issued by the Company subsequent to any adjustment made to the Purchase Price hereunder shall evidence the right to purchase, at the adjusted Purchase Price, the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock purchasable from time to time hereunder upon exercise of the Rights, all subject to further adjustment as provided herein.
 
(h)
                    
Unless the Company shall have exercised its election as provided in Section 11(i), upon each adjustment of the Purchase Price as a result of the calculations made in Sections 11(b) and (c), each Right outstanding immediately prior to the making of such adjustment shall thereafter evidence the right to purchase, at the adjusted Purchase Price, that number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (calculated to the nearest one-millionth) obtained by (i) multiplying (x) the number of one one-thousandths of a share covered by a Right immediately prior to this adjustment, by (y) the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to such adjustment of the Purchase Price, and (ii) dividing the product so obtained by the Purchase Price in effect immediately after such adjustment of the Purchase Price.
 
(i)
                        
The Company may elect on or after the date of any adjustment of the Purchase Price to adjust the number of Rights, in lieu of any adjustment in the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock purchasable upon the exercise of a Right.  Each of the Rights outstanding after the adjustment in the number of Rights shall be exercisable for the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock for which a Right was exercisable immediately prior to such adjustment.  Each Right held of record prior to such adjustment of the number of Rights shall become that number of Rights (calculated to the nearest one-ten-thousandth) obtained by dividing the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to adjustment of the Purchase Price by the Purchase Price in effect immediately after adjustment of the Purchase Price.  The Company shall make a public announcement of its election to adjust the number of Rights, indicating the record date for the adjustment, and, if known at the time, the amount of the adjustment to be made.  This record date may be the date on which the Purchase Price is adjusted or any day thereafter, but, if the Rights Certificates have been issued, shall be at least ten (10) days later than the date of the public announcement.  If Rights Certificates have been issued, upon each adjustment of the number of Rights pursuant to this Section 11(i), the Company shall, as promptly as practicable, cause to be distributed to holders of record of Rights Certificates on such record date Rights Certificates evidencing, subject to Section 14 hereof, the additional Rights to which such holders shall be entitled as a result of such adjustment, or, at the option of the Company, shall cause to be distributed to such holders of record in substitution and replacement for the Rights Certificates held by such holders prior to the date of adjustment, and upon surrender thereof, if required by the Company, new Rights Certificates evidencing all the Rights to which such holders shall be entitled after such adjustment.  Rights Certificates so to be
distributed shall be issued, executed and countersigned in the manner provided for herein (and may bear, at the option of the Company, the adjusted Purchase Price) and shall be registered in the names of the holders of record of Rights Certificates on the record date specified in the public announcement.
(j)
                       
Irrespective of any adjustment or change in the Purchase Price or the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock issuable upon the exercise of the Rights, the Rights Certificates theretofore and thereafter issued may continue to express the Purchase Price per one one-thousandth of a share and the number of one one-thousandths of a share that were expressed in the initial Rights Certificates issued hereunder.
 
(k)
                    
Before taking any action that would cause an adjustment reducing the Purchase Price below the then stated value, if any, of the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock issuable upon exercise of the Rights, the Company shall take any corporate action that may, in the opinion of its counsel, be necessary in order that the Company may validly and legally issue fully paid and nonassessable such number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock at such adjusted Purchase Price.
 
(l)
                        
In any case in which this Section 11 shall require that an adjustment in the Purchase Price be made effective as of a record date for a specified event, the Company may elect to defer until the occurrence of such event the issuance to the holder of any Right exercised after such record date the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock and other capital stock or securities of the Company, if any, issuable upon such exercise over and above the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock and other capital stock or securities of the Company, if any, issuable upon such exercise on the basis of the Purchase Price in effect prior to such adjustment; , , that the Company shall deliver to such holder a due bill or other appropriate instrument evidencing such holder's right to receive such additional shares (fractional or otherwise) or securities upon the occurrence of the event requiring such adjustment.
provided
however
 
(m)
                
Anything in this Section 11 to the contrary notwithstanding, the Company shall be entitled to make such reductions in the Purchase Price, in addition to those adjustments expressly required by this Section 11, as and to the extent that in their good faith judgment the Board shall determine to be advisable in order that any (i) consolidation or subdivision of the Preferred Stock, (ii) issuance wholly for cash of any shares of Preferred Stock at less than the Current Market Price, (iii) issuance wholly for cash of shares of Preferred Stock or securities that by their terms are convertible into or exchangeable for shares of Preferred Stock, (iv) stock dividends or (v) issuance of rights, options or warrants referred to in this Section 11, hereafter made by the Company to holders of its Preferred Stock shall not be taxable to such stockholders.
 
(n)
                    
The Company covenants and agrees that it shall not, at any time after the Distribution Date, (i) consolidate with any other Person (other than a Subsidiary of the Company in a transaction that complies with Section 11(o) hereof), (ii) merge with or into any other Person (other than a Subsidiary of the Company in a transaction that complies with Section 11(o) hereof), or (iii) sell or transfer (or permit any Subsidiary to sell or transfer), in one transaction, or a series of related transactions, assets, cash flow or earning power aggregating
more than 50% of the assets or earning power of the Company and its Subsidiaries (taken as a whole) to any other Person or Persons (other than the Company and/or any of its Subsidiaries in one or more transactions each of which complies with Section 11(o) hereof), if (x) at the time of or immediately after such consolidation, merger or sale there are any rights, warrants or other instruments or securities outstanding or agreements in effect that would substantially diminish or otherwise eliminate the benefits intended to be afforded by the Rights or (y) prior to, simultaneously with or immediately after such consolidation, merger or sale, the stockholders of the Person who constitutes, or would constitute, the "Principal Party" for purposes of Section 13(a) hereof shall have received a distribution of Rights previously owned by such Person or any of its Affiliates and Associates.
(o)
                    
The Company covenants and agrees that, after the Distribution Date, it will not, except as permitted by Section 23, Section 24 or Section 27 hereof, take (or permit any Subsidiary to take) any action if at the time such action is taken it is reasonably foreseeable that such action will diminish substantially or otherwise eliminate the benefits intended to be afforded by the Rights.
 
(p)
                    
Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, in the event that the Company shall at any time after the Rights Dividend Declaration Date and prior to the Distribution Date (i) declare a dividend on the outstanding shares of Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding shares of Common Stock, or (iii) combine the outstanding shares of Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, the number of Rights associated with each share of Common Stock then outstanding, or issued or delivered thereafter but prior to the Distribution Date, shall be proportionately adjusted so that the number of Rights thereafter associated with each share of Common Stock following any such event shall equal the result obtained by multiplying the number of Rights associated with each share of Common Stock immediately prior to such event by a fraction the numerator of which shall be the total number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately prior to the occurrence of the event and the denominator of which shall be the total number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately following the occurrence of such event.
 
(q)
                    
For the avoidance of doubt, no adjustment to the Purchase Price, the number and kind of shares covered by each Right and the number of Rights outstanding shall be made in connection with any split or subdivision of the Common Stock prior to the Separation.
 
Section 12.
                       
Certificate of Adjusted Purchase Price or Number of Shares
.  Whenever an adjustment is made as provided in Section 11 and Section 13 hereof, the Company shall (a) promptly prepare a certificate setting forth such adjustment and a brief statement of the facts accounting for such adjustment, (b) promptly file with the Rights Agent, and with each transfer agent for the Preferred Stock and the Common Stock, a copy of such certificate, and (c) if a Distribution Date has occurred, mail a brief summary thereof to each holder of a Rights Certificate in accordance with Section 26 hereof.  The Rights Agent shall be fully protected in relying on any such certificate and on any adjustment therein contained, and shall have no duty or liability with respect to and shall not be deemed to have knowledge of any such adjustment unless and until it shall have received such certificate.
Section 13.
                       
Consolidation, Merger or Sale or Transfer of Assets, Cash Flow or Earning Power
.
 
(a)
                    
In the event that, following the Stock Acquisition Date, directly or indirectly, (x) the Company shall consolidate with, or merge with and into, any other Person (other than a Subsidiary of the Company in a transaction that complies with Section 11(o) hereof), and the Company shall not be the continuing or surviving corporation of such consolidation or merger, (y) any Person (other than a Subsidiary of the Company in a transaction that complies with Section 11(o) hereof) shall consolidate with, or merge with or into, the Company, and the Company shall be the continuing or surviving corporation of such consolidation or merger and, in connection with such consolidation or merger, all or part of the outstanding shares of Common Stock shall be changed into or exchanged for stock or other securities of any other Person or cash or any other property, or (z) the Company shall sell or otherwise transfer (or one or more of its Subsidiaries shall sell or otherwise transfer), in one transaction or a series of related transactions, assets, cash flow or earning power aggregating more than 50% of the assets, cash flow or earning power of the Company and its Subsidiaries (taken as a whole) to any Person or Persons (other than the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company in one or more transactions each of which complies with Section 11(o) hereof), then, and in each such case proper provision shall be made so that: (i) each holder of a Right, except as provided in Section 7(e) hereof, shall thereafter have the right to receive, upon the exercise thereof at the then current Purchase Price in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, such number of validly authorized and issued, fully paid, non-assessable and freely tradeable shares of Common Stock of the Principal Party (as such term is hereinafter defined), not subject to any liens, encumbrances, rights of first refusal or other adverse claims, as shall be equal to the result obtained by (1) multiplying the then current Purchase Price by the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock for which a Right is exercisable immediately prior to the first occurrence of a Section 13 Event (or, if a Section 11(a)(ii) Event has occurred prior to the first occurrence of a Section 13 Event, multiplying the number of such one one-thousandths of a share for which a Right was exercisable immediately prior to the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event by the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to such first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event), and (2) dividing that product (which, following the first occurrence of a Section 13 Event, shall be referred to as the "Purchase Price" for each Right and for all purposes of this Agreement) by 50% of the Current Market Price (determined pursuant to Section 11(d)(i) hereof) per share of the Common Stock of such Principal Party on the date of consummation of such Section 13 Event; (ii) such Principal Party shall thereafter be liable for, and shall assume, by virtue of such Section 13 Event, all the obligations and duties of the Company pursuant to this Agreement; (iii) the term "Company" shall thereafter be deemed to refer to such Principal Party, it being specifically intended that the provisions of Section 11 hereof shall apply only to such Principal Party following the first occurrence of a Section 13 Event; (iv) such Principal Party shall take such steps (including, but not limited to, the reservation of a sufficient number of shares of its Common Stock) in connection with the consummation of any such transaction as may be necessary to assure that the provisions hereof shall thereafter be applicable, as nearly as reasonably may be, in relation to its shares of Common Stock thereafter deliverable upon the exercise of the Rights; and (v) the provisions of Section 11(a)(ii) hereof shall be of no effect following the first occurrence of any Section 13 Event.
(b)
                    
"Principal Party" shall mean:
 
(i)
            
in the case of any transaction described in clause (x) or (y) of the first sentence of Section 13(a) hereof, the Person that is the issuer of any securities into which shares of Common Stock of the Company are converted in such merger or consolidation, and if no securities are so issued, the Person that is the other party to such merger or consolidation; and
 
(ii)
         
in the case of any transaction described in clause (z) of the first sentence of Section 13(a) hereof, the Person that is the party receiving the greatest portion of the assets, cash flow or earning power transferred pursuant to such transaction or transactions;
 
provided
, , that in any such case, (1) if the Common Stock of such Person is not at such time and has not been continuously over the preceding twelve (12) month period registered under Section 12 of the Exchange Act, and such Person is a direct or indirect Subsidiary of another Person the Common Stock of which is and has been so registered, "Principal Party" shall refer to such other Person; and (2) in case such Person is a Subsidiary, directly or indirectly, of more than one Person, the Common Stock of two or more of which are and have been so registered, "Principal Party" shall refer to whichever of such Persons is the issuer of the Common Stock having the greatest aggregate market value.
however
 
(c)
                     
The Company shall not consummate any such consolidation, merger, sale or transfer unless the Principal Party shall have a sufficient number of authorized shares of its Common Stock that have not been issued or reserved for issuance to permit the exercise in full of the Rights in accordance with this Section 13 and unless prior thereto the Company and such Principal Party shall have executed and delivered to the Rights Agent a supplemental agreement providing for the terms set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this Section 13 and further providing that, as soon as practicable after the date of any consolidation, merger or sale of assets mentioned in paragraph (a) of this Section 13, the Principal Party will
 
(i)
            
prepare and file a registration statement under the Act, with respect to the Rights and the securities purchasable upon exercise of the Rights on an appropriate form, and will use its best efforts to cause such registration statement to (A) become effective as soon as practicable after such filing and (B) remain effective (with a prospectus at all times meeting the requirements of the Act) until the Expiration Date;
 
(ii)
         
take all such other action as may be necessary to enable the Principal Party to issue the securities purchasable upon exercise of the Rights, including but not limited to the registration or qualification of such securities under all requisite securities laws of jurisdictions of the various states and the listing of such securities on such exchanges and trading markets as may be necessary or appropriate; and
 
(iii)
      
will deliver to holders of the Rights historical financial statements for the Principal Party and each of its Affiliates which
comply in all respects with the requirements for registration on Form 10 (or any successor form) under the Exchange Act.
The provisions of this Section 13 shall similarly apply to successive mergers or consolidations or sales or other transfers.  In the event that a Section 13 Event shall occur at any time after the occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event, the Rights which have not theretofore been exercised shall thereafter become exercisable in the manner described in Section 13(a).
 
Section 14.
                       
Fractional Rights and Fractional Shares
.
 
(a)
                    
The Company shall not be required to issue fractions of Rights, except prior to the Distribution Date as provided in Section 11(p) hereof, or to distribute Rights Certificates that evidence fractional Rights.  In lieu of such fractional Rights, the Company shall pay to the registered holders of the Rights Certificates with regard to which such fractional Rights would otherwise be issuable, an amount in cash equal to the same fraction of the current market value of a whole Right.  For purposes of this Section 14(a), the current market value of a whole Right shall be the closing price of the Rights for the Trading Day immediately prior to the date on which such fractional Rights would have been otherwise issuable.  The closing price of the Rights for any Trading Day shall be the last sale price, regular way, or, in case no such sale takes place on such day, the average of the closing bid and asked prices, regular way, in either case as reported in the principal consolidated transaction reporting system with respect to securities listed or admitted to trading on the New York Stock Exchange or, if the Rights are not listed or admitted to trading on the New York Stock Exchange, as reported in the principal consolidated transaction reporting system with respect to securities listed on the principal national securities exchange on which the Rights are listed or admitted to trading, or if the Rights are not listed or admitted to trading on any national securities exchange, the last quoted price or, if not so quoted, the average of the high bid and low asked prices in the over-the-counter market, as reported by NASDAQ or such other system then in use or, if on any such date the Rights are not quoted by any such organization, the average of the closing bid and asked prices as furnished by a professional market maker making a market in the Rights, selected by the Board.  If on any such date no such market maker is making a market in the Rights, the fair value of the Rights on such date as determined in good faith by the Board shall be used.
 
(b)
                    
The Company shall not be required to issue fractions of shares of Preferred Stock (other than fractions that are integral multiples of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock) upon exercise of the Rights or to distribute certificates that evidence fractional shares of Preferred Stock (other than fractions that are integral multiples of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock).  In lieu of fractional shares of Preferred Stock that are not integral multiples of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock, the Company may pay to the registered holders of Rights Certificates at the time such Rights are exercised as herein provided an amount in cash equal to the same fraction of the current market value of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock.  For purposes of this Section 14(b), the current market value of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock shall be one one-thousandth of the closing price of a share of Preferred Stock (as determined pursuant to Section 11(d)(ii) hereof) on the Trading Day immediately prior to the date of such exercise.
(c)
                     
Following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, the Company shall not be required to issue fractions of shares of Common Stock upon exercise of the Rights or to distribute certificates that evidence fractional shares of Common Stock.  In lieu of fractional shares of Common Stock, the Company may pay to the registered holders of Rights Certificates at the time such Rights are exercised as herein provided an amount in cash equal to the same fraction of the current market value of one (1) share of Common Stock.  For purposes of this Section 14(c), the current market value of one share of Common Stock shall be the closing price per share of Common Stock (as determined pursuant to Section 11(d)(i) hereof) on the Trading Day immediately prior to the date of such exercise.
 
(d)
                    
The holder of a Right by the acceptance of the Rights expressly waives such holder's right to receive any fractional Rights or any fractional shares upon exercise of a Right, except as permitted by this Section 14.
 
(e)
                     
Whenever a payment for fractional Rights or fractional shares is to be made by the Rights Agent under any section of this Rights Agreement, the Company shall (i) promptly prepare and deliver to the Rights Agent a certificate setting forth in reasonable detail the facts related to such payment and the prices and/or formulas utilized in calculating such payment, and (ii) provide sufficient monies to the Rights Agent in the form of fully collected funds to make such payments.  The Rights Agent shall be fully protected in relying upon such a certificate and shall have no duty with respect to, and shall not be deemed to have knowledge of any payment for fractional Rights or fractional shares under any Section of this Agreement relating to the payment of fractional Rights or fractional shares unless and until the Rights Agent shall have received such a certificate and sufficient monies.
 
Section 15.
                       
Rights of Action
.  All rights of action in respect of this Agreement, excepting the rights of action given to the Rights Agent under any section of this Agreement, are vested in the respective registered holders of the Rights Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, the registered holders of the Common Stock); and any registered holder of any Rights Certificate (or, prior to the Distribution Date, of the Common Stock), without the consent of the Rights Agent or of the holder of any other Rights Certificate (or, prior to the Distribution Date, of the Common Stock), may, on the holder's own behalf and for the holder's own benefit, enforce, and may institute and maintain any suit, action or proceeding against the Company to enforce, or otherwise act in respect of, the holder's right to exercise the Rights evidenced by such Rights Certificate in the manner provided in such Rights Certificate and in this Agreement.  Without limiting the foregoing or any remedies available to the holders of Rights, it is specifically acknowledged that the holders of Rights would not have an adequate remedy at law for any breach of this Agreement and shall be entitled to specific performance of the obligations hereunder and injunctive relief against actual or threatened violations of the obligations hereunder of any Person subject to this Agreement.
 
Section 16.
                       
Agreement of Rights Holders
.  Every holder of a Right by accepting the same consents and agrees with the Company and the Rights Agent and with every other holder of a Right that:
 
(a)
                    
prior to the Distribution Date, the Rights will be transferable only in connection with the transfer of shares of Common Stock;
(b)
                    
after the Distribution Date, the Rights Certificates are transferable only on the registry books of the Rights Agent if surrendered at the office or offices of the Rights Agent designated for such purposes, duly endorsed or accompanied by a proper instrument of transfer and with the appropriate forms and certificates fully executed;
 
(c)
                     
subject to Section 6(a) and Section 7(f) hereof, the Company and the Rights Agent may deem and treat the person in whose name a Rights Certificate (or, prior to the Distribution Date, the associated Common Stock certificate (or book entry shares in respect of Common Stock)) is registered as the absolute owner thereof and of the Rights evidenced thereby (notwithstanding any notations of ownership or writing on the Rights Certificates or the associated Common Stock certificate made by anyone other than the Company or the Rights Agent) for all purposes whatsoever, and neither the Company nor the Rights Agent, subject to the last sentence of Section 7(e) hereof, shall be required to be affected by any notice to the contrary; and
 
(d)
                    
notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, neither the Company nor the Rights Agent shall have any liability to any holder of a Right or other Person as a result of its inability to perform any of its obligations under this Agreement by reason of any preliminary or permanent injunction or other order, decree or ruling issued by a court of competent jurisdiction or by a governmental, regulatory or administrative agency or commission, or any statute, rule, regulation or executive order promulgated or enacted by any governmental authority, prohibiting or otherwise restraining performance of such obligation; , , the Company must use its best efforts to have any such order, decree or ruling lifted or otherwise overturned as soon as possible.
provided
however
 
Section 17.
                       
Rights Certificate Holder Not Deemed a Stockholder
.  No holder, as such, of any Rights Certificate shall be entitled to vote, receive dividends or be deemed for any purpose the holder of the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock or any other securities of the Company that may at any time be issuable on the exercise of the Rights represented thereby, nor shall anything contained herein or in any Rights Certificate be construed to confer upon the holder of any Rights Certificate, as such, any of the rights of a stockholder of the Company or any right to vote for the election of directors or upon any matter submitted to stockholders at any meeting thereof, or to give or withhold consent to any corporate action, or to receive notice of meetings or other actions affecting stockholders (except as provided in Section 25 hereof), or to receive dividends or subscription rights, or otherwise, until the Right or Rights evidenced by such Rights Certificate shall have been exercised in accordance with the provisions hereof.
 
Section 18.
                       
Concerning the Rights Agent
.
 
(a)
                    
The Company agrees to pay to the Rights Agent reasonable compensation for all services rendered by it hereunder and, from time to time, on demand of the Rights Agent, its reasonable expenses and counsel fees and disbursements and other disbursements incurred in the preparation, negotiation, delivery, execution, administration and amendment of this Agreement and the exercise and performance of its duties hereunder.  The Company also agrees to indemnify the Rights Agent for, and to hold it harmless against, any loss, liability, damage, judgment, fine, penalty, claim, demand, settlement, cost or expense (including
without limitation, the reasonable fees and expenses of legal counsel), incurred without gross negligence, bad faith or willful misconduct on the part of the Rights Agent (each as determined by a final, non-appealable judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction), for any action taken, suffered or omitted to be taken by the Rights Agent in connection with the acceptance, administration, exercise and performance of its duties under this Agreement, including without limitation the costs and expenses of defending against any claim of liability in the premises.  The costs and expenses incurred in enforcing this right of indemnification shall also be paid by the Company.  The provisions of this Section 18 and Section 20 below shall survive the termination of this Agreement, the exercise or expiration of the Rights and the resignation, replacement, or removal of the Rights Agent.
(b)
                    
The Rights Agent shall be authorized to rely conclusively on, shall be protected and shall incur no liability for or in respect of any action taken, suffered or omitted to be taken by it in connection with the acceptance, administration, exercise and performance of its duties under this Agreement in reliance upon any Rights Certificate or certificate for Common Stock (or book entry shares in respect of Common Stock) or for other securities of the Company, instrument of assignment or transfer, power of attorney, endorsement, affidavit, letter, notice, direction, consent, certificate, statement, or other paper or document believed by it to be genuine and to be signed, executed and, where necessary, verified or acknowledged, by the proper Person or Persons or otherwise upon the advice of counsel as set forth in Section 20 hereof.
 
Section 19.
                       
Merger or Consolidation or Change of Name of Rights Agent
.
 
(a)
                    
Any Person into which the Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent may be merged or with which it may be consolidated, or any Person resulting from any merger or consolidation to which the Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent shall be a party, or any Person succeeding to the stock transfer or other stockholder services business of the Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent, shall be the successor to the Rights Agent under this Agreement without the execution or filing of any paper or any further act on the part of any of the parties hereto; but only if such Person would be eligible for appointment as a successor Rights Agent under the provisions of Section 21 hereof.  The purchase of all or substantially all of the Rights Agent's assets employed in the performance of transfer agent activities shall be deemed a merger or consolidation for purposes of this Section 19.  In case at the time such successor Rights Agent shall succeed to the agency created by this Agreement, any of the Rights Certificates shall have been countersigned but not delivered, any such successor Rights Agent may adopt the countersignature of a predecessor Rights Agent and deliver such Rights Certificates so countersigned; and in case at that time any of the Rights Certificates shall not have been countersigned, any successor Rights Agent may countersign such Rights Certificates either in the name of the predecessor or in the name of the successor Rights Agent; and in all such cases such Rights Certificates shall have the full force provided in the Rights Certificates and in this Agreement.
 
(b)
                    
In case at any time the name of the Rights Agent shall be changed and at such time any of the Rights Certificates shall have been countersigned but not delivered, the Rights Agent may adopt the countersignature under its prior name and deliver Rights Certificates so countersigned; and in case at that time any of the Rights Certificates shall not have been countersigned, the Rights Agent may countersign such Rights Certificates either in its
prior name or in its changed name; and in all such cases such Rights Certificates shall have the full force provided in the Rights Certificates and in this Agreement.
Section 20.
                       
Duties of Rights Agent
.  The Rights Agent undertakes the duties and obligations imposed by this Agreement upon the following terms and conditions (and no implied duties or obligations shall be read into this Agreement against the Rights Agent), by all of which the Company and the holders of Rights Certificates, by their acceptance thereof, shall be bound:
 
(a)
                    
Before the Rights Agent acts or refrains from acting, the Rights Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be legal counsel for the Company or any employee of the Rights Agent), and the advice or opinion of such counsel shall be full and complete authorization and protection to the Rights Agent and the Rights Agent shall incur no liability for or in respect to any action taken, suffered or omitted to be taken by it and in accordance with such advice or opinion.
 
(b)
                    
Whenever in the performance of its duties under this Agreement the Rights Agent shall deem it necessary or desirable that any fact or matter (including, without limitation, the identity of any Acquiring Person and the determination of Current Market Price) be proved or established by the Company prior to taking, suffering or omitting to take any action hereunder, such fact or matter (unless other evidence in respect thereof be herein specifically prescribed) may be deemed to be conclusively proved and established by a certificate signed by the Chairman of the Board, the President, any Vice President, the Treasurer, any Assistant Treasurer, the Secretary or any Assistant Secretary of the Company and delivered to the Rights Agent; and such certificate shall be full and complete authorization and protection to the Rights Agent and the Rights Agent shall incur no liability for it in respect to any action taken, suffered or omitted to be taken by it under the provisions of this Agreement in reliance upon such certificate.
 
(c)
                     
The Rights Agent shall be liable hereunder to the Company and any other Person only for its and its directors', officers', employees', affiliates', agents', advisors' and representatives' gross negligence, bad faith or willful misconduct (each as determined by a final, non-appealable judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction).  Anything to the contrary notwithstanding, in no event shall the Rights Agent be liable for special, indirect, incidental, punitive or consequential losses or damages (including but not limited to lost profits), even if the Rights Agent has been advised of the likelihood of such loss or damage and regardless of the form of action. Any liability of the Rights Agent under this Rights Agreement will be limited to the annual fees paid by the Company to the Rights Agent.
 
(d)
                    
The Rights Agent shall not be liable for or by reason of any of the statements of fact or recitals contained in this Agreement or in the Rights Certificates or be required to verify the same (except as to its countersignature on such Rights Certificates), but all such statements and recitals are and shall be deemed to have been made by the Company only.
 
(e)
                     
The Rights Agent shall not have any liability for, nor be under any responsibility in respect of the validity of this Agreement or the execution and delivery hereof (except the due execution hereof by the Rights Agent) or in respect of the validity or execution of any Rights Certificate (except its countersignature thereof); nor shall it be liable or responsible
for any breach by the Company of any covenant or failure by the Company to satisfy any condition contained in this Agreement or in any Rights Certificate; nor shall it be liable or responsible for any change in the exercisability of the Rights; nor shall it be liable or responsible for any change or adjustment required under the provisions of Section 11, Section 13 or Section 24 hereof or responsible for the manner, method or amount of any such change or adjustment (except with respect to the exercise of Rights evidenced by Rights Certificates after actual notice of any such adjustment); nor shall it by any act hereunder be deemed to make any representation or warranty as to the authorization or reservation of any shares of Common Stock or Preferred Stock to be issued pursuant to this Agreement or any Rights Certificate or as to whether any shares of Common Stock or Preferred Stock will, when so issued, be validly authorized and issued, fully paid and nonassessable.
(f)
                      
The Company agrees that it will perform, execute, acknowledge and deliver or cause to be performed, executed, acknowledged and delivered all such further and other acts, instruments and assurances as may reasonably be required by the Rights Agent for the carrying out or performing by the Rights Agent of the provisions of this Agreement.
 
(g)
                     
The Rights Agent is hereby authorized and directed to accept instructions with respect to the performance of its duties hereunder from the Chairman of the Board, the President, any Vice President, the Secretary, any Assistant Secretary, the Treasurer or any Assistant Treasurer of the Company, and to apply to such officers for advice or instructions in connection with its duties, and such advice or instructions shall be full authorization and protection to the Rights Agent and the Rights Agent shall incur no liability for or in respect of any action taken, suffered or omitted to be taken by it in accordance with the advice or instructions of any such officer or for any delay in acting while waiting for those instructions.
 
(h)
                    
The Rights Agent and any Affiliate, stockholder, director, officer or employee of the Rights Agent may buy, sell or deal in any of the Rights or other securities of the Company or become pecuniarily interested in any transaction in which the Company may be interested, or contract with or lend money to the Company or otherwise act as fully and freely as though it were not Rights Agent under this Agreement.  Nothing herein shall preclude the Rights Agent, any Affiliate, stockholder, director, officer or employee of the Rights Agent, from acting in any other capacity for the Company or for any other Person.
 
(i)
                        
The Rights Agent may execute and exercise any of the rights or powers hereby vested in it or perform any duty hereunder either itself (through its directors, officers, and employees) or by or through its attorneys or agents, and the Rights Agent shall not be answerable or accountable for any act, default, neglect or misconduct of any such attorneys or agents or for any loss to the Company, any holders of Rights or any other Person resulting from any such act, default, neglect or misconduct, absent gross negligence, bad faith or willful misconduct (each as determined by a final, non-appealable judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction) on the part of the Rights Agent, including in the selection and continued employment of such attorneys or agents.
 
(j)
                       
No provision of this Agreement shall require the Rights Agent to expend or risk its own funds or otherwise incur any financial liability in the performance of any of its duties hereunder (other than internal costs incurred by the Rights Agent in providing
services to the Company in the ordinary course of its business as Rights Agent) or in the exercise of its rights if it believes that repayment of such funds or adequate indemnification against such risk or liability is not reasonably assured to it.
(k)
                    
If, with respect to any Rights Certificate surrendered to the Rights Agent for exercise or transfer, the certificate attached to the form of assignment or form of election to purchase, as the case may be, has either not been completed or indicates an affirmative response to clause 1 and/or 2 thereof, the Rights Agent shall not take any further action with respect to such requested exercise or transfer without first consulting with the Company.
 
(l)
                        
If, with respect to any Rights Certificate surrendered to the Rights Agent for exercise or transfer, the certificate contained in the form of assignment or the form of election to purchase set forth on the reverse thereof, as the case may be, has not been properly completed to certify the holder is not an Acquiring Person (or an Affiliate or Associate thereof), the Rights Agent shall not take any further action with respect to such requested exercise or transfer without first consulting with and at direction from the Company.
 
(m)
                
The Rights Agent shall not be required to take notice or be deemed to have notice or knowledge of any fact, event or determination (including, without limitation, any dates or events defined in this Agreement or the designation of any Person as an Acquiring Person, Affiliate or Associate) under this Agreement unless and until the Rights Agent shall be specifically notified in writing by the Company of such fact, event or determination, including but not limited to Sections 3(a), 6(a), 11(i), 11(l), 21, 23(b), 24(b), or 25.
 
Section 21.
                       
Change of Rights Agent
.  The Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent may resign and be discharged from its duties under this Agreement upon thirty (30) days' notice in writing mailed to the Company, and to each transfer agent of the Common Stock and Preferred Stock, by registered or certified mail, and, if such resignation occurs after the Distribution Date, to the registered holders of the Rights Certificates by first-class mail.  The Company may remove the Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent upon thirty (30) days' notice in writing, mailed to the Rights Agent or successor Rights Agent, as the case may be, and to each transfer agent of the Common Stock and Preferred Stock, by registered or certified mail, and, if such removal occurs after the Distribution Date, to the holders of the Rights Certificates by first-class mail.  If the Rights Agent shall resign or be removed or shall otherwise become incapable of acting, the Company shall appoint a successor to the Rights Agent.  If the Company shall fail to make such appointment within a period of thirty (30) days after giving notice of such removal or after it has been notified in writing of such resignation or incapacity by the resigning or incapacitated Rights Agent or by the holder of a Rights Certificate (who shall, with such notice, submit his Rights Certificate for inspection by the Company), then any registered holder of any Rights Certificate may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a new Rights Agent.  Any successor Rights Agent, whether appointed by the Company or by such a court, shall be (a) a legal business entity organized and doing business under the laws of the United States or any state thereof, in good standing, having an office in the State of New York, that is authorized under such laws to exercise corporate trust or stock transfer or stockholders services powers or (b) an affiliate of a legal business entity described in clause (a) of this sentence.  After appointment, the successor Rights Agent shall be vested with the same
powers, rights, duties and responsibilities as if it had been originally named as Rights Agent without further act or deed; but the predecessor Rights Agent shall deliver and transfer to the successor Rights Agent any property at the time held by it hereunder, and execute and deliver any further assurance, conveyance, act or deed necessary for the purpose.  Not later than the effective date of any such appointment, the Company shall file notice thereof in writing with the predecessor Rights Agent and each transfer agent of the Common Stock and the Preferred Stock, and, if such appointment occurs after the Distribution Date, mail a notice thereof in writing to the registered holders of the Rights Certificates.  Failure to give any notice provided for in this Section 21, however, or any defect therein, shall not affect the legality or validity of the resignation or removal of the Rights Agent or the appointment of the successor Rights Agent, as the case may be.
Section 22.
                       
Issuance of New Rights Certificates
.  Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this Agreement or of the Rights to the contrary, the Company may, at its option, issue new Rights Certificates evidencing Rights in such form as may be approved by the Board to reflect any adjustment or change in the Purchase Price and the number or kind or class of shares or other securities or property purchasable under the Rights Certificates made in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement.  In addition, in connection with the issuance or sale of shares of Common Stock following the Distribution Date and prior to the redemption or expiration of the Rights, the Company (a) shall, with respect to shares of Common Stock so issued or sold pursuant to the exercise of stock options or under any employee plan or arrangement, granted or awarded as of the Distribution Date, or upon the exercise, conversion or exchange of securities hereinafter issued by the Company (except as may otherwise be provided in the instrument(s) governing such securities), and (b) may, in any other case, if deemed necessary or appropriate by the Board of Directors, issue Rights Certificates representing the appropriate number of Rights in connection with such issuance or sale; , , that (i) no such Rights Certificate shall be issued if, and to the extent that, the Company shall be advised by counsel that such issuance would create a significant risk of material adverse tax consequences to the Company or the Person to whom such Rights Certificate would be issued, and (ii) no such Rights Certificate shall be issued if, and to the extent that, appropriate adjustment shall otherwise have been made in lieu of the issuance thereof.
provided
however
 
Section 23.
                       
Redemption and Termination
.
 
(a)
                    
The Board may, at its option, at any time prior to the earlier of (i) the Close of Business on the tenth Business Day following the Stock Acquisition Date (or, if the Stock Acquisition Date shall have occurred prior to the Record Date, the Close of Business on the tenth Business Day following the Record Date), or (ii) the Final Expiration Date, redeem all but not less than all of the then outstanding Rights at a redemption price of $0.001 per Right, as such amount may be appropriately adjusted to reflect any stock split, stock dividend or similar transaction occurring after the date hereof (such redemption price being hereinafter referred to as the "Redemption Price").  Notwithstanding anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary, the Rights shall not be exercisable after the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event until such time as the Company's right of redemption hereunder has expired.  The Company may, at its option, pay the Redemption Price in cash, shares of Common Stock (based on the Current Market Price, as defined in Section 11(d)(i) hereof, of the Common Stock at the time of redemption) or any other form of consideration deemed appropriate by the Board.  The
redemption of the Rights by action of the Board may be made effective at such time, on such basis and with such conditions as the Board in its sole discretion may establish.
 
(b)
                    
Immediately upon the action of the Board ordering the redemption of the Rights (or, if the resolution of the Board electing to redeem the Rights states that the redemption will not be effective until the occurrence of a specified future time or event, upon the occurrence of such future time or event), evidence of which shall have been filed with the Rights Agent and without any further action and without any notice, the right to exercise the Rights will terminate and the only right thereafter of the holders of Rights shall be to receive the Redemption Price for each Right so held.  Promptly after the action of the Board ordering the redemption of the Rights, the Company shall give notice of such redemption to the Rights Agent and the holders of the then outstanding Rights by mailing such notice to all such holders at each holder's last address as it appears upon the registry books of the Rights Agent or, prior to the Distribution Date, on the registry books of the transfer agent for the Common Stock; , , that the failure to give, or any defect in, any such notice shall not affect the validity of such redemption.  Any notice that is mailed in the manner herein provided shall be deemed given, whether or not the holder receives the notice.  Each such notice of redemption will state the method by which the payment of the Redemption Price will be made.
provided
however
 
(c)
                     
Neither the Company nor any of its Affiliates or Associates may redeem, acquire or purchase for value any Rights at any time in any manner other than that specifically set forth in this Section 23 and other than in connection with the purchase or repurchase by any of them of Common Stock prior to the Distribution Date.
 
Section 24.
                         
Exchange
.
 
(a)
                     
The Board may, at its option, at any time after any Person becomes an Acquiring Person, exchange all or part of the then outstanding and exercisable Rights (which shall not include Rights that have become void pursuant to the provisions of Section 7(e) hereof) for Common Stock at an exchange ratio of one share of Common Stock per Right, appropriately adjusted to reflect any stock split, stock dividend or similar transaction occurring after the date hereof (such exchange ratio being hereinafter referred to as the "Exchange Ratio").  Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Board shall not be empowered to effect such exchange at any time after (i) any Person (other than any Exempt Person), together with all Affiliates and Associates of such Person, becomes the Beneficial Owner of 50% or more of the Common Stock then outstanding or (ii) the occurrence of an event specified in Section 13(a) hereof.
 
(b)
                    
Immediately upon the action of the Board ordering the exchange of any Rights pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section 24 and without any further action and without any notice, the right to exercise such Rights shall terminate and the only right thereafter of a holder of such Rights shall be to receive that number of shares of Common Stock equal to the number of such Rights held by such holder multiplied by the Exchange Ratio.  The Company shall promptly give public notice of any such exchange; , , that the failure to give, or any defect in, such notice shall not affect the validity of such exchange.  The Company promptly shall mail a notice of any such exchange to all of the holders of such Rights at their last addresses as they appear upon the registry books of the Rights Agent.  Any notice that is mailed in the manner herein provided shall be deemed given, whether or not the holder receives the
provided
however
 
notice.  Each such notice of exchange will state the method by which the exchange of the Common Stock for Rights will be effected and, in the event of any partial exchange, the number of Rights that will be exchanged.  Any partial exchange shall be effected pro rata based on the number of Rights (other than Rights that have become void pursuant to the provisions of Section 7(e) hereof) held by each holder of Rights.
(c)
                     
Following the action of the Board of Directors ordering the exchange of any Rights pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section 24, the Company may implement such procedures in its sole discretion as it deems appropriate for the purpose of ensuring that the Common Stock (or such other consideration) issuable upon an exchange pursuant to this Section 24 not be received by holders of Rights that have become void pursuant to Section 7(e) hereof.  In furtherance thereof, if so directed by the Company, shares of Common Stock (or other consideration) potentially issuable to holders of Rights upon an exchange pursuant to this Section 24, who have not verified to the satisfaction of the Company, in its sole discretion, that they are not Acquiring Persons, may be deposited in a trust established by the Company pending receipt of appropriate verification.
 
(d)
                    
In any exchange pursuant to this Section 24, the Company, at its option, may substitute Preferred Stock (or Equivalent Preferred Stock, as such term is defined in paragraph (b) of Section 11 hereof) for Common Stock exchangeable for Rights, at the initial rate of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock (or Equivalent Preferred Stock) for each share of Common Stock, as appropriately adjusted to reflect stock splits, stock dividends and other similar transactions after the date hereof.
 
(e)
                     
In the event that there shall not be sufficient shares of Common Stock issued but not outstanding or authorized but unissued to permit any exchange of Rights as contemplated in accordance with this Section 24, the Company shall take all such action as may be necessary to authorize additional shares of Common Stock for issuance upon exchange of the Rights.
 
(f)
                       
The Company shall not be required to issue fractions of shares of Common Stock or to distribute certificates that evidence fractional shares of Common Stock.  In lieu of such fractional shares of Common Stock, there shall be paid to the registered holders of the Rights Certificates with regard to which such fractional shares of Common Stock would otherwise be issuable, an amount in cash equal to the same fraction of the current market value of a whole share of Common Stock.  For the purposes of this subsection (f), the current market value of a whole share of Common Stock shall be the closing price of a share of Common Stock (as determined pursuant to the second sentence of Section 11(d)(i) hereof) for the Trading Day immediately prior to the date of exchange pursuant to this Section 24.
 
Section 25.
                         
Notice of Certain Events
.
 
(a)
                     
In case the Company shall propose, at any time after the Distribution Date, (i) to pay any dividend payable in stock of any class to the holders of Preferred Stock or to make any other distribution to the holders of Preferred Stock (other than a regular quarterly cash dividend out of earnings or retained earnings of the Company), or (ii) to offer to the holders of Preferred Stock rights or warrants to subscribe for or to purchase any additional shares of
 
Preferred Stock or shares of stock of any class or any other securities, rights or options, or (iii) to effect any reclassification of its Preferred Stock (other than a reclassification involving only the subdivision of outstanding shares of Preferred Stock), or (iv) to effect any consolidation or merger into or with any other Person (other than a Subsidiary of the Company in a transaction which complies with Section 11(o) hereof), or to effect any sale or other transfer (or to permit one or more of its Subsidiaries to effect any sale or other transfer), in one transaction or a series of related transactions, of more than 50% of the assets, cash flow or earning power of the Company and its Subsidiaries (taken as a whole) to any other Person or Persons (other than the Company and/or any of its Subsidiaries in one or more transactions each of that complies with Section 11(o) hereof), or (v) to effect the liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Company, then, in each such case, the Company shall give to each holder of a Rights Certificate, to the extent feasible and in accordance with Section 26 hereof, a notice of such proposed action that shall specify the record date for the purposes of such stock dividend, distribution of rights or warrants, or the date on which such reclassification, consolidation, merger, sale, transfer, liquidation, dissolution, or winding up is to take place and the date of participation therein by the holders of the shares of Preferred Stock, if any such date is to be fixed, and such notice shall be so given in the case of any action covered by clause (i) or (ii) above at least 20 days prior to the record date for determining holders of the shares of Preferred Stock for purposes of such action, and in the case of any such other action, at least 20 days prior to the date of the taking of such proposed action or the date of participation therein by the holders of the shares of Preferred Stock, whichever shall be the earlier.
(b)
                    
In the event that any Section 11(a)(ii) Event shall occur, (i) the Company shall as soon as practicable thereafter give to each holder of a Rights Certificate, to the extent feasible and in accordance with Section 26 hereof, a notice of the occurrence of such event, which shall specify the event and the consequences of the event to holders of Rights under Section 11(a)(ii) hereof, and (ii) all references in the preceding paragraph to Preferred Stock shall be deemed thereafter to refer to Common Stock and/or, if appropriate, other securities.
 
Section 26.
                         
Notices
.  Notices or demands authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Rights Agent or by the holder of any Rights Certificate to or on the Company shall be sufficiently given or made in writing and if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Rights Agent by the Company) as follows:
 
A & B II, Inc. Attention:  Secretary 822 Bishop Street Honolulu, HI 96813
 
Subject to the provisions of Section 21, any notice or demand authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Company or by the holder of any Rights Certificate to or on the Rights Agent shall be sufficiently given or made if in writing and sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing by the Rights Agent with the Company) as follows:
Computershare Shareowner Services LLC PO Box 358015 Pittsburgh, PA 15252-8015
 
with a copy to:
 
Computershare Shareowner Services LLC 480 Washington Boulevard Jersey City, NJ 07310 Attention:  Legal Department
 
Notices or demands authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Company or the Rights Agent to the holder of any Rights Certificate (or, if prior to the Distribution Date, to the holder of shares of Common Stock) shall be sufficiently given or made if in writing and sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed to such holder at the address of such holder as shown on the registry books of the Company.
 
Section 27.
                         
Supplements and Amendments
.
 
(a)
                     
Prior to the Distribution Date, the Company and the Rights Agent shall, if the Company so directs, supplement or amend any provision of this Agreement without the approval of any holders of shares of Common Stock.  From and after the Distribution Date, and subject to the provisions of Section 27(b) hereof, the Company and the Rights Agent shall, if the Company so directs, supplement or amend this Agreement without the approval of any holders of Rights Certificates in order (i) to cure any ambiguity, (ii) to correct or supplement any provision contained herein that may be defective or inconsistent with any other provisions herein, (iii) to shorten or lengthen any time period hereunder or (iv) to change or supplement the provisions hereunder in any manner that the Company may deem necessary or desirable and that shall not adversely affect the interests of the holders of Rights Certificates (other than an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of an Acquiring Person).  Upon the delivery of a certificate from an appropriate officer of the Company that states that the proposed supplement or amendment is in compliance with the terms of this Section 27, the Rights Agent shall execute such supplement or amendment.  Notwithstanding anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary, the Rights Agent may, but shall not be obligated to enter into any supplement or amendment that affects the Rights Agent's own rights, duties, obligations or immunities under this Agreement.
 
(b)
                    
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, no supplement or amendment shall be made to this Agreement at a time when the Rights are not redeemable, except as contemplated by clause (i) or (ii) of Section 27(a) hereof.
 
Section 28.
                         
Successors
.  All the covenants and provisions of this Agreement by or for the benefit of the Company or the Rights Agent shall bind and inure to the benefit of their respective successors and assigns hereunder.
Section 29.
                         
Determinations and Actions by the Board of Directors, etc
.  For all purposes of this Agreement, any calculation of the number of shares of Common Stock or any other class of capital stock outstanding at any particular time, including for purposes of determining the particular percentage of such outstanding shares of Common Stock of which any Person is the Beneficial Owner, shall be made in accordance with the last sentence of Rule 13d-3(d)(1)(i) of the General Rules and Regulations under the Exchange Act.  The Board shall have the exclusive power and authority to administer this Agreement and to exercise all rights and powers specifically granted to the Board or to the Company, or as may be necessary or advisable in the administration of this Agreement, including, without limitation, the right and power to (i) interpret the provisions of this Agreement, and (ii) make all determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of this Agreement (including a determination to redeem or not redeem the Rights or to amend the Agreement).  All such actions, calculations, interpretations and determinations (including, for purposes of clause (y) below, all omissions with respect to the foregoing) that are done or made by the Board in good faith, shall (x) be final, conclusive and binding on the Company, the Rights Agent, the holders of the Rights and all other parties, and (y) not subject the Board or any of the directors on the Board to any liability to the holders of the Rights.  The Rights Agent is entitled always to assume that the Company's Board of Directors acted in good faith and shall be fully protected and incur no liability in reliance thereon.
Section 30.
                         
Benefits of this Agreement
.  Nothing in this Agreement shall be construed to give to any Person other than the Company, the Rights Agent and the registered holders of the Rights Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, registered holders of the Common Stock) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under this Agreement; but this Agreement shall be for the sole and exclusive benefit of the Company, the Rights Agent and the registered holders of the Rights Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, registered holders of the Common Stock).
 
Section 31.
                         
Severability
.  If any term, provision, covenant or restriction of this Agreement is held by a court of competent jurisdiction or other authority to be invalid, void or unenforceable, the remainder of the terms, provisions, covenants and restrictions of this Agreement shall remain in full force and effect and shall in no way be affected, impaired or invalidated, provided, that if any such invalid, void or unenforceable term, provision, covenant or restriction shall adversely affect the rights, immunities, duties or obligations of the Rights Agent, the Rights Agent shall be entitled to resign immediately; , , that notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, if any such term, provision, covenant or restriction is held by such court or authority to be invalid, void or unenforceable and the Board determines in its good faith judgment that severing the invalid language from this Agreement would adversely affect the purpose or effect of this Agreement, the right of redemption set forth in Section 23 hereof shall be reinstated and shall not expire until the Close of Business on the tenth Business Day following the date of such determination by the Board.
provided
however
 
Section 32.
                         
Governing Law
.  This Agreement, each Right and each Rights Certificate issued hereunder shall be deemed to be a contract made under the laws of the State of Hawaii and for all purposes shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of such State applicable to contracts made and to be performed entirely within such State; , , that all provisions regarding the rights, duties and obligations of the Rights Agent shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the state of New York applicable to contracts made and to be performed entirely within such state, without regard to the principles or rules concerning conflicts of laws which might otherwise require application of the substantive laws of another jurisdiction.
provided
however
Section 33.
                         
Counterparts
.  This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts and each of such counterparts shall for all purposes be deemed to be an original, and all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
 
Section 34.
                         
Descriptive Headings
.  Descriptive headings of the several sections of this Agreement are inserted for convenience only and shall not control or affect the meaning or construction of any of the provisions hereof.
 
Section 35.
                         
Force Majeure
.  Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, the Rights Agent shall not be liable for any delays or failures in performance resulting from acts beyond its reasonable control including, without limitation, acts of God, terrorist acts, shortage of supply, breakdowns or malfunctions, interruptions or malfunctions of computer facilities, or loss of data due to power failures or mechanical difficulties with information storage or retrieval systems, labor difficulties, war, or civil unrest.
 
Section 36.
                         
Patriot Act
.  The Company acknowledges that the Rights Agent is subject to the customer identification program ("Customer Identification Program") requirements under the USA PATRIOT Act and its implementing regulations, and that the Rights Agent must obtain, verify and record information that allows the Rights Agent to identify the Company. Accordingly, prior to accepting an appointment hereunder, the Rights Agent may request information from the Company that will help the Rights Agent to identify the Company, including without limitation the Company's physical address, tax identification number, organizational documents, certificate of good standing, license to do business, or any other information that the Company deems necessary. The Company agrees that the Rights Agent appointment hereunder cannot be effective unless and until the Rights Agent verifies the Company's identity in accordance with the Customer Identification Program requirements.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed, all as of the day and year first above written.
 
Exhibit A
 
WHEREAS, A & B II, Inc. (the "Corporation") has an authorized capital stock of one hundred fifty million (150,000,000) shares of common stock, without par value ("Common Stock"), and fifteen million (15,000,000) shares of preferred stock, without par value ("Preferred Stock");
 
WHEREAS, the Corporation acting through its Board of Directors has power under the Hawaii Business Corporation Act ("HBCA") and the Corporation's Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation (the "Articles of Incorporation"), to issue its authorized Preferred Stock in one or more series having such terms, preferences, voting powers, restrictions and qualifications as shall be fixed in the resolutions authorizing each such series; and
 
WHEREAS, it is deemed advisable that the Corporation authorize a series of Preferred Stock, without par value, designated as the Corporation's Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock and having the preferences, voting powers, restrictions and qualifications thereof hereinafter set forth.
 
NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that pursuant to the authority granted to and vested in the Board of Directors of the Corporation in accordance with the provisions of the Articles of Incorporation and the HBCA, a series of Preferred Stock of the Corporation be and it hereby is created, and that the designation and amount thereof and the voting powers, preferences and relative, participating, optional and other special rights of the shares of such series, and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions thereof are as follows:
 
Section 1.
                                           
Designation and Amount
.  The shares of such series shall be designated as "Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock" and the number of shares constituting such series shall be 150,000.  Such number of shares may be increased or decreased by resolution of the Board; provided, that no decrease shall reduce the number of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock to a number less than the number of shares then outstanding plus the number of shares reserved for issuance upon the exercise of outstanding options, rights or warrants or upon the exercise of any options, rights or warrants issuable upon conversion of any outstanding securities issued by the Corporation convertible into Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock.
 
Section 2.
                                           
Dividends and Distributions
.
 
(A)
                             
Subject to the prior and superior rights of the holders of any shares of any series of Preferred Stock ranking prior and superior to the shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock with respect to dividends, the holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, in preference to the holders of the Common Stock, and of any other junior stock, shall be entitled to receive, when, as and if declared by the Board out of funds legally available for the purpose, quarterly dividends payable in cash on the fifteenth day of January, April, July and October in each year (each such date being referred to herein as a "Quarterly Dividend Payment Date"), commencing on the first Quarterly Dividend Payment Date after the first issuance of a share or fraction of a share of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, in an amount per share (rounded to the nearest cent) equal to the greater of (a) $10.00 or (b) subject to the provision for adjustment hereinafter set forth, 1,000 times the aggregate per share amount of all cash dividends, and 1,000 times the aggregate per share amount (payable in kind) of all non-cash dividends or other distributions other than a dividend payable in shares of Common Stock or a subdivision of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (by reclassification or otherwise), declared on the Common Stock since the immediately preceding Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, or, with respect to the first Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, since the first issuance of any share or fraction of a share of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock.  In the event the Corporation shall at any time after June 8, 2012 (the "Rights Dividend Declaration Date") (i) declare or pay any dividend on Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding Common Stock, or (iii) combine or consolidate the outstanding Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, then in each such case the amount to which holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock were entitled immediately prior to such event under clause (b) of the preceding sentence shall be adjusted by multiplying such amount by a fraction the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event.
 
(B)
                               
The Corporation shall declare a dividend or distribution on the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock as provided in Paragraph (A) above immediately after it declares a dividend or distribution on the Common Stock (other than a dividend payable in shares of Common Stock); provided that, in the event no dividend or distribution shall have been declared on the Common Stock during the period between any Quarterly Dividend Payment Date and the next subsequent Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, a dividend of $10.00 per share on the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall nevertheless be payable on such subsequent Quarterly Dividend Payment Date.
 
(C)
                               
Dividends shall begin to accrue and be cumulative on outstanding shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock from the Quarterly Dividend Payment Date next preceding the date of issue of such shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, unless the date of issue of such shares is prior to the record date for the first Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, in which case dividends on such shares shall begin to accrue from the date of issue of such shares, or unless the date of issue is a Quarterly Dividend Payment Date or is a date after the record date for the determination of holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock entitled to receive a quarterly dividend and before such Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, in either of which events such dividends shall begin to accrue and be cumulative
 
from such Quarterly Dividend Payment Date.  Accrued but unpaid dividends shall not bear interest.  Dividends paid on the shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock in an amount less than the total amount of such dividends at the time accrued and payable on such shares shall be allocated pro rata on a share-by-share basis among all such shares at the time outstanding.  The Board may fix a record date for the determination of holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock entitled to receive payment of a dividend or distribution declared thereon, which record date shall be no more than 30 days prior to the date fixed for the payment thereof.
Section 3.
                                           
Voting Rights
.  The holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall have the following voting rights:
 
(A)
                             
Subject to the provision for adjustment hereinafter set forth, each share of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall entitle the holder thereof to 1,000 votes on all matters submitted to a vote of the stockholders of the Corporation.  In the event the Corporation shall at any time after the Rights Dividend Declaration Date (i) declare or pay any dividend on Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding Common Stock, or (iii) combine or consolidate the outstanding Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, then in each such case the number of votes per share to which holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock were entitled immediately prior to such event shall be adjusted by multiplying such number by a fraction the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event.
 
(B)
                               
Except as otherwise provided herein or by law, the holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock and the holders of shares of Common Stock shall vote together as one class on all matters submitted to a vote of stockholders of the Corporation.
 
(C)
 
(i)
                                    
If at any time dividends on any Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall be in arrears in an amount equal to six quarterly dividends thereon, the occurrence of such contingency shall mark the beginning of a period (herein called a "default period") that shall extend until such time when all accrued and unpaid dividends for all previous quarterly dividend periods and for the current quarterly dividend period on all shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock then outstanding shall have been declared and paid or set apart for payment.  During each default period, all holders of Preferred Stock (including holders of the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock) with dividends in arrears in an amount equal to six quarterly dividends thereon, voting as a class, irrespective of series, shall have the right to elect two directors.
 
(ii)
                                 
During any default period, such voting right of the holders of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock may be exercised initially at a special meeting called pursuant to subparagraph (iii) of this Section 3(C) or at any annual meeting of stockholders, and thereafter at annual meetings of stockholders, provided that neither such voting right nor the right of the holders of any other series of Preferred Stock,
 
if any, to increase, in certain cases, the authorized number of directors shall not be exercised unless the holders of ten percent (10%) in number of shares of Preferred Stock outstanding shall be present in person or by proxy.  The absence of a quorum of the holders of Common Stock shall not affect the exercise by the holders of Preferred Stock of such voting right.  At any meeting at which the holders of Preferred Stock shall exercise such voting right initially during an existing default period, they shall have the right, voting as a class, to elect directors to fill such vacancies, if any, in the Board as may then exist up to two directors or, if such right is exercised at an annual meeting, to elect two directors.  If the number that may be so elected at any special meeting does not amount to the required number, the holders of the Preferred Stock shall have the right to make such increase in the number of directors as shall be necessary to permit the election by them of the required number.  After the holders of the Preferred Stock shall have exercised their right to elect directors in any default period and during the continuance of such period, the number of directors shall not be increased or decreased except by vote of the holders of Preferred Stock as herein provided or pursuant to the rights of any equity securities ranking senior to or with the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock.
pari
passu
(iii)
                              
Unless the holders of Preferred Stock shall, during an existing default period, have previously exercised their right to elect directors, the Board may order, or any stockholder or stockholders owning in the aggregate not less than ten percent (10%) of the total number of shares of Preferred Stock outstanding, irrespective of series, may request, the calling of a special meeting of the holders of Preferred Stock, which meeting shall thereupon be called by the President, a Vice-President or the Secretary of the Corporation.  Notice of such meeting and of any annual meeting at which holders of Preferred Stock are entitled to vote pursuant to this Paragraph (C)(iii) shall be given to each holder of record of Preferred Stock by mailing a copy of such notice to him at his last address as the same appears on the books of the Corporation.  Such meeting shall be called for a time not earlier than 20 days and not later than 60 days after such order or request or in default of the calling of such meeting within 60 days after such order or request, such meeting may be called on similar notice by any stockholder or stockholders owning in the aggregate not less than ten percent (10%) of the total number of shares of Preferred Stock outstanding.  Notwithstanding the provisions of this Paragraph (C)(iii), no such special meeting shall be called during the period within 60 days immediately preceding the date fixed for the next annual meeting of the stockholders.
 
(iv)
                             
In any default period, the holders of Common Stock, and other classes of stock of the Corporation if applicable, shall continue to be entitled to elect the whole number of directors until the holders of Preferred Stock shall have exercised their right to elect two directors voting as a class, after the exercise of which right (x) the directors so elected by the holders of Preferred Stock shall not be a member of Class I, Class II or Class III of the Board but shall continue in office until their successors shall have been elected by such holders or until the expiration of the default period, and (y) any vacancy in the Board may (except as provided in Paragraph (C)(ii) of this Section 3) be filled by vote of a majority of the remaining directors theretofore elected by the holders of the class of stock that elected the director whose office shall have become
 
vacant.  References in this Paragraph (C) to directors elected by the holders of a particular class of stock shall include directors elected by such directors to fill vacancies as provided in clause (y) of the foregoing sentence.
(v)
                                
Immediately upon the expiration of a default period, (x) the right of the holders of Preferred Stock as a class to elect directors shall cease, (y) the term of any directors elected by the holders of Preferred Stock as a class shall terminate, and (z) the number of directors shall be such number as may be provided for in the Articles of Incorporation or bylaws of the Corporation (as may be amended from time to time, the "Bylaws") irrespective of any increase made pursuant to the provisions of Paragraph (C)(ii) of this Section 3 (such number being subject, however, to change thereafter in any manner provided by law or in the Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws).  Any vacancies in the Board effected by the provisions of clauses (y) and (z) in the preceding sentence may be filled by a majority of the remaining directors.
 
(D)
                              
Except as set forth herein, holders of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall have no special voting rights and their consent shall not be required (except to the extent they are entitled to vote with holders of Common Stock as set forth herein) for taking any corporate action.
 
Section 4.
                                           
Certain Restrictions
.
 
(A)
                             
Whenever quarterly dividends or other dividends or distributions payable on the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock as provided in Section 2 are in arrears, thereafter and until all accrued and unpaid dividends and distributions, whether or not declared, on shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock outstanding shall have been paid in full, the Corporation shall not:
 
(i)
                                    
declare or pay dividends on, make any other distributions on, or redeem or purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration any shares of stock ranking junior (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) to the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock;
 
(ii)
                                 
declare or pay dividends on or make any other distributions on any shares of stock ranking on a parity (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) with the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, except dividends paid ratably on the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock and all such parity stock on which dividends are payable or in arrears in proportion to the total amounts to which the holders of all such shares are then entitled;
 
(iii)
                              
redeem or purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration shares of any stock ranking on a parity (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) with the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, provided that the Corporation may at any time redeem, purchase or otherwise acquire shares of any such parity stock in exchange for shares of any stock of the Corporation ranking junior (either as to dividends or upon dissolution, liquidation or winding up) to the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock; or
(iv)
                             
purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration any shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, or any shares of stock ranking on a parity with the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, except in accordance with a purchase offer made in writing or by publication (as determined by the Board) to all holders of such shares upon such terms as the Board, after consideration of the respective annual dividend rates and other relative rights and preferences of the respective series and classes, shall determine in good faith will result in fair and equitable treatment among the respective series or classes.
 
(B)
                               
The Corporation shall not permit any subsidiary of the Corporation to purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration any shares of stock of the Corporation unless the Corporation could, under Paragraph (A) of this Section 4, purchase or otherwise acquire such shares at such time and in such manner.
 
Section 5.
                                           
Reacquired Shares
.  Any shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock purchased or otherwise acquired by the Corporation in any manner whatsoever shall be retired and cancelled promptly after the acquisition thereof.  All such shares shall upon their cancellation become authorized but unissued shares of Preferred Stock and may be reissued as part of a new series of Preferred Stock to be created by resolution or resolutions of the Board, subject to the conditions and restrictions on issuance set forth herein.
 
Section 6.
                                           
Liquidation, Dissolution or Winding Up
.
 
(A)
                             
Upon any liquidation (voluntary or otherwise), dissolution or winding up of the Corporation, no distribution shall be made to the holders of shares of stock ranking junior (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) to the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock unless, prior thereto, the holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall have received an amount equal to $1,000 per share of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, plus an amount equal to accrued and unpaid dividends and distributions thereon, whether or not declared, to the date of such payment (the "Series A Liquidation Preference").  Following the payment of the full amount of the Series A Liquidation Preference, no additional distributions shall be made to the holders of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock unless, prior thereto, the holders of shares of Common Stock shall have received an amount per share (the "Common Adjustment") equal to the quotient obtained by dividing (i) the Series A Liquidation Preference by (ii) 1,000 (as appropriately adjusted as set forth in subparagraph (C) below to reflect such events as stock splits, stock dividends and recapitalizations with respect to the Common Stock) (such number in clause (ii), the "Adjustment Number").  Following the payment of the full amount of the Series A Liquidation Preference and the Common Adjustment in respect of all outstanding shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock and Common Stock, respectively, holders of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock and holders of shares of Common Stock shall receive their ratable and proportionate share of the remaining assets to be distributed in the ratio of the Adjustment Number to 1 with respect to such Preferred Stock and Common Stock, on a per share basis, respectively.
(B)
                               
In the event, however, that there are not sufficient assets available to permit payment in full of the Series A Liquidation Preference and the liquidation preferences of all other series of preferred stock, if any, that rank on a parity with the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, then such remaining assets shall be distributed ratably to the holders of such parity shares in proportion to their respective liquidation preferences.  In the event, however, that there are not sufficient assets available to permit payment in full of the Common Adjustment, then such remaining assets shall be distributed ratably to the holders of Common Stock.
(C)
                               
In the event the Corporation shall at any time after the Rights Declaration Date (i) declare or pay any dividend on Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding Common Stock, or (iii) combine or consolidate the outstanding Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, then in each such case the Adjustment Number in effect immediately prior to such event shall be adjusted by multiplying such Adjustment Number by a fraction the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event.
 
Section 7.
                                           
Consolidation, Merger, etc
.  In case the Corporation shall enter into any consolidation, merger, combination or other transaction in which the shares of Common Stock are exchanged for or changed into other stock or securities, cash and/or any other property, then in any such case the shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall at the same time be similarly exchanged or changed in an amount per share (subject to the provision for adjustment hereinafter set forth) equal to 1,000 times the aggregate amount of stock, securities, cash and/or any other property (payable in kind), as the case may be, into which or for which each share of Common Stock is changed or exchanged.  In the event the Corporation shall at any time after the Rights Dividend Declaration Date (i) declare or pay any dividend on Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding Common Stock, or (iii) combine or consolidate the outstanding Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, then in each such case the amount set forth in the preceding sentence with respect to the exchange or change of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall be adjusted by multiplying such amount by a fraction the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event.
 
Section 8.
                                           
No Redemption
.  The shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall not be redeemable.
 
Section 9.
                                           
Ranking
.  The Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock shall rank junior to all other series of the Corporation's Preferred Stock as to the payment of dividends and the distribution of assets, unless the terms of any such series shall provide otherwise.
 
Section 10.
                                     
Amendment
.  At any time when any shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock are outstanding, the Articles of Incorporation shall not be amended in any manner that would materially alter or change the powers, preferences or special rights of the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock so as to affect them adversely without the affirmative vote of the holders of at least 66-2/3% of the outstanding shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, voting separately as a class.
Section 11.
                                     
Fractional Shares
.  Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock may be issued in fractions of a share that shall entitle the holder, in proportion to such holder's fractional shares, to exercise voting rights, receive dividends, participate in distributions and to have the benefit of all other rights of holders of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock.
 
FURTHER RESOLVED, that any officer of the Corporation be, and hereby is, authorized and directed to execute and file with the Department of Commerce and Consumer Affairs of the State of Hawaii a "Statement of Issuance of Shares of Preferred or Special Classes in Series," to which these resolutions shall be annexed.
Exhibit B
 
 
NOT EXERCISABLE AFTER JUNE 8, 2013 OR SUCH EARLIER DATE AS THE RIGHTS ARE REDEEMED, EXCHANGED OR TERMINATED.  THE RIGHTS ARE SUBJECT TO REDEMPTION AT THE OPTION OF THE COMPANY, AT $0.001 PER RIGHT, AND TO EXCHANGE ON THE TERMS SET FORTH IN THE RIGHTS AGREEMENT.  UNDER CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES, RIGHTS BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY AN ACQUIRING PERSON (AS SUCH TERM IS DEFINED IN THE RIGHTS AGREEMENT) AND ANY SUBSEQUENT HOLDER OF SUCH RIGHTS MAY BECOME NULL AND VOID.  [THE RIGHTS REPRESENTED BY THIS RIGHTS CERTIFICATE ARE OR WERE BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY A PERSON WHO WAS OR BECAME AN ACQUIRING PERSON OR AN AFFILIATE OR ASSOCIATE OF AN ACQUIRING PERSON (AS SUCH TERMS ARE DEFINED IN THE RIGHTS AGREEMENT).  ACCORDINGLY, THIS RIGHTS CERTIFICATE AND THE RIGHTS REPRESENTED HEREBY MAY BECOME NULL AND VOID IN THE CIRCUMSTANCES SPECIFIED IN SECTION 7(e) OF THE RIGHTS AGREEMENT.]
*
 
This certifies that                 , or registered assigns, is the registered owner of the number of Rights set forth above, each of which entitles the owner thereof, subject to the terms, provisions and conditions of the Rights Agreement, dated as of June 8, 2012 (the "Rights Agreement"), between A & B II, Inc., a Hawaii corporation (the "Company"), and Computershare Shareowner Services LLC, a New Jersey limited liability company (the "Rights Agent"), to purchase from the Company at any time prior to 5:00 P.M., New York City time on June 8, 2013 unless the Rights are earlier redeemed, exchanged or terminated, at the office or offices of the Rights Agent designated for such purpose, or its successors as Rights Agent, one one-thousandth of a fully paid, non-assessable share of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock (the "Preferred Stock") of the Company, at a purchase price of $125 per one one-thousandth of a share (the "Purchase Price"), upon presentation and surrender of this Rights Certificate with the Form of Election to Purchase and related Certificate properly completed and duly executed.  The number of Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate (and the number of shares that may be purchased upon exercise thereof) set forth above, and the Purchase Price per share set forth above, are the number and Purchase Price as of June 8, 2012 based on the Preferred Stock as constituted at such date.  The Company reserves the right to require prior to the occurrence of a Triggering Event (as such term is defined in the Rights Agreement) that a number of Rights be exercised so that only whole shares of Preferred Stock will be issued. Capitalized terms used in this Rights Certificate without definition shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Rights Agreement.
 
*
                
The portion of the legend in brackets shall be inserted only if applicable and shall replace the preceding sentence.
Upon the occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event (as such term is defined in the Rights Agreement), if the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate are beneficially owned by (i) an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Acquiring Person (as such terms are defined in the Rights Agreement), (ii) a transferee of any such Acquiring Person, Associate or Affiliate, or (iii) under certain circumstances specified in the Rights Agreement, a transferee of a person who, after such transfer, became an Acquiring Person, or an Affiliate or Associate of an Acquiring Person, such Rights shall become null and void and no holder hereof shall have any right with respect to such Rights from and after the occurrence of such Section 11(a)(ii) Event.
 
As provided in the Rights Agreement, the Purchase Price and the number and kind of shares of Preferred Stock or other securities, that may be purchased upon the exercise of the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate are subject to modification and adjustment upon the happening of certain events, including Triggering Events.
 
This Rights Certificate is subject to all of the terms, provisions and conditions of the Rights Agreement, which terms, provisions and conditions are hereby incorporated herein by reference and made a part hereof and to which Rights Agreement reference is hereby made for a full description of the rights, limitations of rights, obligations, duties and immunities hereunder of the Rights Agent, the Company and the holders of the Rights Certificates, which limitations of rights include the temporary suspension of the exercisability of such Rights under the specific circumstances set forth in the Rights Agreement.  Copies of the Rights Agreement are on file at the above-mentioned office of the Rights Agent and are also available upon written request to the Rights Agent.
 
This Rights Certificate, with or without other Rights Certificates, upon surrender at the office or offices of the Rights Agent designated for such purpose, may be exchanged for another Rights Certificate or Rights Certificates of like tenor and date evidencing Rights entitling the holder to purchase a like aggregate number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock as the Rights evidenced by the Rights Certificate or Rights Certificates surrendered shall have entitled such holder to purchase.  If this Rights Certificate shall be exercised in part, the holder shall be entitled to receive upon surrender hereof another Rights Certificate or Rights Certificates for the number of whole Rights not exercised.
 
Subject to the provisions of the Rights Agreement, the Rights evidenced by this Certificate may be redeemed by the Company at its option at a redemption price of $0.001 per Right at any time prior to the earlier of the Close of Business on (i) the tenth Business Day following the Stock Acquisition Date, and (ii) the Final Expiration Date.  In addition, under certain circumstances following the Stock Acquisition Date, the Rights may be exchanged, in whole or in part, for shares of the Common Stock, or shares of preferred stock of the Company having essentially the same value or economic rights as such shares.  Immediately upon the action of the Board of Directors of the Company authorizing any such exchange, and without any further action or any notice, the Rights (other than Rights which are not subject to such exchange) will terminate and the Rights will only enable holders to receive the shares issuable upon such exchange.
No fractional shares of Preferred Stock will be issued upon the exercise of any Right or Rights evidenced hereby (other than fractions that are integral multiples of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock, which may, at the election of the Company, be evidenced by depositary receipts), but in lieu thereof a cash payment will be made, as provided in the Rights Agreement.  The Company, at its election, may require that a number of Rights be exercised so that only whole shares of Preferred Stock would be issued.
 
No holder of this Rights Certificate shall be entitled to vote or receive dividends or be deemed for any purpose the holder of shares of Preferred Stock or of any other securities of the Company that may at any time be issuable on the exercise hereof, nor shall anything contained in the Rights Agreement or herein be construed to confer upon the holder hereof, as such, any of the rights of a stockholder of the Company or any right to vote for the election of directors or upon any matter submitted to stockholders at any meeting thereof, or to give consent to or withhold consent from any corporate action, or, to receive notice of meetings or other actions affecting stockholders (except as provided in the Rights Agreement), or to receive dividends or subscription rights, or otherwise, until the Right or Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate shall have been exercised as provided in the Rights Agreement.
 
This Rights Certificate shall not be valid or obligatory for any purpose until it shall have been countersigned by the Rights Agent.
 
WITNESS the facsimile signature of the proper officers of the Company and its corporate seal.
Dated as of                          ,      
 
 
Countersigned:
 
(To be executed by the registered holder if such holder desires to transfer the Rights Certificate.)
 
FOR VALUE RECEIVED                                                                                      hereby sells, assigns and transfers unto                                                                                                                                                                                         
 
                                                                                                                                                                                                                  
this Rights Certificate, together with all right, title and interest therein, and does hereby irrevocably constitute and appoint                                  attorney, to transfer the within Rights Certificate on the books of the within-named Company, with full power of substitution.
 
 
 
Signatures must be guaranteed by a participant in the Medallion Signature Guarantee Program at a guarantee level acceptable to the Company's Rights Agent.
 
The undersigned hereby certifies by checking the appropriate boxes that:
 
(1)
                                 
this Rights Certificate [  ] is [  ] is not being sold, assigned and transferred by or on behalf of a Person who is or was an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Acquiring Person (as such terms are defined pursuant to the Rights Agreement);
 
(2)
                                 
after due inquiry and to the best knowledge of the undersigned, it [  ] did [  ] did not acquire the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate from any Person who is, was or subsequently became an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of an Acquiring Person.
 
 
 
Signatures must be guaranteed by a participant in the Medallion Signature Guarantee Program at a guarantee level acceptable to the Company's Rights Agent.
The signature to the foregoing Assignment and Certificate must correspond to the name as written upon the face of this Rights Certificate in every particular, without alteration or enlargement or any change whatsoever.
(To be executed if holder desires to exercise Rights represented by the Rights Certificate.)
 
To:
                             
A & B II, INC.:
 
The undersigned hereby irrevocably elects to exercise                      Rights represented by this Rights Certificate to purchase the shares of Preferred Stock issuable upon the exercise of the Rights (or such other securities of the Company or of any other person that may be issuable upon the exercise of the Rights) and requests that certificates for such shares be issued in the name of and delivered to:
 
Please insert social security or other identifying number
 
 
 
 
If such number of Rights shall not be all the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate, a new Rights Certificate for the balance of such Rights shall be registered in the name of and delivered to:
 
Please insert social security or other identifying number
 
 
 
Dated:                       ,
 
 
 
Signatures must be guaranteed by a participant in the Medallion Signature Guarantee Program at a guarantee level acceptable to the Company's Rights Agent.
The undersigned hereby certifies by checking the appropriate boxes that:
 
(1)
                                 
the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate [  ] are [  ] are not being exercised by or on behalf of a Person who is or was an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Acquiring Person (as such terms are defined pursuant to the Rights Agreement);
 
(2)
                                 
after due inquiry and to the best knowledge of the undersigned, it [  ] did [  ] did not acquire the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate from any Person who is, was or became an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of an Acquiring Person.
 
 
 
Signatures must be guaranteed by a participant in the Medallion Signature Guarantee Program at a guarantee level acceptable to the Company's Rights Agent.
 
The signature to the foregoing Election to Purchase and Certificate must correspond to the name as written upon the face of this Rights Certificate in every particular, without alteration or enlargement or any change whatsoever.
Exhibit C
 
On June 8, 2012 the Board of Directors (the "Board") of A & B II, Inc. (the "Company") declared a dividend distribution of one right (a "Right") for each outstanding share of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Company (the "Common Stock"), to stockholders of record at the close of business on June 8, 2012 (the "Record Date").  Each Right entitles the registered holder to purchase from the Company a unit consisting of one one-thousandth of a share (a "Unit") of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, without par value (the "Preferred Stock"), at a purchase price of $125 per Unit, subject to adjustment (the "Purchase Price").  The description and terms of the Rights are set forth in a Rights Agreement (the "Rights Agreement"), dated as of June 8, 2012, between the Company and Computershare Shareowner Services LLC, as Rights Agent.
 
Rights Certificates; Exercise Period
.
 
Initially, the Rights will be attached to all Common Stock certificates (or, in the case of shares reflected on the direct registration system, the notations in the book entry accounts) representing shares then outstanding, and no separate rights certificates ("Rights Certificates") will be distributed.  Subject to certain exceptions specified in the Rights Agreement, the Rights will separate from the Common Stock and a distribution date ("Distribution Date") will occur upon the earlier of (i) 10 business days following a public announcement that a person or group of affiliated or associated persons (an "Acquiring Person") has acquired beneficial ownership of 15% or more of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (the "Stock Acquisition Date"), other than as a result of repurchases of stock by the Company or certain inadvertent actions by institutional or certain other stockholders, or (ii) 10 business days (or such later date as the Board shall determine) following the commencement of a tender offer or exchange offer that would result in a person or group becoming an Acquiring Person.  Until the Distribution Date, (i) the Rights will be evidenced by the Common Stock certificates (or, in the case of shares reflected on the direct registration system, by the notations in the book entry accounts) and will be transferred with and only with such Common Stock, (ii) new Common Stock certificates issued after the Record Date will contain a notation incorporating the Rights Agreement by reference and (iii) the surrender for transfer of any certificates for Common Stock outstanding will also constitute the transfer of the Rights associated with the Common Stock represented by such certificates.  Pursuant to the Rights Agreement, the Company reserves the right to require prior to the occurrence of a Triggering Event (as defined below) that, upon any exercise of Rights, a number of Rights be exercised so that only whole shares of Preferred Stock will be issued.
 
The Rights are not exercisable until the Distribution Date and will expire at 5:00 P.M., New York City time on June 8, 2013, unless the Rights are earlier redeemed, exchanged or terminated.
 
As soon as practicable after the Distribution Date, Rights Certificates will be mailed to holders of record of the Common Stock as of the close of business on the Distribution Date and, thereafter, the separate Rights Certificates alone will represent the Rights.  Except as otherwise determined by the Board of Directors, only shares of Common Stock issued prior to the Distribution Date will be issued with the Rights.
 
Flip-In Trigger
.
 
In the event that a person or group of affiliated or associated persons becomes an Acquiring Person, each holder of a Right will thereafter have the right to receive, upon exercise, Common Stock (or, in certain circumstances, cash, property or other securities of the Company) having a value equal to two times the exercise price of the Right.  Notwithstanding any of the foregoing, following the occurrence of any of the events set forth in this paragraph, all Rights that are, or (under certain circumstances specified in the Rights Agreement) were, beneficially owned by any Acquiring Person will be null and void.  However, Rights are not exercisable following the occurrence of the events set forth above until such time as the Rights are no longer redeemable by the Company as set forth below.
 
For example, at an exercise price of $[X] per Right, each Right not owned by an Acquiring Person (or by certain related parties) following an event set forth in the preceding paragraph would entitle its holder to purchase $[2X] worth of Common Stock (or other consideration, as noted above) for $[X].  Assuming that the Common Stock had a per share value of $[Y] at such time, the holder of each valid Right would be entitled to purchase [2X/Y] shares of Common Stock for $[X].
 
Flip-Over Trigger
.
 
In the event that, at any time following the Stock Acquisition Date, (i) the Company engages in a merger or other business combination transaction in which the Company is not the surviving corporation, (ii) the Company engages in a merger or other business combination transaction in which the Company is the surviving corporation and the Common Stock of the Company is changed or exchanged, or (iii) 50% or more of the Company's assets, cash flow or earning power is sold or transferred, each holder of a Right (except Rights that have previously been voided as set forth above) shall thereafter have the right to receive, upon exercise, common stock of the acquiring company having a value equal to two times the exercise price of the Right.  The events set forth in this paragraph and in the second preceding paragraph are referred to as the "Triggering Events."
Exchange Feature
.
 
At any time after a person becomes an Acquiring Person and prior to the acquisition by such person or group of fifty percent (50%) or more of the outstanding Common Stock, the Board may exchange the Rights (other than Rights owned by such person or group that have become void), in whole or in part, at an exchange ratio of one share of Common Stock, or one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock (or of a share of a class or series of the Company's preferred stock having equivalent rights, preferences and privileges), per Right (subject to adjustment).
 
Equitable Adjustments
.
 
The Purchase Price payable, and the number of Units of Preferred Stock or other securities or property issuable, upon exercise of the Rights are subject to adjustment from time to time to prevent dilution (i) in the event of a stock dividend on, or a subdivision, combination or reclassification of, the Preferred Stock, (ii) if holders of the Preferred Stock are granted certain rights or warrants to subscribe for Preferred Stock or convertible securities at less than the current market price of the Preferred Stock, or (iii) upon the distribution to holders of the Preferred Stock of evidences of indebtedness or assets (excluding regular quarterly cash dividends) or of subscription rights or warrants (other than those referred to above).
 
With certain exceptions, no adjustment in the Purchase Price will be required until cumulative adjustments amount to at least one percent (1%) of the Purchase Price.  No fractional Units will be issued and, in lieu thereof, an adjustment in cash will be made based on the market price of the Preferred Stock on the last trading date prior to the date of exercise.
 
Redemption Rights
.
 
At any time until ten business days following the Stock Acquisition Date, the Company may redeem the Rights in whole, but not in part, at a price of $0.001 per Right (payable in cash, Common Stock or other consideration deemed appropriate by the Board).  Immediately upon the action of the Board ordering redemption of the Rights, the Rights will terminate and the only right of the holders of Rights will be to receive the $0.001 redemption price.
 
Miscellaneous
.
 
Until a Right is exercised, the holder thereof, as such, will have no separate rights as a stockholder of the Company, including, without limitation, the right to vote or to receive dividends in respect of the Rights.  While the distribution of the Rights will not be taxable to stockholders or to the Company, stockholders may, depending upon the circumstances, recognize taxable income in the event that the Rights become exercisable for Common Stock (or other consideration) of the Company or for common stock of the acquiring company or in the event of the redemption of the Rights as set forth above.
 
Any of the provisions of the Rights Agreement may be amended by the Board prior to the Distribution Date.  After the Distribution Date, the provisions of the Rights Agreement may be amended by the Board in order to cure any ambiguity, to make changes that
 
do not adversely affect the interests of holders of Rights, or to shorten or lengthen any time period under the Rights Agreement.  The foregoing notwithstanding, no amendment may be made at such time as the Rights are not redeemable, except to cure any ambiguity or correct or supplement any provision contained in the Rights Agreement that may be defective or inconsistent with any other provision therein.
A copy of the Rights Agreement has been or will be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission as an Exhibit to a Registration Statement on Form 8-A or a Current Report on Form 8-K.  A copy of the Rights Agreement is available free of charge from the Rights Agent.  This summary description of the Rights does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Rights Agreement, which is incorporated herein by reference.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALEX/ALEX-8K-20120618062802.txt.gz
TIME:20120618062802
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2.):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.03  Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
A & B II, Inc. previously disclosed in its registration statement on Form 10, filed on April 2, 2012, as amended (the "Registration Statement"), that it intended to change its name to "Alexander & Baldwin, Inc." (the "Proposed Name Change").  On June 14, 2012, A & B II, Inc. filed an amendment to its Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation with the Department of Commerce and Consumer Affairs of the State of Hawaii to complete the Proposed Name Change effective as of June 14, 2012.
Item 7.01  Regulation FD Disclosure
During the week of June 18, 2012, Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. (formerly known as A & B, II, Inc.) (the Company), a wholly-owned subsidiary of Alexander & Baldwin Holdings, Inc. (Holdings), that engages in real estate and agribusiness activities, will host meetings with investors and analysts that will include a discussion of operating, strategic, and financial matters. The presentation materials, which are attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K, are being furnished prior to the meetings. Additionally, the presentation materials are available on the Companys website at www.alexanderbaldwin.com and will be available for approximately one week following the meetings.  The information set forth in these materials speaks only as of June 18, 2012.
Statements in this Form 8-K and the attached exhibit that are not historical facts are "forward-looking statements," within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, that involve a number of risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated by the relevant forward-looking statement. Factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated in the statements include, without limitation, those described on pages 20-38 of the information statement filed as Exhibit 99.1 to the Registration Statement. These forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance.
Additional information about the Company is available in the information statement filed as Exhibit 99.1 to the Registration Statement, Holdings real estate supplement furnished on Form 8-K, dated April 10, 2012, and other filings by the Company and Holdings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d)           Exhibits
99.1           Presentation Materials
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date:  June 18, 2012
ALEXANDER & BALDWIN, INC.
                                                                 
/s/ Paul K. Ito
Paul K. Ito
Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer and Controller
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALEX/ALEX-8K-20120702180259.txt.gz
TIME:20120702180259
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
o
           
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Item 2.03               Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
 
The information set forth under the heading "Financing" in Item 8.01 is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 5.02               Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On June 28, 2012, Alexander & Baldwin, Inc., formerly known as A & B II, Inc. (the "Company", "we" or "us"), adopted (i) the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Executive Severance Plan, (ii) the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. One-Year Performance Improvement Incentive Plan, (iii) the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Excess Benefits Plan and (iv) the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. 2012 Incentive Compensation Plan which was also approved by our sole stockholder, Alexander & Baldwin Holdings, Inc., on June 27, 2012. In addition, on June 28, 2012, the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Board") approved the annual compensation program for the non-employee members of the Board.  On June 29, 2012, the Company entered into letter agreements with certain executives.
 
Letter Agreement With Certain Executives
 
The Company entered into letter agreements (the "Letter Agreements") with those individuals designated as the Company's named executive officers on the Company's Form 10, which was declared effective as of June 11, 2012, and with certain other officers. The Letter Agreements are intended to encourage the executives' continued employment with the Company by providing them with greater security in the event of termination of their employment following a change in control of the Company. Each Letter Agreement will expire on December 31, 2013, subject to automatic one-year extensions unless terminated by the Company; provided that the agreement will continue for twenty-four months if a change in control occurs during the term of the agreement. Each Letter Agreement provides for certain severance benefits if, during the term of the agreement, the executive's employment is terminated by the Company without "cause" or by the executive for "good reason" following a "change in control event" of the Company, as defined by Internal Revenue Code Section 409A. Upon such a termination of employment, the executive will be entitled to receive (i) a lump-sum severance payment equal to two times the sum of the executive's base salary and target bonus, (ii) certain awards and amounts under various incentive and deferred compensation plans, (iii) an amount in connection with the cancellation of the executive's outstanding Company stock options equal to the spread between the fair market value of the Company's stock subject to such options at the time of termination and the exercise price of such options and (iv) any legal fees incurred as a result of the termination. In addition, the Company will provide health and welfare benefits for the executive's continued benefit for a period of two years after termination. The Company will also reimburse the executive for individual outplacement counseling services. Each Letter Agreement is "double trigger," so no payments are made and long-term incentives do not accelerate unless both a change in control and a qualifying termination of employment occur. There are no tax gross-ups under these agreements; payments may be reduced to the extent necessary to avoid the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code. If there is a potential change in control of the Company, the executive agrees to remain in the employ of the Company until the earliest of (i) a date six months after the occurrence of the potential change in control, (ii) the termination of the executive's employment by reason of disability or retirement, or (iii) the occurrence of a change in control of the Company.
The foregoing description of the Letter Agreements does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the form of Letter Agreement filed as Exhibit 10.1 hereto, and which is incorporated into this report by reference.
 
Executive Severance Plan
 
The Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Executive Severance Plan (the "Executive Severance Plan") is intended to retain key employees and to encourage such employees to use their best business judgment in managing the Company's affairs. The Executive Severance Plan continues from year to year, subject to a periodic review by the Board. The Executive Severance Plan provides certain severance benefits if a designated executive is involuntarily terminated without "cause" or laid off from employment as part of a job elimination/restructuring or reduction in force. Upon such termination of employment, the executive will be entitled to receive an amount equal to six months' base salary, payable in equal installments over a period of one year, and designated benefits. If the executive executes an acceptable release agreement, the executive will receive additional benefits, including an additional six months of base salary and designated benefits, reimbursement for outplacement counseling services and a prorated share of incentive plan awards at target levels that would have been payable to the executive had he or she remained employed until the end of the applicable performance period.
 
The foregoing description of the Executive Severance Plan does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Executive Severance Plan filed as Exhibit 10.2 hereto, and which is incorporated into this report by reference.
 
Performance Improvement Incentive Plan
 
The Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. One-Year Performance Improvement Incentive Plan (the "PIIP") is intended to motivate executives to exceed business plan goals and reward them for their successful results. The goals will be derived from the Company's business plan and from the business plan of each operating unit of the Company. The goals will be based on the performance of the Company as a whole, the performance of each operating unit and the performance of each individual participant. For each goal, a bonus opportunity will be set at one or more levels based on corresponding levels of attainment of that goal. Each participant's maximum award under the PIIP for a particular plan year will be equal to the sum of the maximum level of bonus opportunity set for each goal established for him or her for that plan year. At the end of each plan year, the Company's Compensation Committee will determine the actual level of attainment of each of the goals established for the participant. The Compensation Committee will have the discretion to increase or decrease the award if the award does not accurately reflect the performance of the Company,  applicable operating unit or individual. Awards will be paid in cash, provided that the participant must be on the payroll at the time the award is paid.
 
The foregoing description of the PIIP does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the PIIP filed as Exhibit 10.3 hereto, and which is incorporated into this report by reference.
 
 
Excess Benefits Plan
 
The Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Excess Benefits Plan (the "Excess Benefits Plan") is a
non-qualified benefit plan for executives. It is intended to complement the Company's qualified retirement plans to provide benefits and contributions in an amount equal to what otherwise would have been provided using the qualified retirement plan's formulas but for the limits imposed by tax law.
 
The foregoing description of the Excess Benefits Plan does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Excess Benefits Plan filed as Exhibit 10.4 hereto, and which is incorporated into this report by reference.
 
2012 Incentive Compensation Plan
 
The Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. 2012 Incentive Compensation Plan (the "2012 Plan") is intended to serve as a comprehensive incentive compensation plan that will provide us with the flexibility to design and structure cash and equity incentive awards for selected individuals in our employ or service. Four million three hundred thousand (4,300,000) shares of our common stock have been reserved for issuance under the 2012 Plan pursuant to the following four (4) incentive compensation programs for officers, employees, non-employee board members and consultants, whether in the employ or service of the Company or any parent or subsidiary:
 
(i)            the discretionary grant program under which eligible persons may be granted options to purchase shares of our common stock at an exercise price per share not less than the fair market value per share on the grant date or stock appreciation rights tied to the value of such common stock,
 
(ii)           the stock issuance program under which eligible persons may be issued shares of our common stock pursuant to restricted stock awards, restricted stock units, performance shares or other stock-based awards that vest upon the completion of a designated service period or the attainment of pre-established performance milestones, or may acquire such shares through direct purchase or as a bonus for services rendered to the Company,
 
(iii)          the incentive bonus program under which eligible persons may be provided with incentive bonus opportunities through performance unit awards and special cash incentive programs tied to the attainment of pre-established performance milestones or may be awarded dividend equivalent rights, either as stand-alone rights or in tandem with other awards, and
 
(iv)          the automatic grant program under which our non-employee Board members will automatically receive equity awards at designated intervals over their period of continued Board service.
 
The 2012 Plan also includes a special addendum that authorizes the Compensation Committee of our Board of Directors, in its role as plan administrator, to issue substitute awards under the 2012 Plan to replace outstanding awards under one or more of the Matson (as defined in Item 8.01 below) equity incentive plans that are held by individuals who are in the employ or service of the Company (or its subsidiaries) immediately prior to the distribution of all the outstanding shares of our common stock to the holders of Matson common stock pursuant to the Distribution described in Item 8.01 below.
 
The foregoing description of the 2012 Plan does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the 2012 Plan filed as Exhibit 10.5 hereto, and which is incorporated into this report by reference.
 
Board Compensation
 
The annual compensation program for non-employee directors includes a fixed annual cash retainer of $56,000 for Board service. A fee of $750 per meeting is payable for any telephonic or in-person meetings in excess of seven Board meetings. All Audit Committee members receive an additional annual cash retainer of $9,000, all Compensation Committee members receive an additional annual cash retainer of $7,500, and all Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee members receive an additional annual cash retainer of $6,000. A fee of $750 per meeting is payable for any telephonic or in-person Committee meetings in excess of a pre-established minimum (which varies by Committee). The Chair of the Audit Committee receives an additional annual retainer fee of $14,000 for serving in such role, the Chair of the Compensation Committee receives an additional annual retainer fee of $10,000 for serving in such role, and the Chair of the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee receives an additional annual retainer fee of $7,500 for serving in such role. The non-executive Chairman of the Board, if any, receives an additional cash retainer fee of $25,000 for serving in such role.
 
Pursuant to the terms of the automatic grant program in effect for our non-employee Board members under the 2012 Plan, each of the following non-employee Board members will receive a restricted stock unit award for shares of our common stock at the close of business on July 2, 2012: Walter A. Dods, Jr., Robert S. Harrison, Michele K. Saito, and Eric K. Yeaman. The number of shares subject to each such award will be determined by dividing the dollar amount of $83,333 by the closing price of our common stock on the July 2 award date, and those shares will vest in three successive equal annual installments upon completion of each year of Board service over the three-year period measured from the award date.
 
The automatic grant program under the 2012 Plan also provides for annual grants of equity-based awards with a grant-date value of approximately $90,000 per non-employee Board member to be made at each annual meeting of our shareholders, beginning with the 2013 annual meeting, to our continuing non-employee Board members.
 
The Board has adopted a stock ownership guideline policy, which encourages each non-employee director to own Company common stock with a value of five times the amount of the current cash retainer of $56,000, within five years of becoming a director.
Item 8.01
                                            
Other Items.
 
Separation
 
On June 29, 2012, Matson, Inc., formerly known as Alexander & Baldwin Holdings, Inc. ("Matson"), completed the separation of its businesses into two publicly traded companies (the "Separation"). Following the Separation, the land business (real estate and agriculture) is now owned and operated by the Company and the transportation business (ocean transportation and logistics) continues to be owned and operated by Matson.
 
Matson effected the Separation through a pro rata distribution (the "Distribution") of one share of common stock of the Company for each share of common stock of Matson held of record by shareholders as of June 18, 2012, the record date for the Distribution. As a result of the Distribution, shareholders of Matson received 100% of the outstanding common stock of the Company and the Company became an independent public company trading under the symbol "ALEX" on the New York Stock Exchange (the "NYSE"). Following the Separation, Matson began trading under the symbol "MATX" on the NYSE.
 
A registration statement on Form 10 relating to the Separation was filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and was declared effective on June 11, 2012.
 
Financing
 
In connection with the Separation, the Company was required to execute, and consequently executed, documentation pursuant to which it became a guarantor of all obligations of its subsidiary Alexander & Baldwin, LLC, formerly known as Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. ("A&B LLC"), arising under each of (i) that certain revolving credit agreement, dated as of June 4, 2012 (the "Credit Agreement"), by and among A&B LLC, First Hawaiian Bank, Bank of America, N.A. and the other lenders party thereto, and (ii) that certain amended note purchase and private shelf agreement, dated as of June 4, 2012 (the "Note Purchase Agreement"), by and among A&B LLC, Prudential Investment Management, Inc. ("PIM) and certain affiliates of PIM party thereto.
 
The Credit Agreement and the Note Purchase Agreement are attached hereto as Exhibits 10.6 and 10.7, respectively, and are incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9.01
                                            
Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)     Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
[Name] Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. 822 Bishop Street Honolulu, HI 96813
 
Dear :
 
WHEREAS, Alexander & Baldwin Holdings, Inc. ("Holdings") has entered into a Separation and Distribution Agreement (the "Separation Agreement") with Alexander & Baldwin, Inc., a Hawaii corporation (the "Company");
 
WHEREAS, pursuant to the terms of the Separation Agreement and as of the Distribution Date (as such term is defined in the Separation Agreement), Holdings has separated into two independent publicly traded companies: (a) Holdings which, following consummation of the transactions contemplated in the Separation Agreement, owns and conducts the Matson Businesses (as such term is defined in the Separation Agreement) under the name "Matson, Inc.", and (b) the Company which, following consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Separation Agreement, owns and conducts the A&B Businesses (as such term is defined in the Separation Agreement) under the name "Alexander & Baldwin, Inc.";
 
WHEREAS, the Company considers it essential to the best interests of the Company and its shareholders to encourage the continued employment of key management personnel;
 
WHEREAS, the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Board") recognizes that, as is the case with many publicly-held corporations, the possibility of a change in control of the Company may exist and that such possibility, and the uncertainty and questions which it may raise among management, may result in the departure or distraction of management personnel to the detriment of the Company and its shareholders;
 
WHEREAS, the Board has determined that appropriate steps should be taken to reinforce and encourage the continued attention and dedication of members of the Company's top management, including you, to their assigned duties without distraction in the face of the potentially disturbing circumstances arising from the possibility of a change in control of the Company[; and
 
WHEREAS, you are a party to that certain agreement effective as of January 1, 2009, as amended (the "Existing Agreement")].
(1)
 
NOW, THEREFORE, to persuade you to remain in the employ of the Company and in consideration of your agreement set forth in Section 2(b) hereof, effective as of the Distribution Date, the Company agrees that you will receive the severance benefits set forth in this letter agreement (the "Agreement") in the event your employment with the Company is terminated subsequent to a "change in control of the Company" (as defined in Section 2(a) hereof) under the circumstances described in Section 3 below.  [This Agreement shall replace and supersede the Existing Agreement in its entirety[; provided, however, if for any reason the Separation does not occur, this Agreement shall be null and void and of no force and effect.]]
(2),(3)
 
If you are or become an officer of a subsidiary of the Company, whether or not you are also an employee of the Company, any reference herein to your employment by the Company shall be deemed to include such subsidiary.
 
1.
                                      
Term and Operation of Agreement. This Agreement shall commence on the effective date hereof and shall continue in effect through December 31, 2013; provided, however, that commencing on January 1, 2013 and each January 1 thereafter, the term of this Agreement shall automatically be extended for one additional year unless not later than December 1 of the preceding year, the Company shall have given notice that it does not wish to extend this Agreement; and provided, further, that notwithstanding any such notice by the Company not to extend, this Agreement shall continue in effect for a period of twenty-four (24) months beyond the term provided herein if a "change in control of the Company" (as defined in Section 2(a) hereof) shall have occurred during such term.
 
2.
                                      
Change in Control. (a) For purposes of this Agreement, a "change in control of the Company" shall mean a "Change in Control Event" within the meaning of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the regulations thereunder (the "Code").
 
(b)
                                
For purposes of this Agreement, a "potential change in control of the Company" shall be deemed to have occurred if (i) the Company enters into an agreement the consummation of which would result in the occurrence of a change in control of the Company; (ii) any "person" (as such term is used in Section 13(d) and
 
(1)
            
To be included for those New A&B employees with existing agreements.
 
(2)
            
To be included for those New A&B employees with existing agreements.
 
(3)
            
Bracketed proviso to be included in any letter agreement executed prior to the separation.
 
 
14(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, including the Company) publicly announces an intention to take or to consider taking actions which if consummated would constitute a change in control of the Company; (iii) any person becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of securities of the Company representing 20% or more of the combined voting power of the Company's then outstanding securities; or (iv) the Board adopts a resolution to the effect that a potential change in control of the Company for purposes of this Agreement has occurred. You agree that, subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, in the event of a potential change in control of the Company, you will remain in the employ of the Company until the earliest of (i) a date which is six (6) months from the occurrence of such potential change in control of the Company, (ii) the termination of your employment by reason of Disability or Retirement, as defined in Subsection 3(i) hereof, or (iii) the occurrence of a change in control of the Company.
 
3.
                                      
Termination Following Change in Control. If a change in control of the Company shall have occurred, you shall be entitled to the benefits provided in Section 4 hereof upon the subsequent termination of your employment during the term of this Agreement unless such termination is (a) because of your death, (b) by the Company for Cause or Disability or (c) by you other than for Good Reason. For purposes of this Agreement, your employment shall be deemed to have been terminated following a change in control of the Company by the Company without Cause or by you with Good Reason, if (i) your employment is terminated by the Company without Cause prior to a change in control of the Company (whether or not a change in control of the Company ever occurs) and such termination was at the request or direction of a person who has entered into an agreement with the Company the consummation of which would constitute a change in control of the Company, (ii) you terminate your employment for Good Reason prior to a change in control of the Company (whether or not a change in control of the Company ever occurs) and the circumstance or event which constitutes Good Reason occurs at the request or direction of such person, or (iii) your employment is terminated by the Company without Cause or by you for Good Reason and such termination or the circumstance or event which constitutes Good Reason is otherwise in connection with or in anticipation of a change in control of the Company (whether or not a change in control of the Company ever occurs).
 
(i)
                                    
Disability; Retirement. Termination by the Company of your employment based on "Disability" shall mean termination because of your absence from your duties with the Company on a full-time basis for six consecutive months, as a result of your incapacity due to physical or mental illness,
 
unless within 30 days after Notice of Termination (as hereinafter defined) is given following such absence you shall have returned to the full-time performance of your duties. Termination by you of your employment based on "Retirement" shall mean termination in accordance with the Company's retirement policy, including early retirement, generally applicable to its salaried employees.
 
(ii)
                                 
Cause. Termination by the Company of your employment for "Cause" shall mean termination upon (A) the willful and continued failure by you substantially to perform your duties with the Company (other than any such failure resulting from your incapacity due to physical or mental illness or such actual or anticipated failure resulting from your termination for Good Reason), after a demand for substantial performance is delivered to you by the Board which specifically identifies the manner in which the Board believes that you have not substantially performed your duties, or (B) the willful engaging by you in conduct which is demonstrably and materially injurious to the Company, monetarily or otherwise. For purposes of this paragraph, no act, or failure to act, on your part shall be considered "willful" unless done, or omitted to be done, by you not in good faith and without reasonable belief that your action or omission was in the best interest of the Company. Notwithstanding the foregoing, you shall not be deemed to have been terminated for Cause unless and until there shall have been delivered to you a copy of a resolution duly adopted by the affirmative vote of not less than three-quarters of the entire membership of the Board at a meeting of the Board called and held for the purpose (after reasonable notice to you and an opportunity for you, together with your counsel, to be heard before the Board), finding that in the good faith opinion of the Board you were guilty of conduct set forth above in clauses (A) or (B) of the first sentence of this paragraph and specifying the particulars thereof in detail.
 
(iii)
                              
Good Reason. You shall be entitled to terminate your employment for Good Reason. For purposes of this Agreement, "Good Reason" shall mean, without your express written consent, any of the following occurring subsequent to a change in control of the Company or prior to a change in control of the Company under the circumstances described in clauses (ii) and (iii) of the second sentence of Section 3 hereof (treating all references in paragraphs (A) through (G) below to a "change in control of the Company" as references to a "potential change in control of the Company"), unless, in the case of any act or failure to act described in paragraph (A), (D), (E) or (G) below, such act or failure to act is corrected prior to the Date of Termination specified in the Notice of Termination given in respect thereof:
(A)
                             
the assignment to you of any duties inconsistent with your position, duties and status with the Company immediately prior to a change in control of the Company; a substantial alteration in the nature or status of your responsibilities from those in effect immediately prior to a change in control of the Company; the failure to provide you with substantially the same perquisites which you had immediately prior to a change in control of the Company, including but not limited to an office and appropriate support services; or a change in your titles or offices as in effect immediately prior to a change in control of the Company, or any removal of you from or any failure to reelect you to any of such positions;
 
(B)
                               
a reduction by the Company in your base salary as in effect on the effective date of this Agreement or as the same may be increased from time to time;
 
(C)
                               
the Company's requiring you to be based anywhere other than the metropolitan area in which your office is located immediately prior to a change in control of the Company, except for required travel on the Company's business to an extent substantially consistent with your present business travel obligations;
 
(D)
                              
the failure by the Company to continue in effect any stock option or other equity-based plan in which you were participating, or in which you were entitled to participate, immediately prior to a change in control of the Company, unless an equitable arrangement (embodied in an ongoing substitute or alternative plan) has been made with respect to such plan; or the failure by the Company to continue your participation therein (or in such substitute or alternative plan) on a substantially equivalent basis, both in terms of the amount or timing of payment of benefits provided and the level of your participation relative to other participants, as existed immediately prior to the change in control of the Company.
 
(E)
                                
the failure by the Company to continue in effect any benefit, pension or compensation plan, employee stock ownership plan, savings and profit sharing plan, life insurance plan, medical insurance plan or health-and-accident plan in which you are participating, or in which you are entitled to participate, immediately prior to a change in control of the Company (the "Company Plans"), unless an equitable arrangement (embodied in an ongoing substitute or alternative plan) has been made with respect to such plan; or the failure by the Company to
 
continue your participation therein (or in such substitute or alternative plan) on a substantially equivalent basis, both in terms of the amount or timing of payment of benefits provided and the level of your participation relative to other participants, as existed immediately prior to the change in control of the Company; or the failure by the Company to provide you with the number of paid vacation days to which you are entitled on the basis of years of service with the Company in accordance with the Company's normal vacation policy immediately prior to a change in control of the Company;
 
(F)
                                
the failure by the Company to obtain the assumption of this agreement to as contemplated in Section 5 hereof, prior to the effectiveness of any succession; or
 
(G)
                               
any purported termination of your employment by the Company which is not effected pursuant to a Notice of Termination satisfying the requirements of paragraph (iv) below (and, if applicable, paragraph (ii) above); and for purposes of this Agreement, no such purported termination shall be effective.
 
Your right to terminate your employment pursuant to this paragraph shall not be affected by your incapacity due to physical or mental illness, and your right to terminate your employment pursuant to this paragraph shall not be limited by your agreement contained in Section 2(b) hereof. Your continued employment shall not constitute consent to, or a waiver of rights with respect to, any act or failure to act constituting Good Reason hereunder.
 
(iv)
                             
Notice of Termination. Any purported termination by the Company pursuant to paragraph (i) or (ii) above or by you pursuant to paragraph (iii) above shall be communicated by written Notice of Termination to the other party hereto in accordance with Section 6 hereof. For purposes of this Agreement, a "Notice of Termination" shall mean a notice which shall indicate the specific termination provision in this Agreement relied upon and shall set forth in reasonable detail the facts and circumstances claimed to provide a basis for termination of your employment under the provision so indicated.
 
(v)
                                
Date of Termination. "Date of Termination" shall mean (A) if your employment is terminated for Disability, 30 days after Notice of Termination is given (provided that you shall not have returned to the performance of your duties on a full-time basis during such 30-day period), and (B) if your employment is terminated pursuant to paragraphs (ii) or (iii) above or for any other reason, the date
 
specified in the Notice of Termination (which, in the case of a termination pursuant to paragraph (ii) above shall not be less than 30 days, and in the case of a termination pursuant to paragraph (iii) above shall not be less than 30 days, nor more than 60 days, from the date such Notice of Termination is given); provided that if within 30 days after any Notice of Termination is given the party receiving such Notice of Termination notifies the other party that a dispute exists concerning the termination, the Date of Termination shall be the date on which the dispute is finally determined, either by mutual written agreement of the parties, by a binding and final arbitration award or by a final judgment, order or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction (the time for appeal therefrom having expired and no appeal having been perfected); and provided further that the Date of Termination shall be extended by a notice of dispute given by you only if such notice is given in good faith and you pursue the resolution of such dispute with reasonable diligence.
4.
                                      
Compensation Upon Termination or During Disability.
 
(a)
                                 
During any period that you fail to perform your duties hereunder as a result of incapacity due to physical or mental illness, you shall continue to receive your full base salary at the rate then in effect and all compensation and benefits payable under all compensation, benefit and insurance plans until this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 3(i) hereof. Thereafter, your benefits shall be determined in accordance with the Company's long-term disability plan or other insurance programs then in effect and the Company Plans.
 
(b)
                                
If your employment shall be terminated for Cause, the Company shall pay you your full base salary through the Date of Termination at the rate in effect at the time Notice of Termination is given and the Company shall have no further obligation to you under this Agreement.
 
(c)
                                 
If your employment by the Company shall be terminated by the Company other than for Cause or Disability or by you for Good Reason, then you shall be entitled to the benefits provided below:
 
(i)
                                    
the Company shall pay you your full base salary through the Date of Termination at the rate in effect at the time Notice of Termination is given; or, if higher, the rate in effect immediately prior to the first occurrence of an event or circumstance constituting Good Reason, together with all compensation and benefits payable to you through the Date of Termination under the terms of the Company's compensation, benefit and insurance plans, programs or arrangements as in effect immediately prior to the Date of Termination or, if more favorable to you, as in effect immediately prior to the first occurrence of an event or circumstance constituting Good Reason;
(ii)
                                 
in lieu of any further salary payments to you for periods subsequent to the Date of Termination, the Company shall pay as severance pay to you, not later than the fifth day following the Date of Termination, a lump sum severance payment (together with the payments provided in Subsections 4(c) (iii), (iv), (v), and (vii) the "Severance Payments") equal to two times the sum of (A) your annual base salary as in effect immediately prior to the Date of Termination or, if higher, in effect immediately prior to the first occurrence of an event or circumstance constituting Good Reason, and (B) your target annual bonus under any annual bonus or incentive plan maintained by the Company in respect of the fiscal year in which occurs the Date of Termination or, if higher, the fiscal year in which occurs the first event or circumstance constituting Good Reason;
 
(iii)
                              
notwithstanding any provision of any deferred compensation plans in which you participate other than any restricted stock unit or similar awards (the "Deferred Compensation Plans"), the Company shall pay you in one sum in cash not later than the fifth day following the Date of Termination, the sum of all amounts to which you are entitled under the Deferred Compensation Plans whether upon termination of your employment or otherwise, provided that in determining the amounts to which you are entitled under the A&B Excess Benefits Plan (the "Excess Plan"), the A&B Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan and the A&B Executive Survivor/Retirement Benefit Plan (the "Executive Survivor Plan") the provisions of said plans relating to a change in control shall be applied on the basis that the change in control of the Company did not provide as a prerequisite to the consummation of the change in control that the employer responsibilities under said plans are to be assumed by the successor organization;
 
(iv)
                             
notwithstanding any provision of any annual or long term incentive plan to the contrary, the Company shall pay to you in one sum in cash not later than the fifth day following the Date of Termination, an amount equal to the sum of (A) any incentive compensation which has been awarded or allocated for any completed fiscal year or other measuring period preceding that in which the Date of Termination occurs but has not yet been paid, and (B) a pro rata portion of the aggregate value of all contingent awards to you for all uncompleted periods under such plans calculated by multiplying for each such award, (1) a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of full months elapsed during the period for such award prior to the Date of Termination, and the denominator of which shall be the total number of months contained in such period, by (2) the amount of the award which would have been
 
payable to you following completion of such period at the "TARGET" (fully competent) level of performance as described in the plan documents and the individual objective development worksheets;
 
(v)
                                
in lieu of shares of common stock, without par value, of the Company (the "Shares") issuable upon the exercise of options ("Options"), if any, granted to you under any stock option or other plan of the Company (which Options shall be canceled upon the making of the payment referred to below), you shall receive in one sum in cash not later than the fifth day following the Date of Termination an amount equal to the product of (A) the difference (to the extent that such difference is a positive number) obtained by subtracting the per Share exercise price of each Option held by you, whether or not then fully exercisable, from the closing price of Shares, as reported on the principal national securities exchange on which the Shares are then listed or, if the Shares are not then listed on such an exchange, on the automated quotation system operated by the National Association of Security Dealers, Inc., on the Date of Termination (or the last trading date prior thereto) and (B) the number of Shares covered by each such Option;
 
(vi)
                             
the Company shall also pay to you all legal fees and expenses incurred by you as a result of such termination (including all such fees and expenses, if any, incurred in contesting or disputing any such termination or in seeking to obtain or enforce any right or benefit provided by this Agreement or in connection with any tax audit or proceeding to the extent attributable to the application of section 4999 of the Code to any payment or benefit provided hereunder). Such payments shall be made within five (5) business days after delivery of your written requests for payment accompanied with such evidence of fees and expenses incurred as the Company reasonably may require; provided, however, that in no event shall any such payments be made later than the last day of your taxable year following the taxable year in which the fee or expense was incurred; and
 
(vii)
                          
the Company shall reimburse you for individual outplacement counseling services in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00); provided, however, that in no event shall any such reimbursement be made later than the last day of your 2nd taxable year following the taxable year in which the Date of Termination occurs.
(d)
                                
(i)
                                    
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Agreement, if any payments or benefits received or to be received by you in connection with a change in control of the Company (as defined in Section 2(b) hereof) or your termination of employment, whether pursuant to the terms of this Agreement or any other plan, arrangement or agreement with the Company, any "person" (as defined in Section 2(a) hereof) whose actions result in a change in control of the Company or any person affiliated with the Company or such person (all such payments and benefits, the "Total Payments") would be subject (in whole or part), to the excise tax imposed under Section 4999 of the Code (the "Excise Tax"), then, after taking into account any reduction in the Total Payments provided by reason of Section 280G of the Code in such other plan, arrangement or agreement, the cash Severance Payments shall first be reduced, and the non-cash Severance Payments shall thereafter be reduced, to the extent necessary so that no portion of the Total Payments is subject to the Excise Tax but only if (i) the net amount of such Total Payments, as so reduced (and after subtracting the net amount of federal, state and local income taxes on such reduced Total Payments and after taking into account the phase out of itemized deductions and personal exemptions attributable to such reduced Total Payments) is greater than or equal to (ii) the net amount of such Total Payments without such reduction (but after subtracting the net amount of federal, state and local income taxes on such Total Payments and the amount of Excise Tax to which you would be subject in respect of such unreduced Total Payments and after taking into account the phase out of itemized deductions and personal exemptions attributable to such unreduced Total Payments). The Total Payments shall be reduced by the Company in its reasonable discretion in the following order: (A) reduction of any cash payment, excluding any cash payment with respect to the acceleration of equity awards, that is otherwise payable to the Executive that is exempt from Section 409A of the Code, (B) reduction of any other payments or benefits otherwise payable to the Executive on a pro-rata basis or such other manner that complies with Section 409A of the Code and (C) reduction of any payment with respect to the acceleration of equity awards that is otherwise payable to the Executive that is exempt from Section 409A of the Code provided, however, that, to the extent permitted by Section 409A of the Code, you may elect to have the non-cash Severance Payments reduced prior to any reduction of the cash Severance Payments.
 
(ii)
                                 
For purposes of determining whether and the extent to which the Total Payments will be subject to the Excise Tax, (i) no portion of the Total Payments the receipt or enjoyment of which you shall have waived at such time and in such manner as not to constitute a "payment" within the meaning of Section 280G(b) of the Code shall be taken into account, (ii) no portion of the Total Payments shall be taken into account which, in the opinion of tax counsel ("Tax Counsel") reasonably acceptable to you and selected by the accounting firm (the "Auditor") which was, immediately prior to the change in control of
the Company, the Company's independent auditor, does not constitute a "parachute payment" within the meaning of Section 280G(b)(2) of the Code (including by reason of Section 280G(b)(4)(A) of the Code) and, in calculating the Excise Tax, no portion of such Total Payments shall be taken into account which, in the opinion of Tax Counsel, constitutes reasonable compensation for services actually rendered, within the meaning of Section 280G(b)(4)(B) of the Code, in excess of the Base Amount (as defined in Section 280G(b)(3) of the Code) allocable to such reasonable compensation, and (iii) the value of any non-cash benefit or any deferred payment or benefit included in the Total Payments shall be determined by the Auditor in accordance with the principles of Sections 280G(d)(3) and (4) of the Code. For purposes of this Section 4(d), (1) you shall be deemed to pay federal income taxes at the highest marginal rate of federal income taxation in the calendar year in which the applicable Total Payment is to be made and state and local income taxes at the highest marginal rate of taxation in the state and locality of your residence in the calendar year in which the applicable Total Payment is to made, net of the maximum reduction in federal income taxes which could be obtained from deduction of such state and local taxes, and (2) except to the extent that you otherwise notify the Company, you shall be deemed to be subject to the loss of itemized deductions and personal exemptions to the maximum extent provided by the Code for each dollar of incremental income.
 
(iii)
                              
At the time that payments are made under this Agreement, the Company shall provide you with a written statement setting forth the manner in which such payments were calculated and the basis for such calculations including, without limitation, any opinions or other advice the Company has received from Tax Counsel, the Auditor or other advisors or consultants (and any such opinions or advice which are in writing shall be attached to the statement). If you object to the Company's calculations, the Company shall pay you such portion of the Severance Payments (up to 100% thereof) as you determine is necessary to result in the proper application of this Section 4(d).
 
(e)
                                 
Unless you are terminated for Cause, the Company shall maintain or cause to be maintained in full force and effect, for your continued benefit, for a period of two years, all health and welfare benefit plans to include life insurance, health insurance and dental insurance, in which you participated or were entitled to participate immediately prior to the Date of Termination, provided that your continued participation is possible under the general terms and provisions of such plans and programs. In the event that your participation in
 
any such plan or program is barred, the Company shall arrange to provide you with benefits substantially similar to those which you are entitled to receive under such plans and programs. At the end of such two-year period, you will be entitled to take advantage of any conversion privileges applicable to the benefits available under any such plans or programs. Benefits otherwise receivable by you pursuant to this Section 4(e) shall be reduced to the extent benefits of the same type are received by or made available to you during the two-year period following your termination of employment (and any such benefits received by or made available to you shall be reported by you to the Company); provided, however, that the Company shall reimburse you for the excess, if any, of the cost of such benefits to you over such cost immediately prior to the Date of Termination or, if more favorable to you, the first occurrence of an event or circumstance constituting Good Reason. If the Severance Payments shall be decreased pursuant to Section 4(d) hereof, and the Section 4(e) benefits which remain payable after the application of Section 4(d) hereof are thereafter reduced pursuant to the immediately preceding sentence, the Company shall, no later than five (5) business days following such reduction, pay to you the least of (a) the amount of the decrease made in the Severance Payments pursuant to Section 4(d) hereof, (b) the amount of the subsequent reduction in these Section 4(e) benefits, or (c) the maximum amount which can be paid to you without being, or causing any other payment to be, nondeductible by reason of Section 280G of the Code.
 
(f)
                                   
You shall not be required to mitigate the amount of any payment provided for in this Section 4 by seeking other employment or otherwise, nor shall the amount of any payment provided for in this Section 4 (other than Section 4(e) hereof) be reduced by any compensation earned by you as the result of employment by another employer after the Date of Termination, by offset against any amount claimed to be owed by you to the Company, or otherwise.
 
(g)
                                
The intent of the parties is that payments and benefits under this Agreement comply with Section 409A of the Code and the regulations and other guidance promulgated thereunder ("Section 409A") and, accordingly, to the maximum extent permitted, this Agreement shall be interpreted and administered to be in compliance therewith. Notwithstanding anything contained herein to the contrary, you shall not be considered to have terminated employment with the Company for purposes of this Agreement and no payments shall be due to you under this Agreement providing for payment of amounts on termination of employment unless you would be considered to have incurred a "separation from service" from the Company within the meaning of Section 409A; and for purposes of determining whether you have incurred a "separation from service" under Section 1.409A-1(h) of the
 
regulations promulgated under Section 409A by the United States Treasury Department, "50 percent" shall be substituted for "20 percent" each place that the latter appears in Section 1.409A-1(h)(1)(ii). Each amount to be paid or benefit to be provided under this Agreement shall be construed as a separate identified payment for purposes of Section 409A and any payments described in this Agreement that are due within the "short term deferral period" as defined in Section 409A shall not be treated as deferred compensation unless applicable law requires otherwise. Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, if your employment is terminated prior to a change in control of the Company in a manner described in the second sentence of Section 3, to the extent required to avoid accelerated taxation and/or tax penalties under Section 409A of the Code, amounts payable to you hereunder, to the extent not in excess of the amount that you would have received under any other severance plan or arrangement with the Company that is not contingent on the occurrence of a change in control of the Company had such plan or arrangement been applicable, shall be paid at the time and in the manner provided by such plan or arrangement and the remainder shall be paid to you in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement. To the extent required in order to avoid accelerated taxation and/or tax penalties under Section 409A, amounts that would otherwise be payable and benefits that would otherwise be provided pursuant to this Agreement during the six-month period immediately following your separation from service shall instead be paid on the first business day after the date that is six months following your separation from service (or upon your death, if earlier), together with interest calculated from the fifth (5th) day following separation from service until the date of payment, at an interest rate equal to 120% of the short-term applicable federal rate for a semi-annual compounding period under Section 1274(d) of the Code, applicable for the month in which the participant's separation from service occurs, provided that such interest rate shall not exceed 120% of the long-term applicable federal rate under Section 1274(d) of the Code.
 
5.
                                      
Successors; Binding Agreement. (a) The Company will require any successor (whether direct or indirect, by purchase, merger, consolidation or otherwise) to all or substantially all of the business and/or assets of the Company, by agreement in form and substance satisfactory to you, to, prior to such succession, expressly assume and agree to perform this Agreement in the same manner and to the same extent that the Company would be required to perform it if no such succession had taken place. As used in this Agreement, "Company" shall mean the Company as hereinbefore defined and any successor to its business and/or assets as aforesaid which executes and delivers the agreement provided for in this Section 5 or which otherwise becomes bound by all the terms and provisions of this Agreement by operation of law, or otherwise.
(b)
                                
This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be enforceable by your personal or legal representatives, executors, administrators, successors, heirs, distributees, devisees and legatees. If you should die while any amount would still be payable to you hereunder if you had continued to live, all such amounts, unless otherwise provided herein, shall be paid in accordance with the terms of this Agreement to your devisee, legatee or other designee or, if there is no such designee, to your estate.
 
6.
                                      
Notice. For the purposes of this Agreement, notices and all other communications provided for in the Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given when delivered or mailed by United States registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid, addressed to the respective addresses set forth on the first page of this Agreement, provided that all notices to the Company shall be directed to the attention of the Board with a copy to the Secretary of the Company, or to such other address as either party may have furnished to the other in writing in accordance herewith, except that notice of change of address shall be effective only upon receipt.
 
7.
                                      
Miscellaneous. No provision of this Agreement may be modified, waived or discharged unless such waiver, modification or discharge is agreed to in writing signed by you and such officer as may be specifically designated by the Board. No waiver by either party hereto at any time of any breach by the other party hereto of, or compliance with, any condition or provision of this Agreement to be performed by such other party shall be deemed a waiver of similar or dissimilar provisions or conditions at the time or at any prior or subsequent time. This Agreement constitutes the sole agreement of the parties and terminates, replaces, and supersedes all previous representations, understandings, and agreements of the parties with respect to the subject matter herein, whether written or oral, express or implied, rendering such previous representations, understandings, and agreements null and void. The validity, interpretation, construction and performance of this Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of Hawaii.
 
8.
                                      
Validity. The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, which shall remain in full force and effect.
 
9.
                                      
Counterparts. This Agreement may be executed in several counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original but all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument.
10.
                                
Arbitration. Any dispute or controversy arising under or in connection with this Agreement shall be settled exclusively by arbitration in Honolulu, Hawaii, in accordance with the rules of Dispute Prevention & Resolution, Inc. then in effect. Judgment may be entered on the arbitrator's award in any court having jurisdiction.
 
If this letter correctly sets forth our agreement on the subject matter hereof, kindly sign and return to the Company the enclosed copy of this letter which will then constitute our agreement on this subject, upon execution by the Company.
 
Dated this                day of                           , 2012, but effective as of the Distribution Date.
 

Exhibit 10.2
 
The purpose of the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Executive Severance Plan (the "Plan") is to retain key employees and to encourage such employees to use their best business judgment in managing the affairs of Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. (the "Company") and its divisions and subsidiaries.  Therefore, the Company is willing to provide the severance benefits described below to protect these employees if involuntarily terminated without cause or laid off from employment as part of a job elimination/restructuring or reduction in force.  It is further intended that this Plan will complement other compensation program components to assure a sound basis upon which the Company will retain key employees.
 
Whenever used in this Plan, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings set forth below.  When the defined meaning is intended, the term is capitalized:
 
1.1          "" means the total amount of base salary payable to the participant at the salary rate in effect on the last day of the participant's employment with the Employer.  Base Salary does not include bonuses, reimbursed expenses, credits or benefits under any plan of deferred compensation, to which the Employer contributes, or any additional cash compensation or compensation payable in a form other than cash.
Base Salary
 
1.2          "" shall mean the Board of Directors of the Company.
Board of Directors
 
1.3          "" means termination from employment with the Employer upon:
Cause
 
1.3(a)     the willful and continued failure by the participant substantially to perform the participant's duties with the Employer (other than any such failure resulting from the participant's incapacity due to physical or mental Disability).  For the purposes of this subsection and subsection 1.3(b), no act, or failure to act, on the participant's part shall be considered "willful" unless done, or omitted to be done, by the participant not in good faith and without reasonable belief by the participant that his action or omission was in the best interest of the Employer; or
 
1.3(b)     the willful engaging by the participant in conduct that is demonstrably and materially injurious to the Employer, monetarily or otherwise.
 
1.4          "" shall mean that an individual is deemed to be totally disabled by the Social Security Administration.
Disability
 
1.5          "" shall mean the Company or the entity for whom services are performed and with respect to whom the legally binding right to compensation arises, and all entities with whom the Company would be considered a single employer under Section 414(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code"); provided that in applying Section
Employer
 
 
1563(a)(1), (2), and (3) of the Code for purposes of determining a controlled group of corporations under Section 414(b) of the Code, the language "at least 50 percent" is used instead of "at least 80 percent" each place it appears in Section 1563(a)(1), (2), and (3) of the Code, and in applying Treasury Regulation  1.414(c)-2 for purposes of determining trades or businesses (whether or not incorporated) that are under common control for purposes of Section 414(c) of the Code, "at least 50 percent" is used instead of "at least 80 percent" each place it appears in Treasury Regulation  1.414(c)-2; provided, however, "at least 20 percent" shall replace "at least 50 percent" in the preceding clause if there is a legitimate business criteria for using such lower percentage.
 
1.6          "" means each December 31.
Identification Date
 
1.7          "" means a participant who, on an Identification Date, is:
Key Employee
 
1.7(a)     An officer of the Company of having annual compensation greater than the compensation limit in Section 416(i)(1)(A)(i) of the Code, provided that no more than fifty officers of the Company shall be determined to be Key Employees as of the Identification Date;
 
1.7(b)     A five percent owner of the Company; or
 
1.7(c)      A one percent owner of the Company having annual compensation from the Company of more than $150,000.
 
If a participant is identified as a Key Employee on an Identification Date, then such participant shall be considered a Key Employee for purposes of the Plan during the period beginning on the first April 1 following the Identification Date and ending on the next March 31.  For purposes of this Section 1.7 only and for determining whether a participant is a Key Employee, the "Company" shall mean the Company and its affiliates that are treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code, and for purposes of determining whether a participant is a Key Employee, Treasury Regulation  1.415(c)-2(d)(4) shall be used to calculate compensation.
 
1.8          "" means the elimination of a job due to economic reasons, whether or not as part of job elimination or restructuring, or as a reduction-in-force affecting one or more positions.  Layoff does not include resignation from employment or Separation from Service by reason of death, Disability, or discharge for Cause.  A participant is not considered to have been laid off, and will not be entitled to severance benefits described in Article 3, if the Plan Administrator determines, in its discretion, that either the Employer or a purchaser or other successor has offered comparable employment to the participant to commence after the participant's Separation from Service, whether or not the participant accepts the position offered.
Layoff
 
1.9          "" shall mean termination of employment with the Employer, other than due to death.  A participant shall be deemed to have experienced a Separation from Service if the participant's service with the Employer is reduced to an annual rate that is less than fifty percent of the services rendered, on average, during the immediately preceding three full years of employment with the Employer (or if employed by the Employer less than three years, such lesser period).
Separation from Service
 
2.1          .  To be eligible for Plan benefits, employees must serve in a job categorized as the Chief Executive Officer, Band A, or Band B under the Company's job evaluation program.  Exceptions (additions or deletions) to the eligibility requirements can be made only by the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Chief Executive Officer, with the approval of the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors (the "Committee").
Eligibility
 
2.2          .  Except as provided in Section 2.3, if the participant experiences an involuntary Separation from Service without Cause or a Separation from Service because of a Layoff, the Employer shall pay to the participant the severance benefits described in Section 3.1.  (For the purposes of this section, "involuntary" means a Separation from Service that is due to the independent exercise of the unilateral authority of the Employer, other than due to the participant's request, and where the participant was willing and able to continue to perform services.)  A participant receiving benefits under this Plan shall not be eligible for benefits under any other severance plan, policy or arrangement sponsored by the Employer.
Benefits
 
2.3          .  In the event the Employer experiences a "change in control", as defined in section 409A of the Code and the final regulations and any guidance promulgated thereunder, and the Employer and a participant have entered into an agreement concerning a change in control of the Employer, the terms of such agreement, and not this Plan, shall govern.  In such case, no benefits shall be payable to the participant under this Plan.
Change in Control
 
2.4          .  The Administrative Committee appointed by the Board of Directors, or such other committee as may be appointed by the Board of Directors from time to time, shall serve as the Plan Administrator.  The Plan Administrator is responsible for the general administration and management of this Plan and shall have all powers and duties necessary to fulfill its responsibilities, including, but not limited to, the discretion to interpret and apply this Plan and to determine all questions relating to eligibility for benefits.  This Plan shall be interpreted in accordance with its terms and their intended meanings.  However, the Plan Administrator and all plan fiduciaries shall have the discretion to interpret or construe ambiguous, unclear, or implied (but omitted) terms in any fashion they deem to be appropriate in their sole discretion, and to make any findings of fact needed in the administration of this Plan.  The validity of any such interpretation, construction, decision, or finding of fact shall not be given de novo review if challenged in court, by arbitration, or in any other forum, and shall be upheld unless clearly arbitrary or capricious.
Plan Administration
 
3.1          .  If severance benefits become payable under this Plan, benefits shall consist of the following:
Type and Amount of Benefits
3.1(a)       The participant shall receive an amount equal to six (6) months of the participant's Base Salary, one-twelfth of which shall be paid each month for a period of one year, beginning in the first month following the date of the participant's Separation from Service.  Should the participant, prior to his Separation from Service, execute (and later not revoke) a release agreement prepared by the Plan Administrator,  the participant shall receive additional amounts as follows:  (i) an amount equal to six (6) months of the participant's Base Salary, one-twelfth of which shall be paid each month for a period of one year, beginning in the first month following the date of the participant's Separation from Service; (ii) reimbursement for expenses arising from individual outplacement counseling services (in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00)) that are incurred no later than 2 years after the date of the participant's Separation from Service, and are reimbursed by the Employer no later than 3 years after the date of the participant's Separation from Service; and, (iii) a pro rated share of the award opportunity at "Target" under the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. One-Year Performance Improvement Incentive Plan that otherwise would have been payable to the participant had the participant remained employed until the end of the applicable performance period(s) of such plans.  If the release is not revoked, the payments under subsections 3.1(a)(i) and (iii) shall be payable no later than 60 days following the date of the participant's Separation from Service.  If the release is timely revoked, the participant shall not be entitled to any benefit under Section 3.1(a)(i), (ii) and (iii).  The Plan Administrator retains the sole discretion to determine when during the 60-day period the payment will be made.
Monetary Payments/Reimbursement.
 
3.1(b)(i)          .  For the period that separation payments continue under subsection 3.1(a) above, or until the participant becomes employed with another employer offering any such benefits (whichever is earlier), subject to the terms of the applicable insurance policies, the Employer shall continue to pay the premiums for Basic Group Life Insurance and Basic Accidental Death & Dismemberment Insurance at the level such coverage was in effect for the participant on the date of the participant's Separation from Service.
Benefits
 
3.1(b)(ii)         .  For a maximum period of twelve (12) months following Separation from Service, or until the participant becomes employed with another employer offering any such benefits (whichever is earlier), the Employer shall reimburse the participant for the amount of the premiums paid by the participant for post-termination continuation coverage under the Employer's group health insurance in accordance with the provisions of the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985, as amended ("COBRA").  In order to receive reimbursement, the participant must submit proof of payment to the Plan Administrator within 90 days of the payment date and the Employer will remit a check for reimbursement as soon as practicable.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event that such reimbursement by the Employer for the above COBRA continuation coverage is discriminatory pursuant to Code Section 105(h) or Section 2716 to the Public Health Service Act, then such reimbursements shall be taxable income to the participant reportable annually on a Form W-2 or as otherwise required by applicable federal and state law.  Payment of premiums for COBRA coverage beyond twelve (12) months following Separation from Service is the sole responsibility of the participant and such payment shall not be reimbursable.
Group Medical, Dental, Drug and Vision Coverage
3.1(b)(iii)        .  If the participant dies during the severance benefit period, the severance benefits as described in Section 3.1(a) that have not yet been paid shall be paid to the participant's designated beneficiary in a lump sum within 60 days following the participant's death and if the designated beneficiary is entitled pursuant to COBRA to continuation coverage, then the designated beneficiary shall have the right to continued reimbursement for the remainder of the period under Section 3.1(b)(ii) for premiums paid for COBRA continuation coverage.  In order to receive reimbursement, the beneficiary must submit proof of payment to the Plan Administrator within 90 days of the payment date and the Employer will remit a check for reimbursement as soon as practicable.  Any beneficiary designation must be provided to the Plan Administrator in writing by the participant, prior to his death.
Death Benefits
 
3.1(b)(iv)       .  To the extent that a right to reimbursement or an in-kind benefit under this Section 3.1 is subject to Code Section 409A, then (A) the amount eligible for reimbursement, or the in-kind benefit provided, during a participant's taxable year may not affect the amount reimbursable, or the in-kind benefits provided, in any other taxable year; (B) any reimbursement must be made no later than the taxable year following the taxable year in which the expenses was incurred; and (C) the right to reimbursement or the in-kind benefit cannot be liquidated or exchanged for another benefit.
Reimbursements and In-Kind Benefits
 
3.2          .  The severance benefits as described in this Article 3 may be increased or decreased by the Committee in its absolute discretion.  Such adjustments may be applied selectively with respect to one or more individual participants.
Committee Discretion
 
3.3          .  This Plan is drafted with the intent that all payments or benefits provided hereunder will be exempt from Code Section 409A to the maximum extent possible under the law, and the Plan shall be construed and operated as necessary to comply with such intent.  For purposes of Code Section 409A, all payments under the Plan shall be deemed separate payments and shall not be aggregated with any other payment.  This Plan shall be administered and interpreted to maximize the short-term deferral exemption to Section 409A.  The portion of any payment under this Plan that is paid within the short-term deferral period (within the meaning of Code Section 409A) shall be treated as a short-term deferral.  Any other portion of a payment that does not meet the short-term deferral requirement shall, to the maximum extent possible, be deemed to satisfy the exception from Code Section 409A for involuntary separation pay.  A participant shall not, directly or indirectly, designate the taxable year of a payment made under this Plan.  Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Plan, if any payment or benefit is deferred compensation subject to Section 409A, and solely to the extent required by Section 409A, if a participant is a Key Employee, then any such payments shall be delayed by six (6) months and paid on the first business day of the seventh month following the participant's Separation from Service or, if earlier, his date of death, and the amount of such accumulated delayed payments shall be credited with interest during such six-month period at a rate computed using 120% of the short-term applicable federal rate for a semi-annual compounding period under Code Section 1274(d), applicable for the month in which the participant's Separation from Service occurs, provided that such interest rate shall not exceed 120% of the long-term applicable federal interest rate under Code Section 1274(d).  The identification of a participant as a Key Employee shall be made by the Company in accordance with Section 1.7 of the Plan and sections 416(i) and 409A of the Code and the regulations promulgated thereunder.  Any provision of the Plan that is noncompliant with Code Section 409A shall be deemed to be amended to comply with Code Section 409A, or if it cannot be so amended, shall be void.  The Employer does not guarantee or warrant the tax consequences of the Plan, and the participants shall in all cases be liable for any taxes due with respect to Plan.
Code Section 409A
4.1          .  This Plan shall not be deemed to constitute an employment contract between the Employer and the participant.  Nothing contained herein shall give the participant the right to be retained in the employ of the Employer or to interfere with the right of the Employer to discharge the participant at any time, nor shall it give the Employer the right to require the participant to remain in its employ or to interfere with the participant's right to terminate employment at any time.
Right to Terminate Employment
 
4.2          .  Commencing upon the date of the participant's Separation from Service, the participant shall cease to be an employee of the Employer for any purpose.  The payment of severance benefits under this Plan shall be payments to a former employee.
Status During Benefit Period
 
5.1          .  Any individual ("claimant") who has not received benefits under the Plan that he believes should be paid shall make a claim for such benefits as follows:
Claims Procedure
 
5.1(a)     .  The claimant initiates a claim by submitting to the Plan Administrator a written claim for the benefits.
Initiation - Written Claim
 
5.1 (b)    .  The Plan Administrator shall respond to such claimant within 90 days after receiving the claim.  If the Plan Administrator determines that special circumstances require additional time for processing the claim, the Plan Administrator can extend the response period by an additional 90 days by notifying the claimant in writing, prior to the end of the initial 90-day period, that an additional period is required.  The notice of extension must set forth the date by which the Plan Administrator expects to render its decision.
Timing of Plan Administrator Response
 
5.1(c)      .  If the Plan Administrator denies part or all of the claim, the Plan Administrator shall notify the claimant in writing of such denial.  The Plan Administrator shall write the notification in a manner calculated to be understood by the claimant.  The notification shall set forth:
Notice of Decision
 
5.1(c)(i)          The specific reason for the denial,
 
5.1(c)(ii)         A reference to the specific provisions of the Plan on which the denial is based,
 
5.1(c)(iii)        A description of any additional information or material necessary for the claimant to perfect the claim and an explanation of why it is needed,
5.1(c)(iv)        An explanation of the Plan's review procedures and the time limits applicable to such procedures, and
 
5.1(c)(v)         A statement of the claimant's right to bring a civil action under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 ("ERISA") Section 502(a) following an adverse benefit determination on review.
 
5.2          .  If the Plan Administrator denies part or all of the claim, the claimant shall have the opportunity for a full and fair review by the Plan Administrator of the denial, as follows:
Review Procedure
 
5.2(a)     .  To initiate the review, the claimant, within 60 days after receiving the Plan Administrator's notice of denial, must file with the Plan Administrator a written request for review.
Initiation - Written Request
 
5.2(b)     .  The claimant shall then have the opportunity to submit written comments, documents, records and other information relating to the claim. The Plan Administrator shall also provide the claimant, upon request and free of charge, reasonable access to, and copies of, all documents, records and other information relevant (as defined in applicable ERISA regulations) to the claimant's claim for benefits.
Additional Submissions - Information Access
 
5.2(c)      .  The Plan Administrator shall respond to the claimant's request for review within 60 days after receiving the request.  If the Plan Administrator determines that special circumstances require additional time for processing the request, the Plan Administrator can extend the response period by an additional 60 days by notifying the claimant in writing, prior to the end of the initial 60-day period, which an additional period is required.  The notice of extension must set forth the date by which the Plan Administrator expects to render its decision.
Timing of  Plan Administrator Response
 
5.2(d)     .  If the Plan Administrator affirms the denial of part or the entire claim, the Plan Administrator shall notify the claimant in writing of such denial.  The Plan Administrator shall write the notification in a manner calculated to be understood by the claimant.  The notification shall set forth the specific reason for the denial and a reference to the specific provisions of the Plan on which the denial is based.
Notice of Decision
 
5.3          .  In determining whether to approve or deny any claim or any appeal from a denied claim, the Plan Administrator shall exercise its discretionary authority to interpret the Plan and the facts presented with respect to the claim, and its discretionary authority to determine eligibility for benefits under the Plan.  Any approval or denial shall be final and conclusive upon all persons.
Authority
 
5.4          .  Except as required by applicable law, no action at law or equity shall be brought to recover a benefit under the Plan unless and until the claimant has: (a) submitted a claim for benefits, (b) been notified by the Plan Administrator that the benefits (or a portion thereof) are denied, (c) filed a written request for a review of denial with the Plan Administrator, and (d) been notified in writing that the denial has been affirmed.
Exhaustion of Remedies
It is intended that the Plan shall continue from year to year, subject to an annual review by the Board of Directors.  However, the Board of Directors reserves the right to modify, amend or terminate the Plan at any time; provided, that no amendment or termination shall affect the rights of participants to receive Plan benefits finally determined by the Plan Administrator but unpaid at the time of such termination or amendment.
 
7.1          .  The adoption and maintenance of this Plan shall not be deemed to confer on any participant any right to continue in the employ of the Employer, and shall not be deemed to interfere with the right of the Employer to discharge any person, with or without cause, or treat any person without regard to the effect that such treatment might have on the person as a Plan participant.
Not an Employment Contract
 
7.2            No right or interest of a participant in this Plan shall be assignable or transferable, in whole or in part, either directly or by operation of law or otherwise, including but not by way of limitation, execution, levy, garnishment, attachment, pledge, bankruptcy, assignments for the benefit of creditors, receiverships, or in any other manner, excluding transfer by operation of law as a result solely of mental incompetency.
Benefits Non-Assignable
.
 
7.3          .  The Employer shall withhold any applicable income or employment taxes that are required to be withheld from the severance benefits payable under this Plan.
Tax Withholding
 
7.4          .  This Plan is a welfare plan subject to ERISA and it shall be interpreted, administered, and enforced in accordance with that law.
Applicable Law
 
7.5  Any masculine pronouns used herein shall refer to both men and women, and the use of any term herein in the singular may also include the plural unless otherwise indicated by context.
         
Gender and Number
.
 
7.6  If any provision of this Plan is held invalid or unenforceable by a court of competent jurisdiction, all remaining provisions shall continue to be fully effective.
         
Severability
.
 
7.7  This Plan shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company, its successors and assigns, and the participants and their heirs, executors, administrators and legal representatives.
         
Binding Agreement
.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. has caused this Plan to be executed by its duly authorized officers effective as of the 29
th
 day of June, 2012.
 
 

Exhibit 10.3
 
 
I.
                                       
Establishment and Purpose
 
A.
                                   
Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. (the "Company") has established its One-Year Performance Improvement Incentive Plan (the "Plan"), effective June 29, 2012.
 
B.
                                   
The purpose of this Plan is to motivate employees to exceed business plan performance and to provide a reward to individuals for their successful results.  Further, the Plan is intended to:
 
1.
                                     
Communicate and reinforce the changing management style and direction the Company is to take.
 
2.
                                     
Emphasize current and future profitability, improvement or desirable change.
 
3.
                                     
Improve the planning process throughout the Company.
 
4.
                                     
Reinforce the implementation of business plans.
 
5.
                                     
Reward Company, unit and individual performance above that which is expected.
 
C.
                                   
It is further intended that this Plan will complement other compensation program components to assure a sound basis upon which the Company will attract and retain key employees.
 
II.
                                  
Administration
 
A.
                                   
The Compensation Committee (the "Committee") of the Company's Board of Directors (the "Board of Directors") shall have responsibility for administration of this Plan.  Under the direction of this Committee, the corporate officer in charge of the compensation programs of the Company and other executives designated by the Chief Executive Officer of the Company shall develop and maintain guidelines for the administration of the Plan and will perform day-to-day administrative details as required.
 
B.
                                   
The Committee shall interpret the Plan, make or approve procedures and guidelines relating to it, and make any factual determinations arising in connection with it.  The Committee's interpretations and determinations shall be final and binding.
 
III.
                             
Eligibility
 
A.
                                   
Employees must have served with the Company or its subsidiaries in an eligible assignment for the full Plan Year to be eligible for an award.   A Plan Year is a calendar year.   An eligible assignment is a job categorized as the CEO, Band A, or Band B under the Company's job evaluation program.
B.
                                   
Employees must be on the payroll at the time awards are paid for the previous Plan Year, except that employees who have become permanently and totally disabled, taken approved early retirement or normal retirement, or died during the Plan Year for which the award is made shall be eligible to receive a pro-rata award based on their performance and their term of service during that Plan Year.
 
C.
                                   
Exceptions (additions or deletions) to the eligibility requirements of A above can be made only by the Chief Executive Officer, with the approval of the Committee.
 
IV.
                              
Goals (Objectives)
 
The goals used as the basis of this Plan shall be derived from the Company's business plan and from the business plan of each operating unit of the Company, which will identify those measures most critical to the Company's success for the coming year.  These goals will be established with respect to the performance of the Company as a whole, the performance of each operating unit, and the performance of each individual participant.
 
V.
                                   
Awards
 
A.
                                   
Opportunity
 
For each goal established for the participant pursuant to Section IV, a bonus opportunity (stated as a dollar amount or percentage of salary) will be set at one or more levels based on corresponding levels of attainment of that goal. For example, a target level bonus may be set for target level attainment of each established goal.  Accordingly, each participant's maximum award under the Plan for a particular Plan Year shall be equal to the sum of the maximum level of bonus opportunity set for each goal established for him or her for that Plan Year.
 
B.
                                   
Determination
 
1.
                                     
Individual Bonus Calculation
. At the end of each Plan Year, the Committee shall determine the actual level of attainment of each of the goals established for the participant for that Plan Year.  Based on the Committee's determination of the attained level of each goal, an initial calculation shall be made of the bonus amount attributable to that goal, and the participant's potential bonus amount for that Plan Year shall be equal to sum of those individually calculated bonus amounts.  However, the actual bonus amount to be paid to the participant shall be subject to his or her satisfaction of the employment requirement set forth in Section III.B, and any adjustments effected by the Committee pursuant to Section V.B.2.
 
2.
                                     
Committee Discretion
.  The award calculated for each participant pursuant to Section V.B.1 may be increased or decreased by the Committee in its absolute discretion if such award does not, in the judgment of the Committee, accurately reflect the performance of the Company or of the applicable operating unit or individual (e.g., because of changes in accounting rules, extraordinary gains from the sale of Company assets, or other similar or dissimilar circumstances occurring during the Plan Year which may or may not have been beyond the control of the Company, the operating unit, or the individual participant).  Such adjustments by the Committee may be applied uniformly with respect to all participants, or such adjustment may be applied selectively with respect to one or more individual participants.
 
C.
                                   
Payments
 
Awards shall be paid only in cash, with such cash payment to be made at the time the award is determined.  Participants will not be permitted to receive any portion of their awards in the form of the Company's common stock.
 
VI.
                              
General Provisions
 
A.
                                   
Nothing herein contained shall be construed to limit or affect in any manner or degree the normal and usual powers of management, exercised by the officers and the Board of Directors or committees thereof, to change the duties or the character of employment of any employee of the Company or to terminate a participant's employment with the Company at any time, all of which rights and powers are hereby expressly reserved.
 
B.
                                   
It is intended that the Plan shall continue from year to year, subject to an annual review by the Board of Directors.  However, the Board of Directors reserves the right to modify, amend or terminate the Plan at any time; provided, that no amendment or termination shall affect the rights of participants to receive awards finally determined by the Committee but unpaid at the time of such termination or amendment.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. has caused this Plan to be executed by its duly authorized officers effective this 29
th
 day of June, 2012.
 

Exhibit 10.4
 
 
 
1.01.
                    
Establishment of Plan
.
  Pursuant to a corporate reorganization, Alexander & Baldwin, Inc., a Hawaii corporation incorporated in 1900 ("Original A&B"), became a wholly-owned subsidiary of Alexander & Baldwin Holdings, Inc. ("Holdings") and Original A&B was converted into Alexander & Baldwin, LLC.  As part of the reorganization, Holdings assumed all the liabilities under the A&B Excess Benefits Plan (the "Prior Plan").  On the Distribution Date (as defined below), Holdings separated from Alexander & Baldwin, Inc., a Hawaii corporation incorporated in 2012 ("A&B"), and the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Excess Benefits Plan (the "Plan") was established effective as of the Distribution Date.  As part of the separation from Holdings, A&B has assumed that the portion of the liabilities of the Prior Plan attributable to "New A&B Participants" (as defined in the Employee Matters Agreement by and between Holdings and A&B dated as of June 8, 2012) (the "Assumed Liabilities"). On and after the Distribution Date, all participants' Assumed Liabilities shall be payable from this Plan rather than the Prior Plan.
 
1.02.
                    
Purpose of Plan
.
  It is the purpose of this Plan to provide certain eligible executives with benefits equal to the benefits they would receive under the A&B Retirement Plan for Salaried Employees (and each constituent qualified pension plan), the Pension Plan for Employees of A&B Agricultural Companies, and the A&B Individual Deferred Compensation and Profit Sharing Plan for Salaried Non-Bargaining Employees if amendments to those plans did not apply to certain Participants, and certain limitations under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, did not apply.  The Plan is intended to be exempt from the participation, vesting, funding, and fiduciary requirements of Title I of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("ERISA"), pursuant to Sections 201(2), 301(3) and 401(1) of ERISA.
 
 
 
The following terms have the meanings indicated:
 
2.00.
                    
"Actuarial Equivalent" means a form of benefit differing in time period, or manner of payment from a specified benefit provided in the Plan, but having the same present value when determined in accordance with generally accepted actuarial practice and the rules contained in Appendix A of this Plan.
 
2.01.
                    
"A&B Master Trust Agreement" means the Alexander & Baldwin Retirement and Pension Trust Agreement, as amended from time to time.
2.02.
                    
"A&B Retirement Plan" means the A&B Retirement Plan for Salaried Employees (and each constituent qualified pension plan) and the Pension Plan for Employees of A&B Agricultural Companies, as applicable, and as each may be amended from time to time.
 
2.03.
                    
"A&B Profit Sharing Plan" means the A&B Individual Deferred Compensation and Profit Sharing Plan for Salaried Non-Bargaining Employees, as amended from time to time.
 
2.04.
                    
"Administrator" means the person specified in Section 5.01.
 
2.05.
                    
"Beneficiary" means the person or persons designated by the Participant as such in accordance with the provisions of Section 4.01(d) and to whom the benefit, if any, provided for in Section 4.01(c) is payable.
 
2.06.
                    
"Board of Directors" means the Board of Directors of A&B.
 
2.07.
                    
"Code" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
 
2.08.
                    
"Committee" means the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors.
 
2.09.
                    
"Distribution Date" shall mean June 29, 2012, or such later date as Holdings distributes its interest in A&B to Holdings' shareholders.
 
2.10.
                    
"Employer" means A&B or the entity for whom services are performed and with respect to whom the legally binding right to compensation arises, and all entities with whom A&B would be considered a single employer under Section 414(b) of the Code; provided that in applying Section 1563(a)(1), (2), and (3) of the Code for purposes of determining a controlled group of corporations under Section 414(b) of the Code, the language "at least 50 percent" is used instead of "at least 80 percent" each place it appears in Section 1563(a)(1), (2), and (3) of the Code, and in applying Treasury Regulation  1.414(c)-2 for purposes of determining trades or businesses (whether or not incorporated) that are under common control for purposes of Section 414(c) of the Code, "at least 50 percent" is used instead of "at least 80 percent" each place it appears in Treasury Regulation  1.414(c)-2; provided, however, "at least 20 percent" shall replace "at least 50 percent" in the preceding clause if there is a legitimate business criteria for using such lower percentage.
 
2.11.
                    
"Fair Market Value" means, with respect to the per share valuation of Original A&B common stock on any relevant date, the mean between the highest and lowest selling prices per share of Original A&B common stock on such date, as quoted on the Nasdaq National Market or the NYSE (or any successor system), as applicable.  Should Original A&B common stock become traded on a national securities exchange, then the Fair Market Value per share shall be the mean between the highest and lowest selling prices on such exchange on the date in question, as such prices are quoted on the composite tape of transactions on such exchange.  If there is no reported sale of Original A&B common stock on the Nasdaq National
 
Market or the NYSE (or any successor system), as applicable, on the date in question, then the Fair Market Value shall be the mean between the highest and lowest selling prices on the Nasdaq National Market or the NYSE (or any successor system), as applicable, on the last preceding date for which such quotation exists.
 
2.12.
                    
Identification Date" means each December 31.
 
2.13.
                    
"Key Employee" means a Participant who, on an Identification Date, is:
 
(i)
                                    
An officer of A&B having annual compensation greater than the compensation limit in Section 416(i)(1)(A)(i) of the Code, provided that no more than fifty officers of A&B shall be determined to be Key Employees as of any Identification Date;
 
(ii)
                                 
A five percent owner of A&B; or
 
(iii)
                              
A one percent owner of A&B having annual compensation from A&B of more than $150,000.
 
If a Participant is identified as a Key Employee on an Identification Date, then such Participant shall be considered a Key Employee for purposes of the Plan during the period beginning on the first April 1 following the Identification Date and ending on the next March 31.  For purposes of this Section 2.13 only and for determining whether a Participant is a Key Employee, "A&B" shall mean A&B and its affiliates that are treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code, and for purposes of determining whether a Participant is a Key Employee, Treasury Regulation  1.415(c)-2(d)(4) shall be used to calculate compensation.
 
2.14.
                    
"Participant" means an eligible employee selected by the Administrator pursuant to Section 3.02.
 
2.15.
                    
"Plan" means this Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Excess Benefits Plan, as amended from time to time.
 
2.16.
                    
"Section 16 Insider" means any Participant who is, at the time of the relevant determination or was at any time within the immediately preceding six (6) months, an officer or director of the Employer subject to the short-swing profit restrictions of Section 16(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
 
2.17.
                 
"Separation from Service" means termination of employment with the Employer, other than due to death.  A Participant shall be deemed to have experienced a Separation from Service if the Participant's service with the Employer is reduced to an annual rate that is less than fifty percent of the services rendered, on average, during the immediately preceding three full years of employment with the Employer (or if employed by the Employer less than three years, such lesser period).
3.01.
                    
Eligibility.
 
Effective January 1, 2012, any salaried non-bargaining unit employee of the Employer who is a participant in the A&B Retirement Plan or the A&B Profit Sharing Plan and who is part of a select group of management employees or highly compensated employees shall be eligible to participate in this Plan.  Prior to January 1, 2012, an employee who was eligible for cash balance formula benefits under the A&B Retirement Plan was not eligible for benefits described under Section 4.01.
 
3.02.
                    
Participation
.
  Participants in this Plan shall be any eligible employees who have been assigned at least three hundred and fifty (350) accountability points under the Employer's job evaluation program.  In addition, the Administrator shall have the exclusive and unfettered discretion to select additional Plan Participants from among eligible employees.  A Participant in this Plan shall remain as such until the date he ceases to satisfy the participation requirements in the first sentence of this Section 3.02, until the date upon which the Participant experiences a Separation from Service for any reason or until such earlier time as may be specified by the Administrator.
 
 
 
4.01.
                    
Pension Benefits
.
 
(a)
                                 
Entitlement to Pension Benefits
.
  Except as provided in Section 4.01(c) below, a Participant who was hired, rehired or transferred to salaried, non-bargaining unit employment prior to January 1, 2008 and never accrued a cash balance formula benefit under the A&B Retirement Plan shall receive a pension benefit described in paragraph (1) below.  A Participant who was hired, rehired or transferred to salaried, non-bargaining unit employment prior to January 1, 2008 and began accruing a cash balance formula benefit under the A&B Retirement Plan effective January 1, 2012 and has not received payment of his benefit described under Section 4.01, shall receive a pension benefit equal to the sum of the amounts described in paragraphs (1) and (2) below.  A Participant who was hired, rehired or transferred to salaried, non-bargaining unit employment on or after January 1, 2008 and is not described in the preceding sentence shall receive a pension benefit described in paragraph (3) below. A Participant who was hired, rehired or transferred to salaried, non-bargaining unit employment prior to January 1, 2008, was not in covered employment on January 1, 2012, but returned to covered employment prior to receiving payment of his benefit under Section 4.01, shall receive a pension benefit equal to the sum of the amounts described in paragraphs (1) and (3) below.  Except as otherwise provided in Sections 4.01(c) and 6.02(a), for purposes of paragraphs (1), (2) and (3) below, all determinations shall be made as of the first day of the month following the Participant's date of Separation from Service.  In addition, the amount of the pension benefit determined under paragraph (1) below shall be the Actuarial Equivalent lump sum payment.
(1) One hundred percent of the difference between (A) the traditional pension benefit to which the Participant is entitled under the A&B Retirement Plan (based on the accrued benefit as of December 31, 2011) determined without regard to limitations imposed by the Code and determined by including as part of the Participant's monthly compensation all deferred base salary and all deferred incentive awards under the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. One-Year Performance Improvement Incentive Plan and the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Annual Incentive Plan and (B) the traditional pension benefit to which the Participant is entitled under the A&B Retirement Plan (based on the accrued benefit as of December 31, 2011) determined solely based on terms of such plan without the modifications described above in this paragraph (1).
 
(2) One hundred percent of the difference between (A) the cash balance account to which the Participant is entitled under the A&B Retirement Plan determined without regard to limitations imposed by the Code and determined by including as part of the Participant's compensation all deferred base salary and all deferred incentive awards under the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. One-Year Performance Improvement Incentive Plan and the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Annual Incentive Plan and (B) the cash balance account to which the Participant is entitled under the A&B Retirement Plan determined solely based on terms of such plan without the modifications described above in this paragraph (2).
 
(3) One hundred percent of the difference between (A) the cash balance account the Participant would have accrued under the A&B Retirement Plan if he were hired on the later of the date he became a salaried, non-bargaining unit employee or January 1, 2012, determined without regard to limitations imposed by the Code and determined by including as part of the Participant's compensation all deferred base salary and all deferred incentive awards under the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. One-Year Performance Improvement Incentive Plan and the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Annual Incentive Plan and (B) the Participant's cash balance account he would have accrued under the A&B Retirement Plan if he were hired on the later of the date he became a salaried, non-bargaining unit employee or January 1, 2012, determined solely based on terms of such plan without the modifications described in clause (A) above in this paragraph (3).
 
(b)
                                
Payment of Pension Benefits Other Than Death Benefits
.
   A Participant's vested pension benefit under this Plan, other than the benefits described in Section 4.01(c) below, shall be a lump sum payment, payable within 60 days following the Participant's Separation from Service, equal to the amount determined under Section 4.01(a) above.  The Administrator retains the sole discretion to determine when during such 60-day period the payment will be made and, in no event, will the Participant have any right to designate the taxable year in which such payment is made.
 
Notwithstanding any other provision in this Article IV to the contrary, any distribution scheduled to be made upon Separation from Service to a Participant who is identified as a Key Employee as of the date he experiences a Separation from Service shall be delayed for a minimum of six months following the Participant's Separation from Service.  Any payment to a Key Employee delayed under this Section 4.01(b) shall be made on the first business day after
 
the six-month anniversary of the Participant's Separation from Service and such payment shall be credited with interest at a rate computed using 120% of the short-term applicable federal rate for a semi-annual compounding period under Section 1274(d) of the Code, applicable for the month in which the Participant's Separation from Service occurs, provided that such interest rate shall not exceed 120% of the long-term applicable federal interest rate under Section 1274(d) of the Code.  The identification of a Participant as a Key Employee shall be made by A&B, in its sole discretion, in accordance with Section 2.13 of the Plan and Sections 416(i) and 409A of the Code and the regulations promulgated thereunder.
In the event that a Participant, who is also a Key Employee, dies prior to the expiration of the six-month delay period described in this Section 4.01(b), the benefit which would have been otherwise distributed to the deceased Participant shall be distributed to the Participant's Beneficiary within 60 days following the Participant's death.  The Administrator retains the sole discretion to determine when during the 60-day period the payment will be made.
 
(c)
                                 
Entitlement to Alternate Death Benefits
.
  In the event that a Participant dies prior to a Separation from Service, such Participant's Beneficiary shall be entitled to a death benefit determined under this Section 4.01(c) in lieu of any other benefit provided by this Plan.
 
(1)
                                 
The amount of the benefit provided by this Section 4.01(c) shall equal the lump sum payment, if any, to which the Participant would have been eligible if he had experienced a Separation from Service, immediately prior to his death.
 
(2)
                                 
The amount in Section 4.01(c)(1) above shall be determined by assuming the Participant elected a single life annuity form of payment for the traditional pension benefit and a lump sum for the cash balance account.
 
(3)
                                 
Payment of this benefit shall be made in a lump sum payment to the Beneficiary as soon as practicable after the death of the Participant; provided, however, that such payment shall not be made later than 60 days following the Participant's death.  The Administrator retains the sole discretion to determine when during the 60-day period the payment will be made.  A Beneficiary may not, under any circumstances, change the time and form of the payment of this benefit.
 
(d)
                                
Beneficiary Designation
.
  Each Participant shall, at the time he becomes a Participant, designate one or more persons as his Beneficiary for purposes of Section 4.01(c).  The designation shall be made in the form prescribed by the Administrator and shall become effective when filed with the Administrator.  The form must be received by the Administrator prior to the Participant's death.  A Participant may from time to time change his Beneficiary by filing a new designation form with the Administrator.  Should the Participant die without having any effectively-designated surviving Beneficiary, then the Beneficiary shall be the spouse of the Participant, if then living.  If there is no surviving spouse, then the Beneficiary shall be the Participant's children then living.  If there are no living children, then the Beneficiary shall be the estate of the Participant.
4.02.
                    
Defined Contribution Benefits
.
 
(a)
                                 
Entitlement to Defined Contribution Benefits
.
  A Participant's defined contribution benefit under this Plan shall equal the balance to the Participant's credit in the account maintained under Section 4.03.
 
No amount shall be credited to a Participant's account for a year unless the Participant is a participant in the A&B Profit Sharing Plan for that year.
 
(b)
                                
Payment of Defined Contribution Benefits
.
  Except as provided in the next sentence, a Participant's defined contribution benefits shall be paid in a lump sum as soon as practicable following the Participant's Separation from Service; provided, however, that such payment shall not be made later than 60 days following the Participant's Separation from Service.  The Administrator retains the sole discretion to determine when during the 60-day period the payment will be made.  Notwithstanding any other provision in this Article IV to the contrary, any distribution scheduled to be made upon Separation from Service to a Participant who is identified as a Key Employee as of the date he experiences a Separation from Service shall be delayed for a minimum of six months following the Participant's Separation from Service.  Any payment to a Key Employee delayed under this Section 4.02 shall be made, with interest computed at the rate set forth in Section 4.01(b) of this Plan, on the first business day after the six-month anniversary of the Participant's Separation from Service.  The identification of a Participant as a Key Employee shall be made by A&B in accordance with Section 2.13 of the Plan and Sections 416(i) and 409A of the Code and the regulations promulgated thereunder.
 
4.03.
                    
Maintenance of Accounts
.
  The Administrator shall establish and maintain an individual account for each Participant.  The Administrator shall annually credit to a Participant's account as of the end of each year an amount equal to the difference between (i) the employer contribution and forfeitures that would have been allocated to such Participant's account under the A&B Profit Sharing Plan with respect to such year were such allocation to be made without regard to the limitations of Sections 401(a)(17) and 415 of the Code and (ii) the amount actually allocated to such Participant's account after having taken such limitations into account.  For the purposes of this Plan, the benefit to which the Participant is entitled under the A&B Profit Sharing Plan shall be determined by including as part of the Participant's compensation all deferred base salary.  Subject to the provisions stated below, and pursuant to procedures determined by the Committee, or by the committee or individual(s) to which such authority is delegated, the Participant may make an election ("Conversion Election") to have all or any portion of the amount that is credited to his account, converted into common stock-equivalent units which will be valued from time to time on the basis of the Fair Market Value of Original A&B common stock.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, effective February 1, 2012, a Participant may not make a Conversion Election with respect to amounts credited to his account under the Plan, and all existing common stock equivalent units in a Participant's account will be converted to cash credits equal to the Fair Market Value of an equivalent number of shares of Original A&B common stock as of the first day of the month after A&B notifies all affected Participants of such conversion or such later date as required by any applicable securities laws (the "Conversion Date").  Effective as of the Conversion Date, the portion of a Participant's account so converted to cash credits shall begin to earn interest in accordance with paragraph (a) below and shall cease earning dividend-equivalent credits in accordance with paragraph (b) below.
From time to time, the value of each account shall be adjusted to reflect an investment return on the balance credited to such account, and such value and adjustments periodically shall be communicated to each Participant.  Such periodic valuation shall be made as follows:
 
(a)
                                 
Profit Sharing Cash Account
. The portion of the Participant's account valued in cash shall be credited with interest, compounded annually, at an annual rate equal to 1% above the New York Federal Reserve Bank discount rate in effect as of the date interest is computed and credited.  Interest shall be computed and credited as of such date and on such account balance as specified by the Administrator.  In the absence of such specifications, interest shall be credited and computed as of January 1 of each year on the balance of the account on the preceding January 1 or, if payments have been made out of an account during the preceding year, on the average balance of that account during the preceding year.
 
(b)
                                
Common Stock-Equivalent Units
 
(1)
                                 
The common stock-equivalent units will be credited, at the time dividends are paid on outstanding shares of Original A&B common stock, with an amount ("dividend-equivalent credits") equal to the dividends which otherwise would be paid if the number of common stock-equivalent units in the Participant's account were actually outstanding shares of Original A&B common stock.
 
(2)
                                 
Dividend-equivalent credits will be applied in the manner of a dividend reinvestment plan to purchase additional common stock-equivalent units valued at Fair Market Value on the applicable dividend payment date.
 
(3)
                                 
Pursuant to procedures determined by the Committee, or by the committee or individual(s) to which such authority is delegated, a Participant may elect to have all or a portion of the Participant's common stock-equivalent units converted into cash on the basis of the Fair Market Value (at date of conversion) of the shares of Original A&B common stock represented by such units; provided, however, that Participants may not make such an election if they are Section 16 Insiders at the time of such election.  Any portion so converted to cash shall begin to earn interest in accordance with paragraph (a) above, and shall stop earning dividend-equivalent credits.
 
(4)
                                 
Any common stock-equivalent units credited to a Participant's account shall automatically be converted into cash, on the basis of the Fair Market Value (at the date of conversion) of the shares of Original A&B common stock represented by such units, upon the Participant's Separation from Service with the Employer for any reason.  Any amounts so converted to cash shall begin to earn interest in accordance with paragraph (a) above.
The account of each Participant shall be entered on the employer's books as a liability, payable when due out of general assets.  Participant accounts shall not be funded by any trust or insurance contract; nor shall any assets be segregated or identified with any such account; nor shall any property or assets be pledged, encumbered, or otherwise subjected to a lien or security interest for payment of benefits.
 
4.04.
                    
Vesting of Benefits
.
  Except as otherwise provided in Section 6.02(a), all pension benefits under Section 4.01 of the Plan shall be contingent and forfeitable unless and until they vest in accordance with the vesting provisions of the A&B Retirement Plan, and all defined contribution benefits under Section 4.02 of the Plan shall be contingent and forfeitable unless and until they vest in accordance with the vesting provisions of the A&B Profit Sharing Plan that are applicable to the Participant's profit sharing account.
 
5.01.
                    
Administrator
.
  The Administrative Committee appointed by the Board of Directors (or such other committee as may be appointed from time to time by the Board of Directors) shall be the "Administrator" of this Plan.  The Administrator shall have full authority to administer the Plan.  The Administrator shall have all of the powers granted by the A&B Retirement Plan or the A&B Master Trust Agreement to the plan administrator of the A&B Retirement Plan, and shall be subject to the same selection procedures and limitations of authority.  The Administrator shall employ the same claims procedure applicable under the A&B Retirement Plan.
 
5.02.
                    
Authority
.  In determining whether to approve or deny any claim or any appeal from a denied claim, the Administrator shall exercise its sole and discretionary authority to interpret the Plan and the facts presented with respect to the claim, and its discretionary authority to determine eligibility for benefits under the Plan.  Any approval or denial shall be final and conclusive upon all persons.
 
5.03.
                    
Exhaustion of Remedies
.  No action at law or equity shall be brought to recover benefits under the Plan unless the action is commenced within three (3) years after the occurrence of the loss for which a claim is made.  Except as required by applicable law, no action at law or equity shall be brought to recover a benefit under the Plan unless and until the claimant has: (a) submitted a claim for benefits, (b) been notified by the Administrator that the benefits (or a portion thereof) are denied, (c) filed a written request for a review of denial with the Administrator, and (d) been notified in writing that the denial has been affirmed.
 
 
6.01.
                    
Authority of the Committee
.
  The right to amend, modify, partially terminate, or completely terminate this Plan shall be reserved to the Committee.  However, no amendment, modification or termination shall reduce retroactively the accrued benefits of any Participant under this Plan.
 
6.02.
                    
Change In Control
.
 
(a)
                                 
Termination, Vesting and Payment
. 
Upon the occurrence of a Change In Control, as defined in Section 6.02(b), the Plan shall immediately and automatically terminate.  Upon such a termination, the interest of each Participant employed by the Employer with respect to which the Plan has been terminated shall become non-forfeitable and immediately due and payable.  Each such Participant shall receive, within thirty days of such termination, a lump sum payment in an amount equal to the sum of (i) the balance of his individual account as described in Sections 4.02 and 4.03 and (ii) the pension benefit described under Section 4.01(a) of the Plan, all determined as of the date of the Change In Control.  If the terms of such Change In Control provide, as a prerequisite to the consummation of the Change In Control, that the employer responsibilities under this Plan are to be assumed by the successor organization, then the Plan shall not terminate and no lump sum payment shall be made to any Participant.  In any such case, however, the interest of each Participant shall become non forfeitable at the date of such Change In Control.
 
(b)
                                
Definition of Change In Control
.
  For purposes of this Section 6.02, a "Change In Control" means with respect to A&B a "change in the ownership or effective control of a corporation, or a change in the ownership of a substantial portion of the assets of a corporation" as defined in Section 409A of the Code and the final regulations and any guidance promulgated thereunder.
 
 
 
7.01.
                    
Benefits Non-Assignable
.
  No Participant or Beneficiary, or any other person having or claiming to have any interest of any kind or character in or under this Plan or in any payment therefrom shall have the right to sell, assign, transfer, convey, hypothecate, anticipate, pledge or otherwise dispose of such interest (except for a qualified domestic relations order); and to the extent permitted by law, such interest shall not be subject to any liabilities or obligations of the Participant or to any bankruptcy proceedings, creditor claims, attachment, garnishments, execution, levy or other legal process against such Participant or his property.
 
7.02.
                    
Controlling Law
.
  This Plan shall be construed, administered, and governed in all respects in accordance with the laws of the State of Hawaii except as otherwise provided in ERISA.  The Plan shall also be construed in a manner that is consistent and
 
compliant with Section 409A of the Code, and any regulations promulgated thereunder.  Any provision that is noncompliant with Section 409A of the Code is void or deemed amended to comply with Section 409A of the Code.  The Employer does not guarantee or warrant the tax consequences of the Plan, and the Participants shall in all cases be liable with respect to any taxes due under the Plan.
 
7.03.
                    
Not an Employment Contract
.
  The adoption and maintenance of this Plan shall not be deemed to confer on any Participant any right to continue in the employ of the Employer, and shall not be deemed to interfere with the right of the Employer to discharge any person, with or without cause, or treat any person without regard to the effect that such treatment might have on the person as a Plan Participant.
 
7.04.
                    
Gender and Number
.
  Any masculine pronouns used herein shall refer to both men and women, and the use of any term herein in the singular may also include the plural unless otherwise indicated by context.
 
7.05.
                    
Severability
.
  If any provision of this Plan is held invalid or unenforceable by a court of competent jurisdiction, all remaining provisions shall continue to be fully effective.
 
7.06.
                    
Binding Agreement
.
  This Plan shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Employer, its successors and assigns, and the Participants and their heirs, executors, administrators and legal representatives.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. has caused this Plan to be executed on its behalf by its duly authorized officers, effective as of  June 29, 2012 .
 
When the terms of this Plan require the determination of a lump sum payment (other than a lump sum attributable to a cash balance account) which is the Actuarial Equivalent of any benefit provided by this Plan, the following rules shall apply to the calculation of such lump sum payment:
 
1.
                                                
The mortality table used shall be the mortality table then in use by the A&B Retirement Plan for the purpose of determining lump sum payments to participants of such plan who are entitled to such payments.
 
2.
                                                
The discount rate shall be the after-tax equivalent of the discount rate then in use by the A&B Retirement Plan for the purpose of determining lump sum payments to participants of such plan who are entitled to such payments.  The after-tax equivalent rate shall be determined by multiplying discount rate in use by the A&B Retirement Plan by the excess of 100% over the effective marginal tax rate declared by the Committee.
 
3.
                                                
The Committee shall declare the effective marginal tax rate at the beginning of each calendar year.
 
4.
                                                
The effective marginal tax rate shall apply to lump sum payments made at any time during such calendar year and may not be changed during the year.
 
5.
                                                
For a Participant who elects to commence pension benefits from the A&B Retirement Plan on the first day of the month following his Separation from Service under an annuity form of payment, the lump sum payment shall be based on the same annuity form of payment.  For a Participant who elects to commence pension benefits from the A&B Retirement Plan on the first day of the month following his Separation from Service under the lump sum form of payment, the lump sum payment from this Plan shall be based on the single life annuity form of payment.  For a Participant who does not elect to commence pension benefits from the A&B Retirement Plan on the first day of the month following his Separation from Service, the lump sum payment shall be based on the single life annuity form of payment.
 
6.
                                                
If the terms of the Plan provide for a benefit such that if it were paid as a monthly benefit it could have commenced at more that one future date, then for purposes of calculating the lump sum that is the Actuarial Equivalent of such benefit, it shall be deemed that the benefit would have commenced at the earliest possible date.
 
7.
                                      
The early retirement reduction factors, if any, used to calculate the lump sum which is the Actuarial Equivalent of the benefit provided by the provisions of Section 6.02(a) as a result of a Change In Control, shall be the factors applicable to Participants of the A&B Retirement Plan who terminate employment after attaining eligibility for early retirement regardless of the Participant's age as of the Change In Control date.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALEX/ALEX-8K-20120801160818.txt.gz
TIME:20120801160818
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2.):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.  Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. issued a press release on August 1, 2012 announcing its 2012 second quarter earnings.  This information is being furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report.
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)           Exhibits
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date:  August 1, 2012
ALEXANDER & BALDWIN, INC.
                                                    
/s/ Paul K. Ito
Paul K. Ito
Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer,
Treasurer and Controller

(A&B or Company) today announced results for the second quarter of 2012.
Honolulu (August 1, 2012) -- Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. (NYSE:ALEX)
As previously reported, we successfully completed the separation of Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. and Matson, Inc. at the end of the second quarter, which created two Hawaii-based companies, each with a market capitalization of over a billion dollars, said Stanley M. Kuriyama, chairman and chief executive officer of Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Notwithstanding the focus on separation and the resultant impact on financial results, our operations performed well in the quarter, with a number of positive milestones achieved in our development and sales segment, coupled with steady operating performance in our leasing and agribusiness segments.
 Included in results for the second quarter were two charges related to separation that caused the Company to report a net loss:  (1) one-time advisory, legal, equity conversion and other expenses that were incurred to effect the separation, and (2) a non-cash reduction in the carrying value of two non-strategic development projects in California that do not align with the Companys post-separation focus on Hawaii real estate development. The Companys net income, adjusted to exclude the effects of these separation-related charges, was $5.5 million, or $0.13 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2012. On an unadjusted basis, the Company incurred a net loss of $4.4 million, or $0.10 per diluted share, compared to net income for the second quarter of 2011 of $12.3 million, or $0.29 per diluted share. Revenue for the second quarter of 2012 was $72.4 million, compared to $73.2 million last year.
1
Key operating accomplishments in the second quarter included the following:
 
 
 
 
 
 
As previously disclosed, the Company also was successful in establishing a $260 million revolving credit facility to fund future operating and investment needs and extending maturities for $207 million of existing long-term notes. These arrangements, together with cash generated by our businesses, provide a strong financial platform from which to pursue current and future growth opportunities, said Kuriyama.
 
Second Quarter Financial Results
 
Real estate leasing operating profit in the quarter of $10.5 million was modestly higher than the $10.4 million recorded last year. Hawaii occupancy of 91 percent and Mainland occupancy of 93 percent in the second quarter of 2012 were consistent with last year and the first quarter of 2012. During the quarter, the Company renewed its one million square-foot warehouse lease in Savannah, Georgia, with Matson Logistics, reducing lease rollover exposure in 2013 by nearly 50 percent. The lease now runs through March 2017.
Results in the real estate development and sales segment include a $9.8 million non-cash reduction in the carrying value of two of the Companys three remaining development projects on the Mainland, resulting in an operating loss of $9.9 million for the quarter, compared to operating profit of $10.6 million last year. The projects consist of vacant lands in Santa Barbara and Bakersfield, California that are unlikely to be developed in light of the Companys strategic decision to focus primarily on the development of Hawaii real estate. The remaining aggregate book value of these two projects is $12.9 million. (The third project, in Palmdale, California, has a book value of $4.7 million.) Operating losses for the quarter also were affected by the variability in the timing of sales closings. In the second quarter of 2012, the Company recognized a $3.7 million margin from the sale of a 4.1-acre parcel at Maui Business Park II to Costco, and in the second quarter of 2011, the Company closed the sales of a Texas shopping center and four Hawaii properties, which generated margin of $10.8 million.
Agribusiness operating profit for the second quarter of 2012 was $7.0 million, $1.5 million lower than last year. While the Company expects that full-year sugar pricing and volumes in 2012 will be similar to 2011, quarterly results are affected by the quantity of sugar shipped and the pricing of individual vessel loads. The Company sold a similar amount of sugar in the second quarter of 2012 as it did in 2011; however, it received higher pricing on a vessel load shipped in the second quarter of 2011.
Corporate expenses for the quarter include $3.6 million of professional services and other expenses related to the Companys separation from Matson, and a non-cash charge of $0.8 million to convert pre-separation stock options into A&B-only stock options. These one-time expenses resulted in an increase in corporate expenses to $8.4 million for the second quarter of 2012, compared to $4.1 million last year.
Year-To-Date Financial Results
 
Excluding separation charges and the reduction of the carrying value of the California properties, net income for the six months ended June 30, 2012 was $9.8 million, or $0.23 per diluted share. On an unadjusted basis, net loss for the six months ended June 30, 2012 was $1.6 million, or $0.04 per diluted share, compared to net income of $22.1 million, or $0.52 per diluted share, for the six months ended June 30, 2011. Revenue for the six months ended June 30, 2012 was $113.9 million, compared to $119.3 million for the same period last year.
1
 
 
 
 
Analysis of Financial Results
 
Real estate development and sales and leasing revenue and operating profit are analyzed before subtracting amounts related to discontinued operations. This is consistent with how the Company evaluates performance and makes decisions regarding capital allocation, acquisitions and dispositions. Direct year-over-year comparison of real estate development and sales results may not provide a consistent, measurable indicator of future performance because results from period to period are significantly affected by the mix and timing of property sales. Operating results, by virtue of each projects asset class, geography and timing, are inherently episodic. Earnings from joint venture investments are not included in segment revenue, but are included in operating profit.
Real Estate Leasing  Second quarter of 2012 compared with 2011
 
Real estate leasing revenue for the second quarter of 2012, before subtracting amounts presented as discontinued operations, was two percent higher than 2011, due to the timing of commercial property acquisitions and dispositions, as well as higher common area maintenance recoveries.
 Operating profit for the second quarter of 2012, before subtracting amounts presented as discontinued operations, was one percent higher than 2011, for the same reasons described for the revenue increase.
 
 
 
Real Estate Leasing  First half of 2012 compared with 2011
 
Real estate leasing revenue for the first half of 2012, before subtracting amounts presented as discontinued operations, was the same as last year.
Operating profit for the first half of 2012, before subtracting amounts presented as discontinued operations, was one percent higher than 2011, principally due to the timing of acquisitions and dispositions and higher operating income from a Mainland industrial property due to higher occupancy, partially offset by lower occupancy at three Mainland properties and higher depreciation and amortization expense.
 
Real Estate Development and Sales  Second quarter and first half of 2012 compared with 2011
 
 
 
 
Total revenue was $7.0 million and was principally related to the sale of a 4.1-acre parcel at Maui Business Park II (MBP-II). The $3.7 million margin on this sale was more than offset by $9.8 million of impairment charges and equity losses related to the Companys Santa Barbara and Bakersfield development projects in California, resulting from a change in the Companys development strategy to focus on development projects in Hawaii, as well as the loss from joint ventures.
2012 Second Quarter:
Revenue for the first half of 2012, before subtracting amounts presented as discontinued operations, was $18.4 million and, in addition to the MBP-II sale described above, included the sales of two leased fee parcels on Maui, two residential units on Oahu, a California office property, and a 79-acre, non-core land parcel on Maui. The margin on these sales was more than offset by $9.8 million of impairment charges related to Companys Santa Barbara and Bakersfield development projects described above.
2012 First Half:
Revenue and operating profit were $28.0 million and $10.6 million, respectively, and were principally composed of the sales of Arbor Park Shopping Center in Texas, a vacant four-acre parcel on Maui, and three units on Oahu.
2011 Second Quarter:
Revenue for the first half of 2011, before subtracting amounts presented as discontinued operations, was $47.7 million and, in addition to the sales described above, included the sales of two commercial properties on Maui and Oahu, an 86-acre vacant parcel on Maui, and a residential unit on Oahu. In addition to the sales included in revenue, operating profit of $22.6 million for the first half of 2011 included a gain from the sale of the Companys interest in the Bridgeport Marketplace joint venture development in Valencia, California, a four-acre commercial parcel at the Companys Kukuiula joint venture on Kauai, and two residential units on Hawaii island, partially offset by other joint venture expenses.
2011 First Half:
Agribusiness  Second quarter of 2012 compared with 2011
Agribusiness revenue for the second quarter of 2012 decreased $3.5 million, or eight percent, compared to the second quarter of 2011. The decrease was primarily due to $2.7 million of lower sugar sales revenue due to higher pricing on a vessel of sugar delivered in the second quarter of 2011 and $0.6 million of lower coffee revenue due to the sale of coffee assets in 2011.
Operating profit for the second quarter of 2012 decreased $1.5 million, or 18 percent, compared to the second quarter of 2011. The decrease was principally due to the aforementioned lower sugar pricing for the quarter.
 
 
 
Agribusiness  First half of 2012 compared with 2011
 
Agribusiness revenue for the first half of 2012 decreased $5.8 million, or 10 percent, compared with the first half of 2011. The decrease was due to $2.5 million in lower sugar sales revenue due to higher 2011 pricing, $2.3 million in lower coffee revenue due to the sale of the coffee assets in 2011, and $1.4 million in lower charter revenue.
Operating profit for the first half of 2012 decreased $0.6 million compared to the first half of 2011. The decrease was primarily due to $1.3 million in lower sugar margins, resulting from lower pricing in 2012 relative to 2011, and $1.2 million of lower molasses margins due to lower volume, partially offset by $1.7 million of higher power and lease margins due to the sale of coffee assets in 2011.
Year-to-date sugar production was 20 percent lower in 2012 than in 2011, due principally to a decrease in the number of acres harvested in the first half of the year as a result of boiler downtime that reduced the pace of factory and field operations, as well as weather-related delays. However, based on expected yields and the harvesting schedule, the Company expects that the production shortfall versus prior year will be substantially eliminated by the end of the year.
About Alexander & Baldwin
 
Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. is a premier Hawaii land company, with interests in real estate development, commercial real estate and agriculture. With ownership of approximately 88,000 acres in Hawaii, A&B is the States fourth largest private landowner, and is one of the States most active real estate investors. A&B has a diverse portfolio of real estate development projects throughout Hawaii, and a commercial property portfolio comprising nearly eight million square feet of leasable space in Hawaii and on the U.S. Mainland. It is also the owner and operator of the Hawaiian Commercial & Sugar plantation on Maui, and a significant provider of renewable energy on the islands of Maui and Kauai. Additional information about A&B may be found at www.alexanderbaldwin.com.
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Statements in this press release that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements, within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, that involve a number of risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated by the relevant forward-looking statement. These forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance. This release should be read in conjunction with our Form 10 and our other filings with the SEC through the date of this release, which identify important factors that could affect the forward-looking statements in this release. We do not undertake any obligation to update our forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. reports net income and diluted earnings per share in accordance with GAAP and on a non-GAAP basis. Reconciliations of the Companys GAAP to non-GAAP financial measures for the three- and six-month periods ended June 30, 2012 and 2011 are presented below.
The Company uses these non-GAAP financial measures when evaluating operating performance because management believes that the exclusion from net income of 1) one-time advisory, legal, equity conversion and other expenses that were incurred to effect the separation of the Company from Matson, Inc., and 2) the reduction in carrying values of two of the Companys Mainland development projects that do not align with the Companys post-separation focus on Hawaii real estate development, provides insight into the Companys core operating results, future cash flow generation, and the underlying business trends affecting performance on a consistent and comparable basis from period to period. A&B provides this information to investors as an additional means of evaluating ongoing core operations. The non-GAAP financial information presented herein should be considered supplemental to, and not as a substitute for, or superior to, financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP.
 
 
 
  For all periods presented, there were no dilutive shares because no actual A&B shares or share-based awards were outstanding prior to the separation.
1
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALEX/ALEX-8K-20120905061511.txt.gz
TIME:20120905061511
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2.):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01  Regulation FD Disclosure
On September 5, 2012, Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. (the Company) will conduct analyst meetings in conjunction with the BMO Capital Markets North American Real Estate Conference. The presentation materials, which are attached as an exhibit to this Form 8-K, are being furnished prior to the meetings. Additionally, the presentation materials will be available on the Companys website at www.alexanderbaldwin.com prior to the meetings and will remain available for approximately one week following the meetings.  The information set forth in these materials speaks only as of September 5, 2012.
Statements in this Form 8-K and the attached exhibit that are not historical facts are "forward-looking statements," within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, that involve a number of risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated by the relevant forward-looking statement. Factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated in the statements include, without limitation, those described on pages 20-38 of the information statement filed as Exhibit 99.1 to the Companys registration statement on Form 10. These forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d)           Exhibits
99.1           Presentation Materials
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date:  September 5, 2012
ALEXANDER & BALDWIN, INC.
                                                                 
/s/ Paul K. Ito
Paul K. Ito
Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer and Controller

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALEX/ALEX-8K-20121108160741.txt.gz
TIME:20121108160741
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2.):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.  Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On November 8, 2012, Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. made its Real Estate Supplement Update for its Real Estate operating segments, which provides certain supplemental operating and financial information for the quarters ended September 30, 2012 and 2011, available on its website. A copy of this Real Estate Supplement Update is being furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report.
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)           Exhibits
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date:  November 8, 2012
ALEXANDER & BALDWIN, INC.
                                                    
/s/ Paul K. Ito
   
   
   
Paul K. Ito
Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer,
Treasurer and Controller
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALEX/ALEX-8K-20121204150743.txt.gz
TIME:20121204150743
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2.):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01  Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
On December 4, 2012, Kewalo Development LLC (Kewalo), entered into a $120 million construction loan agreement (together with all other loan documents executed in connection therewith, the Agreement) with First Hawaiian Bank, Wells Fargo Bank, N.A., Bank of Hawaii, and Central Pacific Bank (collectively, the Lenders) to finance a portion of the cost to construct a 43-story, 341-unit high-rise condominium development (the Project) in Kakaako, Honolulu, Hawaii. Kewalo is a joint venture between Waimanu Development LLC, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. (A&B or the Company), N1189 LLC, Armstrong Homes, Ltd., and BSC Waihonua, LLC.
In connection with the Agreement, the Companys wholly-owned real estate subsidiary, A & B Properties, Inc. (Properties), entered into a separate agreement (the Limited Guaranty) for the benefit of the Lenders. Under the Limited Guaranty, Properties guarantees repayment of any amounts owing by Kewalo under the Agreement, subject to a cap of $20 million, and additionally provides certain limited and springing recourse guaranties in favor of the Lenders in connection with specific obligations of Kewalo under the Agreement. Properties also entered into a completion guaranty (Completion Guaranty) for the benefit of the Lenders, under which Properties agrees that it will ensure lien-free completion of the Project. Additionally, under the Limited Guaranty and the Completion Guaranty, Properties covenants that it will maintain an aggregate net worth of not less than $500 million.
The foregoing description of the terms of the Limited Guaranty and the Completion Guaranty is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Limited Guaranty and Completion Guaranty, which are filed as Exhibits 10.1 and 10.2, respectively, and are incorporated herein by reference.
Item 2.03 Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
The information set forth under Item 1.01 is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)  Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
ALEXANDER & BALDWIN, INC.
______________
/s/
Paul K. Ito
Paul K. Ito
Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer,
Treasurer and Controller
Dated:           December 4, 2012
 
 
 
 
 
 

WHEREAS, KEWALO DEVELOPMENT LLC, a Hawaii limited liability company (the Borrower), has applied to FIRST HAWAIIAN BANK, WELLS FARGO BANK, N.A., BANK OF HAWAII and CENTRAL PACIFIC BANK (collectively, the Lender) for a loan (the Loan) in the principal sum of up to ONE HUNDRED TWENTY MILLION AND NO/100 DOLLARS ($120,000,000.00), the proceeds from which will be used to finance the costs of acquiring, developing, designing, constructing, furnishing, marketing and selling a high-rise condominium project to be known as Waihonua (the Project), all upon the terms and conditions set forth in that certain Loan Agreement to be executed by the Borrower and the Lender in connection with the Loan (the Loan Agreement); and
WHEREAS, A & B PROPERTIES, INC., a Hawaii corporation (hereinafter called the Guarantor) is the manager of the Borrower, and the  sole member of Waimanu Development LLC, the owner of a 50% membership interest in the Borrower, and deems it to be to its own financial benefit that the Lender make the Loan to the Borrower; and
WHEREAS, the Lender is willing to make the Loan to the Borrower, subject to the condition, among others, that the Guarantor execute and deliver this Limited Guaranty to the Lender; and
WHEREAS, the Guarantor has received, reviewed and approved the Loan Agreement and all of the other Loan Documents, as defined in the Loan Agreement;
NOW, THEREFORE, as an essential inducement to the Lender to make the Loan to the Borrower, and as a consideration for its so doing, the Guarantor hereby unconditionally, irrevocably, and absolutely, warrants, represents, covenants and agrees, with the Lender, as follows:
1.           .  As used herein, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
Definitions
(a)            shall mean (i) all sums due and payable under the Loan, principal, interest, fees and charges; and (ii) any and all other indebtedness or liability of the Borrower, its successors and assigns, to the Lender, under or arising out of the Loan or the Loan Documents, including, as to (i) and (ii) above, any extension, renewal, reduction, compromise, indulgence, variation or modification thereof.
Indebtedness
(b)            shall mean each and every agreement, covenant and condition to be observed or performed by the Borrower, its successors and assigns, under the Loan Documents (i) which the Guarantor can cause the Borrower to observe and perform, or (ii) which can be satisfied by the payment of money.
Obligations
(c)            shall mean all costs and expenses, including, but not limited to, reasonable attorneys fees, incurred in connection with the enforcement by the Lender of the rights of the Lender against the Guarantor, or the enforcement by the Lender of the rights of the Lender against the Borrower and the Guarantor jointly, following any default in the due and punctual performance of the Guarantors obligations hereunder.
Expenses
 
(d)           .  Unless otherwise defined herein, all other capitalized terms used herein shall have the same meanings such terms have in the Loan Agreement.
Other Capitalized Terms
2.           .
Indebtedness and Obligations Guaranteed; Payment of Expenses; Lenders Right to Enforce Limited Guaranty
(a)           The Guarantor hereby absolutely, irrevocably and unconditionally guarantees the payment of the Indebtedness and the performance of the Obligations; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that, subject to the provisions of Section 2(c) below, the obligations of the Guarantor hereunder shall not exceed the lesser of (a) $20,000,000.00, or (b) the outstanding Indebtedness.
(b)           In addition to the foregoing, and without reducing the Guarantors obligations under Section 2(a) above, the Guarantor will also pay to the Lender, on demand, all of the Expenses.
(c)           Notwithstanding the limitation set forth in Section 2(a) above, the Guarantor will be fully liable for any and all direct loss, liability, cost and reasonable expense incurred by the Lender due to or arising out of (i) misapplication of insurance proceeds, condemnation proceeds, and any tenant security deposits; (ii) any willful act of material waste of the Project or the Reserved Housing Project, and any damage to the Project or the Reserved Housing Project arising from the intentional misconduct or gross negligence of the Borrower or the Guarantor, or any of the Borrowers or the Guarantors principals, officers, directors, agents or employees, and any removal of property in violation of the Loan Documents; (iii) so long as the Borrower (or any affiliate of the Guarantor) has possession and control of the Project or the Reserved Housing Project, failure to pay (or deposit into reserves held by the Lender funds sufficient to pay) taxes or other liens with priority over the Loan Documents; (iv) damages arising from any fraud or material misrepresentation of the Borrower or the Guarantor, or any of the Borrowers or the Guarantors principals, officers, directors, agents or employees; and (v) all obligations and indemnities of the Borrower under the Loan Documents relating to forfeiture laws and hazardous or toxic substances or the failure of Project or the Reserved Housing Project to comply with environmental laws.  For the avoidance of doubt, the phrase any and all direct loss, liability, cost and reasonable expense incurred by the Lender as used in the foregoing sentence shall not include the unpaid balance of the Loan.
The Guarantor shall also be fully liable to the Lender for the full amount of the Loan in the event that (i) the Borrower fails to maintain its status as a single purpose entity in accordance with terms of the Loan Agreement; (ii) the Borrower fails to obtain the Lenders consent to any subordinate financing or other voluntary lien encumbering the Project or the Reserved Housing Project; (iii) the Borrower fails to obtain the Lenders consent to any assignment, transfer or conveyance of the Project or the Reserved Housing Project (except as provided in the Loan Agreement); or (iv) there is a voluntary bankruptcy of the Borrower, or an involuntary bankruptcy of the Borrower in which the Borrower has colluded with its creditors.
(d)           The Lender shall not have the right to enforce this Limited Guaranty or require the Guarantor to perform its obligations under this Limited Guaranty, unless and until an Event of Default under the Loan Agreement has occurred and any applicable grace period therefor has expired, and the Lender has given notice of its intention to accelerate the Loan because of such Event of Default.
 
3.           .  This is an unconditional and absolute guaranty of payment and not merely a guaranty of collection, and if for any reason, any Indebtedness shall not be paid when and as due and payable, or any Obligation shall not be observed or performed when the same is required to be observed or performed. the Guarantor undertakes promptly to pay all such Indebtedness on demand, and to observe and perform, or to cause the appropriate party to observe and perform, each of such Obligations, subject, however, to the limitation contained in Section 2(a) above, and the provisions of Section 2(c) above, regardless of any defense or setoff or counterclaim which the Borrower may have or assert, and regardless of whether or not the Lender, or anyone on behalf of the Lender, shall have instituted any suit, action or proceeding or exhausted its remedies or taken any steps to enforce any rights against the Borrower, any other guarantor, or any other person to collect all or part of any such amounts, or to compel any such performance, either pursuant to the Loan Documents, or at law or in equity, and regardless of any other condition or contingency.  However, nothing contained herein shall prevent the Lender from pursuing any right or remedy it may now have or hereafter acquire against the Borrower or any other party, notwithstanding that the same may in fact destroy any rights that the Guarantor may have against or with respect to, the Borrower or any third party, and the Guarantor agrees that the exercise of any such right or remedy by the Lender shall not constitute a discharge of any of the obligations of the Guarantor under this Limited Guaranty.
Unconditional and Absolute Payment Guaranty
4.           .  Subject to the limitations set forth in Section 2(a) above, and the provisions of Section 2(c) above, the Guarantor hereby unconditionally waives any and all statutory and common law suretyship defenses that now or hereafter may be available to the Guarantor, including, without limitation (a) any requirement that the Lender in the event of any default by the Borrower first make demand upon, or seek to enforce remedies against, the Borrower or any other guarantor or any security or collateral held by the Lender at any time, or to pursue any other remedy in its power, before being entitled to payment from the Guarantor of the amounts payable by the Guarantor hereunder, or before proceeding against the Guarantor; (b) the defense of the statute of limitations in any action hereunder or for the collection of any of the Indebtedness or the performance of any Obligation; (c) any defense that may arise by reason of (i) the incapacity, lack of authority, death or disability of the Borrower, the Guarantor or any other person or entity, (ii) the revocation or repudiation of this Limited Guaranty  by the Guarantor, or the revocation or repudiation of any of the Loan Documents by the Borrower or any other person or entity, (iii) the failure of the Lender to file or enforce a claim against the estate (either in administration, bankruptcy or any other proceeding) of the Borrower or any other person or entity, (iv) the unenforceability in whole or in part of the Loan Documents or any other document, instrument, or agreement referred to therein, or any limitation on the liability of the Borrower thereunder, or any limitation on the method or terms of payment thereunder, which may now or hereafter be caused or imposed in any manner whatsoever, (v) the election by the Lender, in any proceeding instituted under the federal Bankruptcy Code, of the application of Section 1111(b)(2) of the federal Bankruptcy Code, or (vi) any borrowing or grant of a security interest under Section 364 of the federal Bankruptcy Code; (d) diligence, presentment, demand for payment, protest, notice of discharge, notice of acceptance of this Limited Guaranty, and indulgences and notices of any other kind whatsoever; (e) any defense based upon an election of remedies (including, if available, an election to proceed by non-judicial foreclosure) by the Lender which destroys or otherwise impairs any subrogation rights of the Guarantor or the right of the Guarantor to proceed against the Borrower for reimbursement, or both; (f) any defense based upon any taking, modification or release of any collateral or guaranties for the Indebtedness of the Borrower to the Lender, or any failure to perfect any security interest in, or the taking of any other action or the failure to take any other action with respect to any collateral securing payment of the Indebtedness or performance of the Obligations; (g) any rights or defenses based upon an offset by the Guarantor against any obligation now or hereafter owed to the Guarantor by the Borrower; or (h) any right of appraisement with regard to the value of any collateral which the Lender may apply as a credit to the obligations of the Borrower, through foreclosure or otherwise, and agrees that the determination by an independent appraiser appointed by the Lender of the value of such collateral shall be binding upon the Guarantor for all purposes; it being the intention hereof that the Guarantor shall remain fully liable, as principal, until the full payment of the Indebtedness, full performance of the Obligations and termination of the obligations of the Lender under the Loan Documents, notwithstanding any act, omission or thing which might otherwise operate as a legal or equitable discharge of the Guarantor.
Waiver
5.           .  The obligations, covenants, agreements and duties of the Guarantor under this Limited Guaranty shall not be released, affected, stayed or impaired, except upon the express written consent of the Lender, by (a) any assignment, indorsement or transfer, in whole or in part, of any of the Loan Documents, although made without notice to or the consent of the Guarantor; or (b) any alteration, compromise, modification, acceleration, extension or change to or of the time or manner of payment of any of the Indebtedness, or the performance or observance of any of Obligations; or (c) any increase or reduction in the rate of interest on, or amount of principal payable under, the Loan; or (d) the voluntary or involuntary liquidation, sale or other disposition of all or substantially all of the assets of the Borrower or the Guarantor; or (e) any receivership, insolvency, bankruptcy, reorganization, dissolution or other similar proceedings, affecting the Borrower or the Guarantor or any of their assets; or (f) any release of any property from the lien and security interest created by any of the Loan Documents, the subordination of any such lien or security interest, or the acceptance of additional or substitute property as security under the Loan Documents; or (g) the release or discharge of the Borrower from, or any waiver by the Lender of, the observance or performance of any agreement, covenant, term or condition contained in the Loan Documents, or any failure by the Lender to insist upon the Borrowers compliance with any such agreement, covenant, term or condition; or (h) the foreclosure of any lien or security interest on any property securing repayment of the Indebtedness, or the acceptance of a deed or assignment of any such property in lieu of foreclosure; or (i) any action which the Lender may take or omit to take by virtue of the Loan Documents or through any course of dealing with the Borrower; or (j) the release of any existing guarantor or the addition of a new guarantor; or (k) any change in the status or structure of the Borrower, including any change by incorporation, merger or consolidation; (l) any change in the composition of the Borrower, including, without limitation, any addition of, removal of, replacement for or substitution of any member of the Borrower; or (m) the operation of law or any other cause, whether similar or dissimilar to the foregoing.
No Release of Guaranty
6.           .  The Guarantor hereby waives, releases, and discharges any claim or right the Guarantor may have to be subrogated to the rights of the Lender following payment of the Indebtedness and performance of the Obligations.  This waiver, release and discharge shall continue even after the Indebtedness has been paid in full, the Obligations have been performed, and the obligations of the Lender under the Loan Documents have terminated.
Waiver of Subrogation
7.           .  Any indebtedness of the Borrower now or hereafter held by the Guarantor is hereby subordinated to the Indebtedness of the Borrower to the Lender; and, upon the request of the Lender,  such indebtedness of the Borrower to the Guarantor shall be collected, enforced and received by the Guarantor as trustee for the Lender and shall be paid over to the Lender on account of the Indebtedness of the Borrower to the Lender subject to the limitations set forth in Section 2(a) above, and the provisions of Section 2(c) above, without reducing or affecting in any manner the liability of the Guarantor under the other provisions of this Limited Guaranty.
Subordination of Indebtedness
8.           .  The Guarantor will file all claims against the Borrower in any bankruptcy or other proceeding in which the filing of claims is required or permitted by law upon any indebtedness of the Borrower to the Guarantor or claim against the Borrower by the Guarantor, and the Guarantor hereby assigns to the Lender all rights of the Guarantor thereunder.  If the Guarantor does not file any such claim, the Lender, as attorney-in-fact for the Guarantor, is hereby authorized to do so in the name of the Guarantor or, in the Lenders discretion, to assign the claim and to cause proof of claim to be filed in the name of the Lenders nominee.  The Lender or its nominee shall have the sole right to accept or reject any plan proposed in such proceeding and to take any other action which a party filing a claim is entitled to take.  In all such cases, whether in administration, bankruptcy or otherwise, the person or persons authorized to pay such claim shall pay to the Lender the full amount payable on such claim up to the amounts due under this Limited Guaranty, and, to the full extent necessary for that purpose, the Guarantor hereby assigns to the Lender all of the Guarantors rights to any such payments or distributions to which the Guarantor would otherwise be entitled; provided, however, that the Guarantors obligations hereunder shall not be satisfied except to the extent that the Lender receives cash by reason of any such payment or distribution.  If the Lender receives anything hereunder other than cash, the same shall be held as collateral for the payment of all amounts due under this Limited Guaranty.
Claims in Bankruptcy
9.           .
Financial Reporting and Financial Covenants
(a)           The Guarantor hereby agrees, as a material inducement to the Lender to make the Loan to the Borrower, to furnish to the Lender, within ninety (90) days after the close of each fiscal year, its annual (unaudited) financial statement, in form satisfactory to the Lender.  The Lender agrees to observe the confidentiality provisions of Section 11.23 of the Loan Agreement with respect to all of the financial and other information which it receives in connection herewith.
(b)           The Guarantor also agrees to maintain at all times an aggregate Net Worth, as defined below, of not less than $500,000,000.00.  As used herein, the term Net Worth shall mean the excess of total assets over total liabilities, as determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.  The Guarantor acknowledges that its agreement to maintain an aggregate Net Worth of not less than $500,000,000.00 is a material consideration for the Lender to make the Loan to the Borrower, and that if the Guarantor fails to maintain an aggregate Net Worth of not less than $500,000,000.00 at any time during the term of the Loan, and fails to correct the deficiency within thirty (30) days after notification thereof from the Lender, then, in such event, the Guarantor will, upon request of the Lender, promptly furnish or make available to the Lender such satisfactory additional security in such manner as the Lender may reasonably request to compensate for such failure.
(c)           The Guarantor will give the Lender prompt notice of any litigation or claim of any kind against the Guarantor which the Guarantor reasonably believes might subject the Guarantor to any liability, claim, or judgment in an amount in excess of $1,000,000.00, whether covered by insurance or not.
10.           .  The Guarantor is fully aware of the financial condition of the Borrower and is executing and delivering this Limited Guaranty based solely upon the Guarantors own independent investigation of all matters pertinent hereto, and is not relying in any manner upon any representation or statement of the Lender.  The Guarantor represents and warrants that the Guarantor is in a position to obtain and the Guarantor hereby assumes full responsibility for obtaining, any additional information concerning the Borrowers financial condition and any other matter pertinent hereto as the Guarantor may desire, and the Guarantor is not relying upon or expecting the Lender to furnish to the Guarantor any information now or hereafter in the Lenders possession concerning the same or any other matter.  By executing this Limited Guaranty, the Guarantor knowingly acknowledges and accepts the full range of risks encompassed within a contract of this type.  The Guarantor shall have no right to require the Lender to obtain or disclose any information with respect to the Loan, the Indebtedness, the Obligations, the financial condition or character of the Borrower, the Borrowers ability to pay the Indebtedness or perform the Obligations, the Borrowers ability to develop and market the Project, the existence of any collateral or security for any or all of the Indebtedness or the Obligations, the existence or non-existence of any other guaranties of all or any part of the Indebtedness or the Obligations, or any action or non-action on the part of the Lender, the Borrower, or any other person, or any other matter, fact or occurrence whatsoever.
Condition of Borrower
11.           .  The Guarantor makes the following representations and warranties which shall be deemed to be continuing representations and warranties until the full payment of the Indebtedness, the full performance of the Obligations, and the termination of the Lenders obligations under the Loan Documents:
Representations and Warranties
(a)           .  All tax returns and reports of the Guarantor required by law to be filed have been duly filed, and all taxes, assessments, contributions, fees and other governmental charges (other than those currently payable without penalty or interest and those currently being contested in good faith) upon the Guarantor or upon the Guarantors properties, assets or income which are due and payable have been paid.
Tax Returns and Payments
(b)           .  There are no actions, suits or proceedings pending or, to the knowledge of the Guarantor, threatened against or affecting the Guarantor or any of the Guarantors properties or assets in any court at law or in equity, or before or by any governmental department, commission, board, bureau, agency or instrumentality, an adverse decision in which might materially affect the Guarantors ability to observe and perform the Guarantors obligations under this Limited Guaranty.
Litigation
(c)           .  There is no provision of any mortgage, indenture, contract, agreement or instrument applicable to the Guarantor or by which the Guarantor is bound which materially adversely affects, or in the future (so far as the Guarantor can now reasonably foresee) will materially adversely affect, the Guarantors ability to observe and perform the Guarantors obligations under this Limited Guaranty, and the Guarantor is not in violation of or in default with respect to any material provision of any such mortgage, indenture, contract, agreement or instrument which violation or default gives rise to a remedy that, if exercised, would materially adversely affect the Guarantors ability to observe and perform the Guarantors obligations under this Limited Guaranty.
Compliance with Other Instruments; None Burdensome
(d)           .  Any financial statements heretofore delivered to the Lender by the Guarantor are true and correct in all material respects, and fairly represent the respective financial conditions of the subjects thereof as of the respective dates thereof; no materially adverse change has occurred in the financial conditions reflected therein since the respective dates thereof.
Financial Statements
(e)           .  The execution and delivery of the Loan Documents by the Borrower, and the observance and performance by the Borrower of all of the provisions and conditions thereof, have been duly authorized by the Board of Directors of A & B Properties, Inc., and no other corporate action of A & B Properties, Inc., is required therefor.  In addition, the execution and delivery of this Limited Guaranty by A & B Properties, Inc., have been duly authorized by the Board of Directors of A & B Properties, Inc., and no other corporate action of A & B Properties, Inc. is required therefor.
Due Execution of Loan Documents
12.           .  Until all Indebtedness has been paid to the Lender, all Obligations have been performed, and the obligations of the Lender under the Loan Documents have been terminated, the Guarantor shall not, without the prior written consent of the Lender, commence or join with any other person in commencing any bankruptcy, reorganization or insolvency proceedings of or against the Borrower.  The obligations of the Guarantor under this Limited Guaranty shall not be altered, limited or affected by any proceeding, voluntary or involuntary, involving the bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership, reorganization, liquidation or arrangement of the Borrower or by any defense which the Borrower may have by reason of the order, decree or decision of any court or administrative body resulting from any such proceeding.  The Guarantor acknowledges and agrees that any interest on the Indebtedness which accrues after the commencement of any such proceeding (or, if interest on any portion of the Indebtedness ceases to accrue by operation of law by reason of the commencement of said proceeding, such interest as would have accrued on any such portion of the Indebtedness if said proceeding had not been commenced) shall be included in the Indebtedness, since it is the intention of the parties that the amount of the Indebtedness which is guaranteed by the Guarantor pursuant to this Limited Guaranty  should be determined without regard to any rule of law or order which may relieve the Borrower of any portion of such Indebtedness.  The Guarantor will permit any trustee in bankruptcy, receiver, debtor in possession, assignee for the benefit of creditors or similar person to pay the Lender, or allow the claim of the Lender in respect of, any such interest accruing after the date on which such proceeding is commenced.  If all or any portion of the Indebtedness is paid or all or any part of the Obligations are performed by the Borrower, the obligations of the Guarantor hereunder shall continue and remain in full force and effect in the event that all or any part of such payment or performance is avoided or recovered directly or indirectly from the  Lender as a preference, fraudulent transfer or otherwise in such proceeding.
Bankruptcy
13.            .  The liability of the Guarantor, and all rights, powers and remedies of the Lender hereunder and under any other agreement now or at any time hereafter in force between the Lender and the Guarantor, relating to the Loan, shall be cumulative and not exclusive or alternative, and such rights, powers and remedies shall be in addition to all other rights, powers and remedies given to the Lender by law.
Remedies Cumulative
14.            .  The terms of this Limited Guaranty may not be modified or amended except by a written agreement executed by the Guarantor with the consent in writing of the Lender.  The obligations of the Guarantor under this Limited Guaranty shall be continuing obligations and a separate cause of action shall be deemed to arise in respect of each default hereunder.  The Guarantor will from time to time deliver, upon written request of the Lender, satisfactory acknowledgments of the Guarantors continued liability hereunder.
Amendments; Continuing Liability
15.           .  The Guarantor shall at all times retain ownership of one hundred percent (100%) of the membership interests in Waimanu Development LLC, and shall not sell, pledge or otherwise transfer any portion of such interest without the written consent of the Lender. Waimanu Development LLC shall at all times retain ownership of at least fifty percent (50%) of the membership interests in the Borrower, and shall not sell, pledge or otherwise transfer any portion of such interest without the written consent of the Lender.  No transfer or pledge of any such membership interest in Waimanu Development LLC, or the Borrower, with or without the consent of the Lender, shall release, affect or impair the continuing liability and obligation of the Guarantor under this Limited Guaranty.
Continued Ownership
16.           .  Any notice or demand to be given or served hereunder shall be in writing and personally delivered, or sent by registered or certified mail addressed as follows:
Notices
To Lender at:                         999 Bishop Street
Honolulu, Hawaii  96813
Attention:  Commercial Real Estate Division
Honolulu, Hawaii  96813
Attention:  Michael G. Wright
Any such address may be changed from time to time by the addressee by serving notice to the other party as above provided.  Service of such notice or demand shall be deemed complete on the date of actual delivery or at the expiration of the second day after the date of mailing if mailed in Hawaii, whichever is earlier.
17.           .  All covenants, agreements, terms and conditions contained in this Limited Guaranty  shall be binding on the Guarantor and the Guarantors successors and assigns, and shall bind, inure to the benefit of and be enforceable by the Lender from time to time.  This Limited Guaranty is assignable by the Lender with respect to all or any portion of the Indebtedness or the Obligations without notice to or consent of the Guarantor, and when so assigned, the Guarantor shall be liable to the assignee as to any such portion, without in any manner affecting the liability of the Guarantor with respect to any of the Indebtedness or Obligations retained by the Lender.
Parties in Interest
 
18.           .  This Limited Guaranty shall be construed and interpreted in accordance with and shall be governed by the laws of the State of Hawaii.  The Lender may bring any action or proceeding to enforce this Limited Guaranty, or any action or proceeding arising out of this Limited Guaranty, in the Circuit Court of the First Circuit of the State of Hawaii or the United States District Court for the District of Hawaii.  If the Lender commences such an action in the Circuit Court of the First Circuit of the State of Hawaii, or the United States District Court for the District of Hawaii, the Guarantor hereby agrees that the Guarantor will submit and does hereby irrevocably submit to the personal jurisdiction of such courts; if served by certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, will acknowledge receipt of a copy of the summons and complaint within the statutory time limit and in the manner set forth on the notice and summons; and will not attempt to have such action dismissed, abated, or transferred on the ground of or similar grounds; provided, however, that nothing contained herein shall prohibit the Guarantor from seeking, by appropriate motion, to remove an action brought in the Circuit Court of the First Circuit of the State of Hawaii to the United States District Court for the District of Hawaii.  If such action is so removed, however, the Guarantor shall not seek to transfer such action to any other district nor shall the Guarantor seek to transfer to any other district any action which the Lender originally commenced in the United States District Court for the District of Hawaii.  Any action or proceeding brought by the Guarantor arising out of this Limited Guaranty shall be brought solely in the Circuit Court of the First Circuit of the State of Hawaii or in the United States District Court for the District of Hawaii.
Governing Law; Choice of Forum; Service of Process
forum
non
conveniens
19.           .  The Guarantor hereby knowingly, voluntarily and intentionally waives any right it may have to a jury trial in any legal proceeding which may be hereinafter instituted by the Lender or the Guarantor to assert any of their respective claims arising out of or relating to this Guaranty or any of the other Loan Documents or any other agreement, instrument or document contemplated thereby.  In such event, the Guarantor, at the request of the Lender, shall cause its attorney of record to effectuate such waiver in compliance with the Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, as the same may be amended from time to time.
Waiver of Jury Trial
 
 
20           .  The Lender, the Borrower and the Guarantor are obligated to comply with the laws and regulations administered by the United States Office of Foreign Asset Control (OFAC Restrictions).  In order to comply with OFAC Restrictions, the Lender may be required to temporarily suspend processing or funding of the Loan, which may result in delayed availability of funds, or may be prohibited from closing the Loan altogether.  The Guarantor agrees to the foregoing, and further agrees that if the Lender is required by applicable OFAC Restrictions to suspend processing or funding of the Loan, or is prohibited by applicable OFAC Restrictions from closing the Loan, the Guarantor will nevertheless continue to perform and will not be relieved from its obligations under this Guaranty, and the Lender will not be liable for any damages of any kind or nature (including, without limitation, actual, consequential, special, incidental, punitive, or indirect damages, whether arising out of claims for lender liability or any other cause), which the Borrower or the Guarantor may suffer or incur in connection with any such suspension of, or failure to close, the Loan.
Compliance with OFAC Restrictions
21.           .  The headings of paragraphs herein are inserted only for convenience and shall in no way define, describe or limit the scope or intent of any provision of this Limited Guaranty.
Paragraph Headings
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Guarantor has executed this instrument as of November 30, 2012.
A & B PROPERTIES, INC.
By         
/s/ Michael G. Wright
Its  Executive Vice President
By         
/s/ Charles W. Loomis
Its  Assistant Secretary
 
 
 
STATE OF HAWAI' I                                                         )
)           SS:
CITY AND COUNTY OF HONOLULU                            )
On , in the First Circuit, State of Hawai'i, before me personally appeared and , to me personally known, who, being by me duly sworn or affirmed, did say that they are the  and  respectively, of A & B Properties, Inc., a Hawaii corporation, that said persons executed the foregoing instrument identified or described as Limited Guaranty on behalf of said A & B Properties, Inc., by authority of its board of directors and said and  acknowledged the instrument to be the free act and deed of said corporation.
November 28, 2012
Michael G. Wright,
Charles W. Loomis
Executive Vice President
Assistant Secretary
Michael G. Wright
Charles W. Loomis
The foregoing instrument is undated and contained  pages at the time of this acknowledgment/certification.
11
/s/ Dayle S. Sasaki-Hamamoto      
   
   
Print Name:
Dayle S. Sasaki-Hamamoto   
   
Notary Public, State of Hawai'i
My commission expires:
August 3, 2015
   
 
 
 

WHEREAS, KEWALO DEVELOPMENT LLC, a Hawaii limited liability company (the Borrower), has applied to FIRST HAWAIIAN BANK, WELLS FARGO BANK, N.A., BANK OF HAWAII and CENTRAL PACIFIC BANK (collectively, the Lender) for a loan (the Loan) in the principal sum of up to ONE HUNDRED TWENTY MILLION AND NO/100 DOLLARS ($120,000,000.00), the proceeds from which will be used to finance the costs of acquiring, developing, designing, constructing, furnishing, marketing and selling a high-rise condominium project to be known as Waihonua (the Project) to consist of three hundred forty-one (341) residential condominium units, together with other appurtenant improvements and amenities (the Improvements), on certain land owned by the Borrower in Honolulu, Hawaii, all as more particularly described in certain plans and specifications dated March 26, 2012, prepared by Design Partners Incorporated, and listed on Schedule 1 attached hereto and made a part hereof (the Plans and Specifications); and
WHEREAS, the Loan is to be made upon and in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth in that certain Loan Agreement to be executed by the Borrower and the Lender in connection with the Loan (the Loan Agreement); and
WHEREAS, A & B PROPERTIES, INC., a Hawaii corporation (hereinafter called the Completion Guarantor) is the manager of the Borrower, and the  sole member of Waimanu Development LLC, the owner of a 50% membership interest in the Borrower, and deems it to be to its own financial benefit that the Lender make the Loan to the Borrower; and
WHEREAS, an essential condition precedent to the obligation of the Lender to make the Loan to the Borrower is the delivery to the Lender of this Completion Guaranty duly executed by the Completion Guarantor;
NOW, THEREFORE, as an essential inducement to the Lender to make the Loan to the Borrower, and as a consideration for its so doing, the Completion Guarantor hereby unconditionally, irrevocably, and absolutely, warrants, represents, covenants and agrees, with the Lender, as follows:
1.           The Completion Guarantor represents and warrants as follows:
(a)           This Completion Guaranty constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligations of the Completion Guarantor, enforceable against it in accordance with the terms, conditions and limitations set forth herein.
(b)           There are no actions, suits, proceedings or investigations currently pending, or, to the best knowledge of the Completion Guarantor, threatened against or affecting the Completion Guarantor or any of the Completion Guarantors properties or assets in any court at law or in equity, or before or by any governmental department, commission, board, bureau, agency or instrumentality, an adverse decision in which might materially affect the Completion Guarantors ability to observe and perform the Completion Guarantors obligations under this Completion Guaranty.
 
(c)           All tax returns and reports of the Completion Guarantor required by law to be filed have been duly filed, and all taxes, assessments, contributions, fees and other governmental charges (other than those currently payable without penalty or interest and those currently being contested in good faith) upon the Completion Guarantor or upon the Completion Guarantors properties, assets or income which are due and payable have been paid.
(d)           To the best knowledge of the Completion Guarantor, there is no provision of any mortgage, indenture, contract, agreement or instrument applicable to the Completion Guarantor or by which the Completion Guarantor is  bound which materially adversely affects, or in the future (so far as the Completion Guarantor can now reasonably foresee) will materially adversely affect, the Completion Guarantors ability to observe and perform the Completion Guarantors obligations under this Completion Guaranty, and, to the best knowledge of the Completion Guarantor,  the Completion Guarantor is not in violation of or in default with respect to any material provision of any such mortgage, indenture, contract, agreement or instrument which violation or default gives rise to a remedy that, if exercised, would materially adversely affect the Guarantor's ability to observe and perform the Guarantor's obligations under this Completion Guaranty.
(e)           All financial statements heretofore delivered to the Lender by the Completion Guarantor are true and correct in all material respects, and fairly represent the financial condition of the Completion Guarantor as of the respective dates thereof; and no material adverse changes have occurred in the financial conditions reflected therein since the respective dates thereof.
(f)           The Completion Guarantor, in its capacity as manager of the Borrower, and for the purpose of observing and performing its obligations under this Completion Guaranty, has received, reviewed and approved the Loan Agreement, and all of the Loan Documents described therein.  The Completion Guarantor, in its capacity as manager of the Borrower, and for the purpose of observing and performing its obligations under this Completion Guaranty, has also received, reviewed and approved the Plans and Specifications, the Construction Contract, as defined in the Loan Agreement, the Major Contracts, as defined in the Loan Agreement, the Bonds, as defined in the Loan Agreement and all other agreements, contracts, documents and instruments executed by the Borrower in connection with the construction, equipping and furnishing of the Improvements.
(g)           .  The execution and delivery of this Completion Guaranty by A & B Properties, Inc., have been duly authorized by the Board of Directors of A & B Properties, Inc., and no other corporate action of A & B Properties, Inc., is required therefor.
Due Execution of Completion Guaranty
2.           The Completion Guarantor hereby irrevocably and unconditionally guarantees to the Lender that:
(a)           Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default (as defined in the Loan Agreement) arising from any failure to construct the Improvements (as defined in the Loan Agreement) substantially in accordance with the Plans and Specifications, or within the time required by Section 7.1 of the Loan Agreement (the Construction Completion Date), and the expiration of any applicable grace period therefor, then, and in any such event, the Completion Guarantor shall cause the Improvements to be completed and all requirements of the Loan Agreement with respect thereto fulfilled, by the Construction Completion Date, in full compliance with all applicable statutes, ordinances, building codes, regulations and subdivision, zoning, land use, ecological and environmental requirements, and pursuant to the Plans and Specifications, and shall pay all costs and expenses incurred in connection with such construction, as long as the then  undisbursed Loan proceeds which are allocable to the payment of construction costs for the Improvements, as set forth in the Loan Agreement and the Cost Budget and Cash Flow Forecast, including Retentions (as defined in the Loan Agreement), are made available to and advanced directly to the Completion Guarantor in accordance with the construction loan disbursement procedures contained in the Loan Agreement, and  upon approval of the monthly payment request from the Completion Guarantor by the Lender (and such other parties as may be required by the Loan Agreement).  The Lender may, , approve any adjustments or changes to the Cost Budget and Cash Flow Forecast, or allocations of contingency line items requested by the Completion Guarantor, which have the effect of increasing the amount of Loan proceeds which are allocable to the payment of construction costs for the Improvements; provided, however, that, unless objected to by the Borrower, the Completion Guarantor shall have the same rights relating to the use of any remaining contingency funds under the Cost Budget and Cash Flow Forecast, and to move and balance individual cost line items as provided to the Borrower under the Loan Agreement. At such time as the Lender shall have disbursed the total amount of such undisbursed Loan proceeds which are allocable to the payment of construction costs for the Improvements, the Lender shall have no further obligation whatsoever to the Completion Guarantor to advance funds for construction costs.  The obligations of the Completion Guarantor hereunder shall, however, continue even after the Lender shall have disbursed the total amount of such undisbursed Loan proceeds.  The Completion Guarantor shall indemnify and hold the Lender harmless from and against any and all loss, costs, liability or expense, including reasonable attorneys fees, which the Lender may sustain or incur by reason of any failure by the Completion Guarantor to observe and perform its obligations as set forth in this Section 2(a) (except to the extent that such loss, cost, liability or expense arises out of the Lenders wilful misconduct or gross negligence), including without limitation any claim by the Borrower objecting to the Lender making available to the Completion Guarantor any of the undisbursed Loan proceeds as provided above.  It is understood and agreed that the Completion Guarantor shall have the right to arrange for and cause the surety company which has issued the performance Bond with respect to the Construction Contract to cause the construction of the Improvements to be completed in accordance with the Construction Contract, and if such surety company does in fact cause the construction of the Improvements to be completed in accordance with the Construction Contract, that the same shall be deemed satisfactory performance by the Completion Guarantor of its obligations under this Section 2(a).  However, the failure or refusal of such surety to cause the construction of the Improvements to be completed in accordance with the Construction Contract (whether or not such failure or refusal is justified or excused) shall not relieve the Completion Guarantor of its obligations under this Section 2(a).
but shall not be required to
(b)           Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default (as defined in the Loan Agreement) arising from any failure to construct the Improvements (as defined in the Loan Agreement) substantially in accordance with the Plans and Specifications, or by the Construction Completion Date, and the expiration of any applicable grace period therefor, the Lender may at its option (but shall not be obligated to) proceed to complete the construction of the Improvements, either before or after the exercise of any other right or remedy which it may have against the General Contractor or any other person (including without limitation the surety company which has issued the performance Bond with respect to the Construction Contract), and in that event, the Completion Guarantor will, on demand, pay to the Lender all sums (plus interest at the applicable interest rate then in effect under the Note) expended for such purposes by or on behalf of the Lender in excess of the  undisbursed Loan proceeds which are allocable to the payment of construction costs for the Improvements, as set forth in the Loan Agreement and the Cost Budget and Cash Flow Forecast, including Retentions (as defined in the Loan Agreement).
(c)           The Work, as described in the Construction Contract,  shall be completed free and clear of any mechanics and materialmens liens, and all costs of the Work will be paid for in full.  Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default arising from the General Contractors or the Borrowers failure to pay any amount due to any subcontractor, materialman, laborer or employee who may be engaged in the Work, and the expiration of any grace period therefor, the Completion Guarantor shall, within ten (10) business days after demand, pay all such amounts (except to the extent the same are being contested by the Borrower, the surety company which has issued the labor and material payment Bond with respect to the Construction Contract or  the Completion Guarantor in good faith by appropriate action diligently pursued and that the security afforded by the Mortgage, the Security Agreement, the Assignment of Rents and the Assignment of Sales Contracts and Proceeds(as such terms are defined in the Loan Agreement) shall not thereby be subjected to any sale, forfeiture or loss, or reasonable probability thereof), and will indemnify and hold the Lender harmless from and against any and all loss, cost, liability or expense, including reasonable attorneys fees, which the Lender may sustain or incur by reason of the assertion of any claims by any such subcontractor, materialman, laborer, employee or other person having a statutory lien right.  It is understood and agreed that the Completion Guarantor shall have the right to arrange for and cause the surety company which has issued the labor and material payment Bond with respect to the Construction Contract to pay all amounts due to any such subcontractor, materialman, laborer or employee, and if such surety company does in fact pay all such amounts, that the same shall be deemed satisfactory performance by the Completion Guarantor of its obligations under this Section 2(c).  However, the failure or refusal of such surety to pay all such amounts (whether or not such failure or refusal is justified or excused) shall not relieve the Completion Guarantor of its obligations under this Section 2(c).
(d)           Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default arising from the Borrowers failure to remove, bond off, or discharge any mechanics or materialmans lien filed by any subcontractor, materialman, laborer or employee against the Improvements or the Mortgaged Property, or against the proceeds of the Loan, and the expiration of any grace period therefor, the Completion Guarantor shall within ten (10) business days after written demand from the Lender, bond against or pay, the lien amount in order to effect the discharge of the lien against the Improvements or the Mortgaged Property or the proceeds of the Loan, as applicable.  The Completion Guarantor shall  indemnify and hold the Lender harmless therefrom in all respects.  If the Completion Guarantor fails to bond against or pay and discharge any such mechanics or materialmans lien as provided for in this Section 2(d), the Lender may (but shall not be obligated to) procure any required bond to discharge the same, in which event the Completion Guarantor will, on demand, fully reimburse and repay to the Lender all costs and expenses incurred by the Lender in respect thereof, including reasonable attorneys fees incident thereto and together with interest thereof at the Default Rate described in the Loan Agreement.  It is understood and agreed that the Completion Guarantor shall have the right to arrange for and cause either the General Contractor or the surety company which has issued the labor and material payment Bond with respect to the Construction Contract to remove, bond off, or discharge any such mechanics or materialmans lien, and if such General Contractor or  surety company does in fact  remove, bond off, or discharge any such mechanics or materialmans lien, that the same shall be deemed satisfactory performance by the Completion Guarantor of its obligations under this Section 2(d).  However, the failure or refusal of such General Contractor or such surety to remove, bond off, or discharge any such mechanics or materialmans lien (whether or not such failure or refusal is justified or excused) shall not relieve the Completion Guarantor of its obligations under this Section 2(d).
(e)           Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default arising from the Borrowers failure to fund, or otherwise assure the payment, in accordance with the terms of the Loan Agreement, of the shortfall, if any (as determined from time to time by the Lender in accordance with the provisions of the Loan Agreement) between (i) the total amount of Project Costs, as defined in the Loan Agreement and (ii) the amounts available (either from proceeds of the Loan, equity funds deposited by the Borrower with the Lender, subordinated financing approved by the Lender, buyers deposits used for construction, or otherwise) to pay for all Project Costs, the  Completion Guarantor will, from time to time, deposit with the Lender, for disbursement by the Lender pursuant to the terms of the Loan Agreement, the sum or sums equal to such shortfall.
and within thirty (30) days after receipt of a written request from the Lender,
3.           The obligations of the Completion Guarantor under this Completion Guaranty shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable. The Completion Guarantor shall be liable as primary obligor for the payment and performance of its obligations under this Completion Guaranty, regardless of any defense or set-off or counterclaim which Borrower may have or assert, and regardless of whether or not the Lender has instituted any action, suit or proceeding, or exhausted its remedies or taken any steps to enforce any rights against the Borrower or any other party to compel any such performance, either pursuant to the Loan Documents, or at law or in equity, and regardless of any other condition or contingency.   However, nothing contained herein shall prevent the Lender from pursuing any right or remedy it may now have or hereafter acquire against the Borrower or any other party, notwithstanding that the same may in fact destroy any rights that the Completion Guarantor may have against or with respect to, the Borrower or any third party, and the Completion Guarantor agrees that the exercise of any such right or remedy by the Lender shall not constitute a discharge of any of the obligations of the Completion Guarantor under this Completion Guaranty.
4.           The obligations, covenants, agreements and duties of the Completion Guarantor under this Completion Guaranty shall not be released, affected or impaired, without the written consent of the Lender, by (a) any waiver by the Lender, or by any indorsee or assignee of the Lender of the performance or observance by the Borrower of any of its agreements, covenants, terms or conditions contained in the Loan Documents; or (b) any extension of the time for payment by the Borrower of any amounts payable under or in connection with the Loan Documents, or of the time for performance by the Borrower or any other obligations under or arising out of the Loan Documents or any extensions or renewals thereof; or (c) the modification or amendment (whether material or otherwise) of any duty, agreement or obligation of the Borrower set forth in the Loan Documents; or (d) the voluntary or involuntary liquidation, sale or other disposition of all or substantially all of the assets of the Borrower or the Completion Guarantor; or (e) any receivership, insolvency, bankruptcy, reorganization, or other similar proceedings, affecting the Borrower or the Completion Guarantor or any of their respective assets; or (f) any invalidity, irregularity, or unenforceability of any agreement (including the Construction Contract) involving the Improvements; or (g) any right, claim, or defense of any character whatsoever available to the General Contractor under the Construction Contract, including, without limitation, any right, claim or defense, or rescission , recoupment, reduction, termination, set-off, counterclaim or waiver; or (h) any act, omission or breach (including without limitation an Event of Default under the Loan Agreement) on the part of the Borrower or the General Contractor, or any other person; or (i) the release or discharge of the Borrower from the performance or observance of any agreement, covenant, term or condition contained in the Loan Documents; or (j) any amendment, alteration, modification or change to the Plans and Specification or the Construction Contract made by the Borrower, including, without limitation, change orders, the Completion Guarantor acknowledging that, in its capacity as manager of the Borrower, and for the purpose of observing and performing its obligations under this Completion Guaranty,  it will have direct involvement with any and all such amendments, alterations, modification and changes; or  (k) the operation of law or any other cause, whether similar to or dissimilar to the foregoing.
5.           Any and all payments required to be made to the Lender by the Completion Guarantor under this Completion Guaranty shall be in lawful money of the United States in federal or immediately available funds.
6.           No failure or delay on the part of the Lender or any indorsee or assignee of the Lender in exercising any right, power or remedy hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof; nor shall any single or partial exercise of any right, power or remedy preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right, power or remedy hereunder. No amendment, modification, termination or waiver of any provision of this Completion Guaranty, nor consent to any departure by the Completion Guarantor therefrom, shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be in writing and signed by the Lender or such indorsee or assignee, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the specific purpose for which given. No notice to or demand on the Completion Guarantor in any case shall entitle the Completion Guarantor to any other or further notice or demand in similar or other circumstances.
7.           The Completion Guarantor agrees to maintain at all times an aggregate Net Worth, as defined below, of not less than $500,000,000.00.  As used herein, the term Net Worth shall mean .  The Completion Guarantor acknowledges that its agreement to maintain an aggregate Net Worth of not less than $500,000,000.00 is a material consideration for the Lender to make the Loan to the Borrower, and that if the Completion Guarantor fails to maintain an aggregate Net Worth of not less than $500,000,000.00 at any time during the term of the Loan, and fails to correct the deficiency within thirty (30) days after notification thereof from the Lender, then, in such event, the Completion Guarantor will, upon request of the Lender, promptly furnish or make available to the Lender such satisfactory additional security in such manner as the Lender may reasonably request to compensate for such failure.
the excess of total assets over total liabilities, as determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles
8.           The Completion Guarantor will at all times maintain 100% of the ownership interests in Waimanu Development LLC, and will ensure that Waimanu Development LLC at all times maintains at least a 50% ownership interest in the Borrower.  The Completion Guarantor will submit to the Lender, within ninety (90) days after the close of each fiscal year, its annual (unaudited) financial statements in form satisfactory to the Lender.  The Lender agrees to observe the confidentiality provisions of Section 11.22 of the Loan Agreement with respect to all of the financial and other information which it receives in connection herewith.
9.           The Completion Guarantor hereby waives, releases and discharges any claim or right that it may have to be subrogated to the rights of the Lender following the performance of any obligation of the Completion Guarantor under this Completion Guaranty.  This waiver, release and discharge (with regard to subrogation) shall continue even after all indebtedness under the Loan has been paid in full and the obligations of the Lender under the Loan Documents have terminated.
10.           The obligations of the Completion Guarantor under this Completion Guaranty shall be continuing obligations and a new cause of action shall be deemed to arise in respect to each default thereunder. The Completion Guarantor shall from time to time deliver, upon written request of the Lender or any indorsee or assignee of the Lender, satisfactory acknowledgments of the Completion Guarantors continued liability hereunder.
11.           All of the covenants, agreements, terms and conditions contained in this Completion Guaranty shall bind and inure to the benefit of the Completion Guarantor and its successors and permitted assigns, and shall bind, inure to the benefit of and be enforceable by the Lender and the indorsees and assignees of the Lender. This Completion Guaranty is also given for the benefit of any person claiming by, through or under the Lender and any purchaser of the security or any portion thereof at foreclosure or otherwise as a result of the exercise of any right or remedy provided under the Loan Documents as permitted by law.
12.           This Completion Guaranty shall for all purposes be construed and interpreted in accordance with and shall be governed by the laws of the State of Hawaii. The Completion Guarantor hereby consents to jurisdiction in the Circuit Court of the First Circuit of the State of Hawaii and agrees that service of process may be made by serving a copy of the summons and complaint upon the Completion Guarantor at the address set forth below in accordance with the applicable laws of the State of Hawaii.
13.           The Completion Guarantor shall indemnify the Lender from and against all costs and expenses, including, but not limited to, all court costs and reasonable  attorneys fees, whether or not legal action be instituted, incurred or paid by the Lender in enforcing this Completion Guaranty.
14.           If any term or provision of this Completion Guaranty shall be determined to be illegal or unenforceable, all other terms and provisions thereof shall nevertheless remain effective and shall be enforced to the fullest extent permitted by law.
15.           Any notices, demands and requests required under this Completion Guaranty shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been given or made if served personally, or sent by the United States registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the addresses set forth below or to such other addresses as either party may hereafter designate by like notice.
Honolulu, Hawaii 96813
Attention:  Commercial Real Estate Division
 
Honolulu, Hawaii  96813
Attention:  Michael G. Wright
   
   
   
   
   
   
16.           The provisions of this Completion Guaranty shall extend and be applicable to all renewals, amendments, extensions and modifications of the Loan Documents, and all references to such documents shall be deemed to include any such renewals, extensions, amendments or
modifications thereof.
17.           The initiation of foreclosure proceedings by the Lender or the exercise of any other rights or remedies by the Lender under the Loan Documents shall not exonerate the Completion Guarantor in any respect, and notwithstanding such action by the Lender, the Completion Guarantor shall remain fully liable and responsible to perform its obligations under the terms of this Completion Guaranty.
18.           The Completion Guarantor hereby knowingly, voluntarily and intentionally waives any right it may have to a jury trial in any legal proceeding which may be hereinafter instituted by the Lender or the Completion Guarantor to assert any of their respective claims arising out of or relating to this Completion Guaranty or any of the other Loan Documents or any other agreement, instrument or document contemplated thereby.  In such event, the Completion Guarantor, at the request of the Lender, shall cause its attorney of record to effectuate such waiver in compliance with the Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, as the same may be amended from time to time.
19.           The Lender, the Borrower and the Completion Guarantor are obligated to comply with the laws and regulations administered by the United States Office of Foreign Asset Control (OFAC Restrictions).  In order to comply with OFAC Restrictions, the Lender may be required to temporarily suspend processing or funding of the Loan, which may result in delayed availability of funds, or may be prohibited from closing the Loan altogether.  The Completion Guarantor agrees to the foregoing, and further agrees that if the Lender is required by applicable OFAC Restrictions to suspend processing or funding of the Loan, or is prohibited by applicable OFAC Restrictions from closing the Loan, the Completion Guarantor will nevertheless continue to perform and will not be relieved from its obligations under this Completion Guaranty, and the Lender will not be liable for any damages of any kind or nature (including, without limitation, actual, consequential, special, incidental, punitive, or indirect damages, whether arising out of claims for lender liability or any other cause), which the Borrower or the Completion Guarantor may suffer or incur in connection with any such suspension of, or failure to close, the Loan.
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Completion Guarantor has executed this instrument as of November 30, 2012.
A & B PROPERTIES, INC.
 
By         
/s/ Michael G. Wright
Its  Executive Vice President
By         
/s/ Charles W. Loomis
Its  Assistant Secretary
 
 
 
STATE OF HAWAI' I                                                         )
)           SS:
CITY AND COUNTY OF HONOLULU                             )
On , in the First Circuit, State of Hawai'i, before me personally appeared and to me personally known, who, being by me duly sworn or affirmed, did say that they are the  and  respectively, of A & B Properties, Inc., a Hawaii corporation, that said persons executed the foregoing instrument identified or described as Completion Guaranty on behalf of said A & B Properties, Inc., by authority of its board of directors and said and   acknowledged the instrument to be the free act and deed of said corporation.
November 28, 2012
Michael G. Wright,
Charles W. Loomis,
Executive Vice President
Assistant Secretary
Michael G. Wright
Charles W. Loomis
The foregoing instrument is undated and contained  pages at the time of this acknowledgment/certification.
10
 
  
 
   
   
   
   
   
   
  
/s/ Dayle S. Sasaki-Hamamoto      
   
   
Print Name:    
Dayle S. Sasaki-Hamamoto     
   
Notary Public, State of Hawai'i
My commission expires:
August 3, 2015
   
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALEX/ALEX-8K-20130125171915.txt.gz
TIME:20130125171915
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2.):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.03  Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
On January 22, 2013, Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. (the Company) completed the purchase of a 170,300 square-foot, 10-building retail center in Leeward Oahu for $10.1 million in cash and the assumption of a $19.7 million loan (the Loan). The Promissory Note for the Loan is secured by a Mortgage, Assignment of Leases and Rents and Security Agreement, bears interest at 5.3922 percent, and requires monthly payments of principal and interest totaling $124,552. A final balloon payment of $18.5 million is due on October 5, 2015. In connection with the loan assumption, the Company has also provided a limited guaranty for the payment of all obligations under the Loan. The guaranty is limited to 10 percent of the outstanding principal balance of the Loan upon the occurrence of an event of default, plus any cost incurred by the lender.
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date:  January 25, 2013
ALEXANDER & BALDWIN, INC.
                                                    
/s/ Paul K. Ito
Paul K. Ito
Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer,
Treasurer and Controller


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALEX/ALEX-8K-20130130154703.txt.gz
TIME:20130130154703
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2.):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(e)           Material Compensatory Plan, Contract or Arrangement.
 
 1.           .
Performance Share Unit Awards
 
On January 28, 2013, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. (the Company) authorized performance share unit awards under the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. 2012 Incentive Compensation Plan.  A copy of the form of Performance Share Unit Award Agreement and Notice of Award of Performance Share Units is attached as Exhibits 10.1 and 10.2, respectively, and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
On January 29, 2013, the Board of Directors adopted the amended and restated Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. One-Year Performance Improvement Incentive Plan (the PIIP), pursuant to which the Companys executive officers and other senior executives may become entitled to cash bonus payments based on attainment of specified Company and/or business unit performance goals and individual performance for each year.  A copy of the PIIP is attached as Exhibit 10.3, and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
Item 9.01  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
(d)           Exhibits.
 
 
                                           
Exhibit Number
Description
 
 
10.1                                Form of Performance Share Unit Award Agreement.
 
 
10.2                                Form of Notice of Award of Performance Share Units.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
ALEXANDER & BALDWIN, INC.
______________
/s/
Paul K. Ito
Paul K. Ito
Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer,
Treasurer and Controller
Dated:           January 30, 2013
 
 
 
 
                                
Exhibit Number
Description
 
 
10.1                                Form of Performance Share Unit Award Agreement.
 
 
10.2                                Form of Notice of Award of Performance Share Units.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
Executive
RECITALS
A.           The Corporation has implemented the Plan for the purpose of providing eligible persons in the Corporations service with the opportunity to participate in one or more cash or equity incentive compensation programs designed to encourage them to continue their service relationship with the Corporation.
 
B.           Participant is to render valuable services to the Corporation (or any Parent or Subsidiary), and this Agreement is executed pursuant to, and is intended to carry out the purposes of, the Plan in connection with the Corporations issuance of shares of Common Stock to Participant under the Stock Issuance Program.
 
C.           All capitalized terms in this Agreement shall have the meaning assigned to them in the attached Appendix A.
 
, it is hereby agreed as follows:
NOW, THEREFORE
 
1.
 
.  The Corporation hereby awards to Participant, as of the Award Date, Performance Share Units under the Plan.  Each Performance Share Unit which vests pursuant to the terms of this Agreement shall provide Participant with the right to receive one or more shares of Common Stock on the designated issuance date for those shares.  The number of shares of Common Stock subject to the awarded Performance Share Units and the applicable performance-vesting requirements for those shares shall be as set forth in the Award Notice.  The remaining terms and conditions shall be as set forth in this Agreement.
Grant of Performance Share Units
 
2.
 
.  Prior to the actual issuance of the Shares which vest hereunder, Participant may not transfer any interest in the Performance Share Units subject to the Award or the underlying Shares or pledge or otherwise hedge the sale of those units or Shares, including (without limitation) any short sale or any acquisition or disposition of any put or call option or other instrument tied to the value of those Shares.  However, any Shares which vest hereunder but otherwise remain unissued at the time of Participants death may be transferred pursuant to the provisions of Participants will or the laws of inheritance or to Participants designated beneficiary or beneficiaries of this Award. Participant may also direct the Corporation to record the ownership of any Shares which in fact vest and become issuable hereunder in the name of a revocable living trust established for the exclusive benefit of Participant or Participant and his or her spouse. Participant may make such a beneficiary designation or ownership directive at any time by filing the appropriate form with the Plan Administrator or its designee.
Limited Transferability
 
 
 
 
3.
 
Vesting Requirements
. 
 The actual number of Shares that may vest and become issuable pursuant to the Performance Share Units subject to the Award shall be determined pursuant to a two-step process:  (i) first there shall be calculated the maximum number of Shares in which Participant can vest based upon the level at which the Performance Goal specified on Schedule I to the Award Notice is actually attained and (ii) then the number of Shares resulting from the clause (i) calculation in which Participant shall actually vest shall be determined on the basis of his or her completion of the applicable Service-vesting provisions set forth below.  Accordingly, the vesting of the Shares shall be calculated as follows:
 
      
(a)
Performance Vesting
: 
 Within sixty (60) days following the completion of the Performance Period, the Plan Administrator shall, on the basis of the level at which the Performance Goal has been attained, determine the applicable number of Performance-Qualified Shares in accordance with the provisions of the Award Notice and Schedule I attached thereto.
 
       
                                                (b)
Service Vesting
:  The Performance-Qualified Shares so determined represent the maximum number of Shares in which Participant can vest hereunder.  The actual number of Shares in which Participant shall vest shall be determined as follows:
 
           
(i)
If Participant continues in Service through the completion of the two (2)-year Performance Period, Participant shall vest in all of the Performance-Qualified Shares. The Shares underlying those particular Performance-Qualified Shares shall be issued to Participant during the period beginning with the first business day of the first calendar year following the completion of the Performance Period and ending on March 15th of that year.
 
           
(ii)
If Participant ceases Service during the Performance Period by reason of Early Retirement, Normal Retirement, death or Permanent Disability, then Participant shall, upon the completion of such Performance Period, vest in a portion of the Performance-Qualified Shares determined by multiplying (x) the maximum number of Performance-Qualified Shares in which Participant would have vested, based on the actual level of Performance Goal attainment for the Performance Period, had Participant completed the two (2)-year Service vesting requirement set forth in subparagraph (i) above by (y) a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of months of actual Service completed by Participant in such Performance Period (rounded to the closest whole month), and the denominator of which is twenty-four (24) months.  The Shares underlying the Performance-Qualified Shares in which Participant vests in accordance with this subparagraph (ii) shall be issued to Participant during the period beginning with the first business day of the first calendar year following the completion of the Performance Period and ending on March 15th of that year.
 
           
(iii)
If Participants Service ceases for any other reason prior to the completion of the Performance Period, then Participant shall not vest in any of the Performance-Qualified Shares, and all of Participants right, title and interest in and to the Shares subject to this Award shall immediately terminate.
 
                                  Schedule I attached to this Agreement sets forth examples illustrating the calculation of the number of Shares in which the Participant may vest based upon hypothetical levels of Performance Goal attainment and service vesting requirements.
 
4.
 
Stockholder Rights and Dividend Equivalents
 
(a)
 
The holder of this Award shall not have any stockholder rights, including voting, dividend or liquidation rights, with respect to the Shares subject to the Award until Participant becomes the record holder of those Shares upon their actual issuance following the Corporations collection of the applicable Withholding Taxes.
 
(b)
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, should any dividend or other distribution payable other than in shares of Common Stock be declared and paid on the Corporations outstanding Common Stock in one or more calendar years during which one or more Performance Share Units remain subject to this Award (i.e., the underlying Shares are not otherwise issued and outstanding for purposes of entitlement to the dividend or distribution), then a special book account shall be established for Participant and credited with a phantom dividend equivalent to the actual dividend or distribution that would have been paid on the maximum number of shares of Common Stock that can qualify as Performance-Qualified Shares under this Award, had that number of Shares been issued and outstanding and entitled to that dividend or distribution.  To the extent one or more Shares subsequently vest hereunder upon the satisfaction of the applicable vesting requirements for those Shares, the phantom dividend equivalents credited to those particular Shares in the book account shall vest, and those vested dividend equivalents shall be distributed to Participant (in the same form the actual dividend or distribution was paid to the holders of the Common Stock entitled to that dividend or distribution or in such other form as the Plan Administrator deems appropriate under the circumstances) concurrently with the issuance of those vested Shares.    
 
(c)
 
To the extent the maximum number of Shares that can qualify as Performance-Qualified Shares under this Award is not in fact earned by reason of the level at which the Performance Goal is actually attained, then the phantom dividend equivalents credited to those unearned shares shall be cancelled, and Participant shall cease to have any right or entitlement to receive any distributions or other amounts with respect to those cancelled dividend equivalents.
 
(d)
 
Should Participant cease Service without vesting in one or more of the Performance-Qualified Shares subject to this Award (including any Performance-Qualified Shares which do not otherwise vest at that time after taking into account any applicable vesting acceleration provisions set forth in this Agreement), then the phantom dividend equivalents credited to those unvested Performance-Qualified Shares shall be cancelled, and Participant shall thereupon cease to have any further right or entitlement to those cancelled amounts.
 
(e)
 
Each distribution under Paragraph 4(b) shall be subject to the Corporations collection of the Withholding Taxes applicable to that distribution.
 
5.
 
Change in Control.
  
The following provisions shall apply to the extent a Change in Control is consummated prior to the completion of the applicable Performance Period and shall have no force or effect in the event the closing of the Change in Control occurs on or after the completion of such Performance Period.
 
(a)
 
This Award may be assumed by the successor entity or otherwise continued in full force and effect or may be replaced with a cash retention account established by the successor entity.  In such event, the following provisions shall be in effect:
 
(i)
 
The Performance-Vesting requirements of this Agreement shall terminate, and the assumption or continuation of this Award shall be effected in accordance with Paragraph 5(b) below on the basis of the number of Shares that would have been issuable under this Award had there been Target Level Attainment of the Performance Goal. The Service-vesting and issuance provisions of Paragraph 3(b) shall continue in effect with respect to the assumed or continued Award.
 
(ii)
 
If Participant ceases Service prior to the completion of the Performance Period by reason of Early Retirement, Normal Retirement, death or Disability, then Participant shall, upon the closing of the Change in Control or (if later) such cessation of Service, vest in that number of Shares determined by multiplying (x) the number of Performance-Qualified Shares that would have resulted had the Corporation achieved the Performance Goal at Target Level Attainment and Participant completed the two (2)-year Service vesting requirement of Paragraph 3(b) by (y) a fraction, (or other securities into which such Shares are converted in connection with the assumption of this Award) shall be issued to Participant on the of (i) the date the Shares would have otherwise been issued pursuant to the provisions of Paragraph 3(b)(ii) in the absence of such Change in Control or, should such cessation of Service occur after such Change in Control but within twenty-four (24) months after the closing of a Qualifying Change in Control, (ii) the date of Participants Separation from Service due to such cessation of Service.
the numerator of which is the number of months of actual Service completed by Participant in such Performance Period (rounded to the closest whole month), and the denominator of which is twenty-four (24) months.  The Shares
in which Participant so vests
earlier
 
(iii)
 
Any cash retention account established in replacement of this Award shall initially be credited with the fair market value (at the effective time of the Change in Control) of the number of Shares that would have been issuable under this Award had there been Target Level Attainment of the Performance Goal, and interest shall accrue on the outstanding balance of such account, for the period commencing with the closing date of the Change in Control and continuing through the date of the final payment of the account, including any deferred payment date under Paragraph 9, at a variable per annum rate, compounded semi-annually, equal to the prime rate of interest as in effect from time to time during such period, as determined on the basis of the prime rate quotations published in .  The cash retention account shall vest and be paid out in accordance with the Service-vesting and issuance provisions of Paragraph 3(b) or (to the extent applicable) in accordance with the pro-rata Service-vesting and issuance provisions of Paragraph 5(a)(ii) above. The Participants interest in the account shall at all times be that of a general, unsecured creditor.
The Wall Street Journal
 
(iv)
 
In the event of such assumption or continuation of this Award or such replacement of the Award with a cash retention account, no accelerated vesting of the Performance Share Units subject to this Award or the underlying Shares shall occur at the time of the Change in Control, and the Service-vesting provisions of Paragraph 3(b) shall continue in full force and effect.
 
(b)
 
In the event this Award is assumed or otherwise continued in effect in connection with such Change in Control, the securities subject to the Award shall be adjusted immediately after the consummation of that Change in Control so as to apply to the number and class of securities into which the number of Shares issuable under this Award at Target Level Attainment of the Performance Goal would have been converted in consummation of that Change in Control had that number of Shares actually been issued and outstanding at that time. To the extent the actual holders of the outstanding Common Stock receive cash consideration for their Common Stock in consummation of the Change in Control, the successor corporation (or parent entity) may, in connection with the assumption or continuation of the performance share units subject to the Award at that time, but subject to the Plan Administrators approval prior to the Change in Control, substitute one or more shares of its own common stock with a fair market value equivalent to the cash consideration paid per share of Common Stock in the Change in Control transaction, provided such common stock is readily tradable on an established U.S. securities exchange or market.
 
(c)
 
Upon Participants Separation from Service due to an Involuntary Termination occurring within twenty-four (24) months after a Change in Control in which this Award is assumed or continued in effect, Participant shall immediately vest in that number of Shares (or other securities into which such Shares are converted in connection with the assumption of this Award) equal to the Performance-Qualified Shares that would have resulted had the Corporation achieved the Performance Goal at Target Level Attainment and Participant completed the two (2)-year Service vesting requirement of Paragraph 3(b), and that number of Shares (or other securities) shall be issued to Participant on the of (i) the date those Shares would have otherwise been issued pursuant to the provisions of Paragraph 3(b) in the absence of such Change in Control or, should such cessation of Service occur within twenty-four (24) months after the closing of a Qualifying Change in Control, (ii) the date of Participants Separation from Service (if earlier) due to such cessation of Service. Should this Award be replaced with a cash retention account in accordance with Paragraph 5(a), then that account shall vest upon Participants Separation from Service due to the Involuntary Termination, provided and only ifsuch Involuntary Termination occurs within twenty-four (24) months following the Change in Control. Such vested balance, together with all accrued interest thereon through the actual payment date, shall be distributed, as to each Share to which the cash retention account pertains, on the of (x) the date that Share would have otherwise been issued pursuant to the Service-vesting and issuance provisions set forth in Paragraph 3(b) in the absence of such Change in Control or (y) the date of Participants Separation from Service, provided such Separation from Service occurs within twenty-four (24) months after a Qualifying Change in Control. Except for the number of Shares and the cash retention balance distributed in accordance with the foregoing provisions of this Paragraph 5(c), Participant shall have no further right or entitlement to any additional Shares or other cash amounts hereunder upon such Separation from Service.
earlier
 
earlier
 
(d)
 
If the Award is not assumed by the successor entity or otherwise continued in effect or replaced with a cash retention account in accordance with Paragraph 5(a), then the following provisions shall apply in the event the Change in Control is effected prior to the completion of the Performance Period:
 
(i)
 
If Participant continues in Service through the effective date of the Change in Control, then Participant shall, upon the closing of such Change in Control, vest in that number of Shares equal to the Performance-Qualified Shares that would have resulted had the Corporation achieved the Performance Goal at Target Level Attainment and Participant completed the two (2)-year Service vesting requirement of Paragraph 3(b). The Shares in which Participant so vests shall be converted into the right to receive the same consideration per share of Common Stock payable to the other stockholders of the Corporation in consummation of the Change in Control. Such consideration per Share shall be distributed to Participant on the to occur of (x) the date the Share would have otherwise been issued pursuant to the Service-vesting and issuance provisions set forth in Paragraph 3(b) in the absence of such Change in Control, (y) the date of Participants Separation from Service, provided such Separation from Service occurs within twenty-four (24) months after a Qualifying Change in Control, or (z) the first date following a Qualifying Change in Control transaction on which the distribution can be made without contravention of any applicable provisions of Code Section 409A.
earliest
 
(ii)
 
To the extent the consideration payable per share of Common Stock in the Change in Control is in the form of cash, a fully-vested cash retention account shall be established by the successor entity at the time of such Change in Control for each Share that vests on an accelerated basis in accordance with Section 5(d)(i) above. Such account shall be credited with the amount of the cash consideration payable for the Shares, and interest shall accrue on the outstanding balance of that account, for the period commencing with the closing date of the Change in Control and continuing through the date of the final payment of the account, including any deferred payment date under Paragraph 9, at a variable per annum rate, compounded semi-annually, equal to the prime rate of interest as in effect from time to time during such period, as determined on the basis of the prime rate quotations published in . The cash retention account, together with all accrued interest thereon through the actual payment date, shall be distributed, as to each Share to which that cash retention account pertains, in accordance with the foregoing distribution provisions of  Paragraph 5(d)(i) above, and the Participants interest in the account shall at all times be that of a general, unsecured creditor.
The Wall Street Journal
 
(iii)
 
If Participant ceases Service prior to the effective date of the Change in Control by reason of Early Retirement, Normal Retirement, death or Disability then Participant shall, upon the closing of such Change in Control, vest in that number of  Shares determined by multiplying (x) the number of Performance-Qualified Shares that would have resulted had the Corporation achieved the Performance Goal at Target Level Attainment and Participant completed the two (2)-year Service vesting requirement of Paragraph 3(b) by (y) a fraction, shall be  converted into the right to receive the same consideration per share of Common Stock payable to the other stockholders of the Corporation in consummation of the Change in Control. Such consideration per Share shall be distributed to Participant on the of (A) the date the Share would have otherwise been issued pursuant to the provisions of Paragraph 3(b)(ii) in the absence of such Change in Control or (B) the first date following a Qualifying Change in Control transaction on which the distribution can be made without contravention of any applicable provisions of Code Section 409A.
the numerator of which is the number of months of actual Service completed by Participant in such Performance Period (rounded to the closest whole month), and the denominator of which is twenty-four (24) months. The Shares in which Participant so vests
earlier
 
(iv)
 
Except for the amount of consideration so calculated, Participant shall have no further right or entitlement to any additional Shares or consideration under this Award.
 
6.
 
Change in Control Benefits Agreement
. 
 Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, if Participant is, at the time of a change in control or ownership of the Corporation (whether or not that transaction constitutes a Change in Control hereunder), a party to a Change in Control Benefits Agreement with the Corporation, then the provisions of that agreement shall, to the extent applicable to this Award, govern Participants rights and benefits with respect to the performance share units and underlying Shares subject to this Agreement, and in the event of any conflict between the provisions of that Change in Control Benefits Agreement and this Agreement, the provisions of the Change in Control Benefits Agreement shall be controlling;
provided, however,
that in the event there is any conflict between the issuance or distribution provisions of this Agreement and the issuance or distribution provisions of the Change in Control Benefits Agreement, the issuance and distribution provisions of this Agreement shall be controlling.
 
7.
 
.  Should any change be made to the Common Stock by reason of any stock split, stock dividend, recapitalization, combination of shares, exchange of shares, spin-off transaction, extraordinary dividend or distribution or other change affecting the outstanding Common Stock as a class without the Corporations receipt of consideration, or should the value of the outstanding shares of Common Stock be substantially reduced as a result of a spin-off transaction or an extraordinary dividend or distribution, or should there occur any merger, consolidation or other reorganization, then equitable adjustments shall be made by the Plan Administrator to the total number and/or class of securities issuable pursuant to this Award in order to reflect such change.  In making such equitable adjustments, the Plan Administrator shall take into account any amounts credited to Participants book account under Paragraph 4(b) in connection with the transaction, and the determination of the Plan Administrator shall be final, binding and conclusive.  In the event of any Change in Control transaction, the adjustment provisions of Paragraph 5(b) shall be controlling.
Adjustment in Shares
 
8.
 
.
Issuance of Vested Shares and Applicable Withholding Taxes
 
(a)
 
Any Shares to be issued to Participant in accordance with the foregoing provisions of this Agreement shall be in the form of a book entry evidencing ownership of those Shares. Actual certificates for the vested Shares evidenced by book entry ownership shall be promptly delivered upon the request of Participant or any other person having an interest at the time in those Shares.
 
(b)
 
The Corporation shall collect the Withholding Taxes with respect to each non-Share distribution by withholding a portion of that distribution equal to the amount of the applicable Withholding Taxes, with the cash portion of the distribution to be the first portion so withheld.
 
(c)
 
Unless Participant (i) otherwise makes satisfactory arrangements with the Corporations Human Resources Department, on or before the expiration of the designated notification period preceding the applicable issuance date of the Shares, to pay the applicable Withholding Taxes through the delivery of  a check payable to the Corporation in the amount of such Withholding Taxes and (ii) in fact delivers such check to the Corporation not later than that issuance date, the Corporation shall collect the Withholding Taxes applicable to the Share issuance through the following automatic share withholding method:
 
-           On the applicable issuance date, the Corporation shall withhold, from the vested Shares otherwise issuable to Participant at that time, a portion of those Shares with a Fair Market Value (measured as of the issuance date) equal to the applicable Withholding Taxes; provided, that the number of  Shares which the Corporation shall be required to so withhold shall not exceed in Fair Market Value the amount necessary to satisfy the Corporations required tax withholding obligations using the minimum statutory withholding rates for federal and state tax purposes, including payroll taxes, that are applicable to supplemental taxable income.
, however
 
(d)
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this Paragraph 8, the employee portion of the federal, state and local employment taxes required to be withheld by the Corporation in connection with the vesting of the Shares or any other amounts hereunder (the Employment Taxes) shall in all events be collected from the Participant no later than the last business day of the calendar year in which the Shares or other amounts vest hereunder.  Accordingly, to the extent the applicable issuance date for one or more vested Shares or the distribution date for such other amounts is to occur in a year subsequent to the calendar year in which those Shares or other amounts vest, the Participant shall, on or before the last business day of the calendar year in which the Shares or other amounts vest, deliver to the Corporation a check payable to its order in the dollar amount equal to the Employment Taxes required to be withheld with respect to those Shares or other amounts. The provisions of this Paragraph 8(d) shall be applicable only to the extent necessary to comply with the applicable tax withholding requirements of Code Section 3121(v).
 
(e)
 
Except as otherwise provided in Paragraph 5 or this Paragraph 8, the settlement of all performance share units which vest under the Award shall be made solely in shares of Common Stock.  In no event, however, shall any fractional shares be issued.  Accordingly, the total number of shares of Common Stock to be issued at the time the Award vests shall, to the extent necessary, be rounded down to the next whole share in order to avoid the issuance of a fractional share.
 
9.
 
otwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this Agreement, to the extent this Award may be deemed to create a deferred compensation arrangement under Code Section 409A, then the following limitation and provisions shall apply:
 
Code Section 409A.
 
N
 
-           No Shares or other amounts which become issuable or distributable under this Agreement upon Participants Separation from Service shall actually be issued or distributed to Participant prior to the of (i) the first (1st) day of the seventh (7th) month following the date of such Separation from Service or (ii) the date of Participants death, if Participant is deemed at the time of such Separation from Service to be a specified employee under Section 1.409A-1(i) of the Treasury Regulations issued under Code Section 409A, as determined by the Plan Administrator in accordance with consistent and uniform standards applied to all other Code Section 409A arrangements of the Corporation, and such delayed commencement is otherwise required in order to avoid a prohibited distribution under Code Section 409A(a)(2). The deferred Shares or other distributable amount shall be issued or distributed in a lump sum on the first (1st) day of the seventh (7th) month following the date of Participants Separation from Service or, if earlier, the first day of the month immediately following the date the Corporation receives proof of Participants death.
earlier
 
10.
 
.  The issuance of shares of Common Stock pursuant to the Award shall be subject to compliance by the Corporation and Participant with all applicable requirements of law relating thereto and with all applicable regulations of any Stock Exchange on which the Common Stock may be listed for trading at the time of such issuance.
Compliance with Laws and Regulations
 
11.
 
.  Any notice required to be given or delivered to the Corporation under the terms of this Agreement shall be in writing and addressed to the Corporation at its principal corporate offices.  Any notice required to be given or delivered to Participant shall be in writing and addressed to Participant at the address indicated below Participants signature line on the Award Notice.  All notices shall be deemed effective upon personal delivery or upon deposit in the U.S. mail, postage prepaid and properly addressed to the party to be notified.
Notices
 
12.
 
.  Except to the extent otherwise provided in this Agreement, the provisions of this Agreement shall inure to the benefit of, and be binding upon, the Corporation and its successors and assigns and Participant, Participants assigns, the legal representatives, heirs and legatees of Participants estate and any beneficiaries of the Award designated by Participant.
Successors and Assigns
 
13.
 
.
Construction
 
(a)
 
This Agreement and the Award evidenced hereby are made and granted pursuant to the Plan and are in all respects limited by and subject to the terms of the Plan and any applicable Change in Control Benefits Agreement.  All decisions of the Plan Administrator with respect to any question or issue arising under the Plan or this Agreement shall be conclusive and binding on all persons having an interest in the Award.
 
(b)
 
 To the extent there is any ambiguity as to whether any provision of this Agreement would otherwise contravene one or more applicable requirements or limitations of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code and the Treasury Regulations thereunder, such provision shall be interpreted and applied in a manner that complies with the applicable requirements of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code and the Treasury Regulations thereunder.
 
(c)
 
This Agreement shall not in any way affect the right of the Corporation to adjust, reclassify, reorganize or otherwise change its capital or business structure or to merge, consolidate, dissolve, liquidate or sell or transfer all or any part of its business or assets.
 
14.
 
.  The interpretation, performance and enforcement of this Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of Hawaii without resort to that States conflict-of-laws rules.
Governing Law
 
15.
 
. If Participant is on the Award Date, or at any time thereafter becomes, either an executive officer of the Corporation subject to Section 16 of the 1934 Act, or a participant in the Corporations Performance Improvement Incentive Plan, then Participant shall be subject to the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Policy Regarding Recoupment of Certain Compensation, effective as of June 29, 2012 (the Recoupment Policy), the terms of which are hereby incorporated herein by reference and receipt of a copy of which Participant hereby acknowledges.  If Participant is subject to the Recoupment Policy, then any incentive compensation that is paid or granted to, or received by, Participant on or after June 29, 2012 (including any incentive compensation that is paid to, or received by, Participant on or after June 29, 2012 pursuant to an incentive compensation award made to Participant prior to June 29, 2012, whether by the Corporation or any predecessor entity) and during the three-year period preceding the date on which the Corporation is required to prepare an accounting restatement due to material non-compliance with any applicable financial reporting requirements under the federal securities laws shall be subject to recovery and recoupment pursuant to the terms of such policy.  For purposes of such Recoupment Policy, incentive compensation means any cash or equity-based award (e.g., stock award, restricted stock unit award, performance share unit award or stock option grant or shares of Common Stock issued thereunder) or any profit sharing payment or distribution that is based upon the achievement of financial performance metrics.  An additional copy of the Recoupment Policy is available upon request made to the Corporate Secretary at the Corporations principal offices.
Coverage under Recoupment Policy
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The following definitions shall be in effect under the Agreement:
 
A.
 
shall mean this Performance Share Unit Award Agreement.
Agreement
 
B.
 
shall mean the award of performance share units made to Participant pursuant to the terms of this Agreement.
Award
 
C.
 
shall mean the date the Performance Share Units are awarded to Participant pursuant to the Agreement and shall be the date specified in the Award Notice.
Award Date
 
D.
 
shall mean the Notice of Award of Performance Share Units delivered to Participant in which there is set forth the basic terms of the Performance Share Units subject to this Agreement.
Award Notice
 
E.
 
shall mean the Corporations Board of Directors.
Board
 
F.
 
shall mean the commission of any act of fraud, embezzlement or dishonesty by Participant, any unauthorized use or disclosure by Participant of confidential information or trade secrets of the Corporation (or any Parent or Subsidiary), or any other intentional misconduct by Participant adversely affecting the business or affairs of the Corporation (or any Parent or Subsidiary) in a material manner; , that in the event Participant is, at the time the Corporation (or any Parent or Subsidiary) purports to terminate Participants Employee status for Cause, a party to a Change in Control Benefits Agreement applicable to the Award, the term shall have the meaning ascribed to that term in such Change in Control Benefits Agreement.  The foregoing definition shall not in any way preclude or restrict the right of the Corporation (or any Parent or Subsidiary) to discharge or dismiss Participant or any other person in the Service of the Corporation (or any Parent or Subsidiary) for any other acts or omissions, but such other acts or omissions shall not be deemed, for purposes of the Plan and this Agreement, to constitute grounds for termination for Cause.
Cause
provided, however
Cause
 
G.
 
shall mean a change of ownership or control of the Corporation effected through any of the following transactions:
Change in Control
 
(i)
 
a merger, consolidation or other reorganization approved by the Corporations stockholders, securities representing fifty percent (50%) or more of the total combined voting power of the voting securities of the successor corporation are immediately thereafter beneficially owned, directly or indirectly and in substantially the same proportion, by the persons who beneficially owned the Corporations outstanding voting securities immediately prior to such transaction,
unless
 
(ii)
 
a sale, transfer or other disposition of all or substantially all of the Corporations assets,
 
(iii)
 
the closing of any transaction or series of related transactions pursuant to which any person or any group of persons comprising a group within the meaning of Rule 13d-5(b)(1) of the 1934 Act (other than the Corporation or a person that, prior to such transaction or series of related transactions, directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by or is under common control with, the Corporation) acquires directly or indirectly (whether as a result of a single acquisition or by reason of one or more acquisitions within the twelve (12)-month period ending with the most recent acquisition) beneficial ownership (within the meaning of Rule 13d-3 of the 1934 Act) of securities possessing (or convertible into or exercisable for securities possessing) thirty-five percent (35%) or more of the total combined voting power of the Corporations securities (as measured in terms of the power to vote with respect to the election of Board members) outstanding immediately after the consummation of such transaction or series of related transactions, whether such transaction involves a direct issuance from the Corporation or the acquisition of outstanding securities held by one or more of the Corporations existing stockholders, or
 
(iv)
 
a change in the composition of the Board over a period of twelve (12) consecutive months or less such that a majority of the Board members ceases, by reason of one or more contested elections for Board membership, to be comprised of individuals who either (A) have been Board members continuously since the beginning of such period or (B) have been elected or nominated for election as Board members during such period by at least a majority of the Board members described in clause (A) who were still in office at the time the Board approved such election or nomination;
 
, that in the event Participant is a party to a Change in Control Benefits Agreement applicable to the Award, the term shall have the meaning ascribed to that term in such Change in Control Benefits Agreement.
provided, however
Change in Control
 
H.
 
Change in Control Benefits Agreement
shall mean any separate agreement between Participant and the Corporation which provides Participant with special vesting acceleration and/or other special benefits with respect to one or more awards of restricted stock units made to Participant for shares of Common Stock, including (to the extent applicable) the performance share units evidenced by this Agreement, in the event of a change in control or ownership of the Corporation (whether or not constituting a Change in Control hereunder).
 
I.
 
shall mean the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
Code
 
J.
 
shall mean shares of the Corporations common stock.
Common Stock
 
K.
 
shall mean Alexander & Baldwin, Inc., a Hawaii corporation, and any successor corporation to all or substantially all of the assets or voting stock of Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. which shall by appropriate action adopt the Plan.
Corporation
 
L. 
Early Retirement
shall mean Participants retirement from Service, with the prior approval of the Corporation (or the Parent or Subsidiary employing Participant), on or after the attainment of age fifty-five (55) and the completion of at least five (5) years of Service.
 
M.
 
shall mean an individual who is in the employ of the Corporation (or any Parent or Subsidiary), subject to the control and direction of the employer entity as to both the work to be performed and the manner and method of performance.
Employee
 
N.
 
Extraordinary Level Attainment
 shall mean the Corporations achievement of the Performance Goal set forth in Schedule I to the Award Notice at the level  designated as Extraordinary Level attainment for that goal.
 
O.
 
per share of Common Stock on any relevant date shall be the closing selling price per share of Common Stock at the close of regular hours trading (i.e., before after-hours trading beings) on date in question on the Stock Exchange serving as the primary market for the Common Stock, as such price is reported by the National Association of Securities Dealers (if primarily traded on the Nasdaq Global Select Market) or as officially quoted in the composite tape of transactions on any other Stock Exchange on which the Common Stock is then primarily traded.  If there is no closing selling price for the Common Stock on the date in question, then the Fair Market Value shall be the closing selling price on the last preceding date for which such quotation exists.
Fair Market Value
 
P.
 
he occurrence of any of the following events effected without Participants consent: (A) a change in Participants position with the Corporation (or any Parent or Subsidiary employing Participant) which materially reduces Participants duties and responsibilities or the level of management to which Participant reports, (B) a relocation of Participants principal place of employment by more than fifty (50) miles, (C) a reduction in Participants level of compensation, as measured in terms of base salary, fringe benefits and target annual incentive payment, by more than ten percent (10%) or (D) the failure by the Corporation to continue in effect any stock option or other equity-based plan in which Participant is participating, or in which Participant is entitled to participate, immediately prior to a change in control of the Corporation, unless an equitable arrangement (embodied in an ongoing substitute or alternative plan) has been made with respect to such plan; or the failure by the Corporation to continue Participants participation therein (or in such substitute or alternative plan) on a substantially equivalent basis, both in terms of the amount or timing of payment of benefits provided and the level of Participants participation relative to other participants, as existed immediately prior to the change in control of the Corporation.
Good Reason
 shall mean
t
 
However, in the event Participant is at the time of his or her cessation of Employee status a party to a Change in Control Benefits Agreement applicable to the Award evidenced by this Agreement, the term shall have the meaning ascribed to that term in such Change in Control Benefits Agreement.
Good Reason
 
Q.
 
shall mean the Participants Separation from Service by reason of:
Involuntary Termination
 
(i)           Participants involuntary dismissal or discharge by the Corporation for reasons other than for Cause, or
 
(ii)           Participants voluntary resignation for Good Reason.
 
R.
 
1934 Act
 shall mean the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time.
 
S.
 
at or after the attainment of age sixty-five (65).
Normal Retirement
 shall mean shall mean the cessation of Service by reason of retirement 
 
T.
 
shall mean the person to whom the Award is made pursuant to the Agreement.
Participant
 
U.
 
shall mean any corporation (other than the Corporation) in an unbroken chain of corporations ending with the Corporation, provided each corporation in the unbroken chain (other than the Corporation) owns, at the time of the determination, stock possessing fifty percent (50%) or more of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock in one of the other corporations in such chain.
Parent
 
V.
 
Performance Goal
 shall mean the performance goal specified on Schedule I of the Award Notice.
 
W.
 
Performance Period
 shall mean the period specified on Schedule I of the Award Notice over which the attainment of the Performance Goal is to be measured.
 
X.
 
Performance-Qualified Shares
 shall mean the maximum number of Shares in which Participant can vest based on the level at which the Performance Goal for the Performance Period is attained and shall be calculated in accordance with the provisions of the Award Notice.  In no event shall the number of such Performance-Qualified Shares exceed one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the designated number of Performance Share Units set forth in the Performance Share Units section of the Award Notice.  Each Performance-Qualified Share that vests pursuant to the terms of the Award shall entitle Participant to receive one Share.
 
Y.
 
Performance Share Units
 shall mean the number of phantom shares of Common Stock awarded under this Agreement that shall be applied to the calculation of the maximum number of Performance-Qualified Shares (if any) based on the level at which the Performance Goal is in fact attained over the applicable Performance Period.
 
Z.
 
Permanent Disability
 shall mean the inability of Participant to engage in any substantial gainful activity by reason of any medically determinable physical or mental impairment expected to result in death or to be of continuous duration of twelve (12) months or more.
 
AA.
 
shall mean the Corporations 2012 Incentive Compensation Plan.
Plan
 
BB.
 
shall mean either the Board or a committee of the Board acting in its capacity as administrator of the Plan.
Plan Administrator
 
CC.
 
shall mean the date on which there occurs a Change in Control that also qualifies as: (i) a change in the ownership of the Corporation, as determined in accordance with  Section 1.409A-3(i)((5)(v) of the Treasury Regulations, (ii) a change in the effective control of the Corporation, as determined in accordance with  Section 1.409A-3(i)((5)(vi) of the Treasury Regulations, or (iii) a change in the ownership of a substantial portion of the assets of the Corporation, as determined in accordance with  Section 1.409A-3(i)((5)(vii) of the Treasury Regulations.
Qualifying Change in Control
 
DD.
 
shall mean the Participants cessation of Employee status by reason of his or her death, retirement or termination of employment.  The Participant shall be deemed to have terminated employment for such purpose at such time as the level of his or her bona fide services to be performed as an Employee (or as a consultant or independent contractor) permanently decreases to a level that is less than fifty percent (50%) of the average level of services he or she rendered as an Employee during the immediately preceding thirty-six (36) months of employment (or such shorter period for which he or she may have rendered such services). Solely for purposes of determining when a Separation from Service occurs, Participant will be deemed to continue in Employee status for so long as he or she remains in the employ of one or more members of the Employer Group, subject to the control and direction of the employer entity as to both the work to be performed and the manner and method of performance. Employer Group means the Corporation and any Parent or Subsidiary and any other corporation or business controlled by, controlling or under common control with, the Corporation, as determined in accordance with Sections 414(b) and (c) of the Code and the Treasury Regulations thereunder, except that in applying Sections 1563(1), (2) and (3) of the Code for purposes of determining the controlled group of corporations under Section 414(b), the phrase at least 50 percent shall be used instead of at least 80 percent each place the latter phrase appears in such sections and in applying Section 1.414(c)-2 of the Treasury Regulations for purposes of determining trades or businesses that are under common control for purposes of Section 414(c), the phrase at least 50 percent shall be used instead of at least 80 percent each place the latter phrase appears in Section  1.4.14(c)-2 of the Treasury Regulations.  Any such determination as to Separation from Service, however, shall be made in accordance with the applicable standards of the Treasury Regulations issued under Section 409A of the Code.
Separation from Service
 
EE.
 
shall mean Participants performance of services for the Corporation (or any Parent or Subsidiary) in the capacity of an Employee, a non-employee member of the board of directors or a consultant or independent advisor. For purposes of this Agreement, Participant shall be deemed to cease Service immediately upon the occurrence of the either of the following events: (i) Participant no longer performs services in any of the foregoing capacities for the Corporation (or any Parent or Subsidiary) or (ii) the entity for which Participant performs such services ceases to remain a Parent or Subsidiary of the Corporation, even though Participant may subsequently continue to perform services for that entity. Service as an Employee shall not be deemed to cease during a period of military leave, sick leave or other personal leave approved by the Corporation; , that the following special provisions shall be in effect for any such leave:
Service
provided, however
 
(i)
 
Should the period of such leave (other than a disability leave) exceed six (6) months, then Participant shall be deemed to cease Service and to incur a Separation from Service upon the expiration of the initial six (6)-month period of that leave, unless Participant retains a right to re-employment under applicable law or by contract with the Corporation (or any Parent or Subsidiary).
 
(ii)
 
Should the period of a disability leave exceed twenty-nine (29) months, then Participant shall be deemed to cease Service and to incur a Separation from Service upon the expiration of the initial twenty-nine (29)-month period of that leave, unless Participant retains a right to re-employment under applicable law or by contract with the Corporation (or any Parent or Subsidiary).   For such purpose, a disability leave shall be a leave of absence due to any medically determinable physical or mental impairment that can be expected to result in death or to last for a continuous period of not less than six (6) months and  causes Participant to be unable to perform the duties of his or her position of employment with the Corporation (or any Parent or Subsidiary) or any substantially similar position of employment with the Corporation (or any Parent or Subsidiary).
 
(iii)
 
Except to the extent otherwise required by law or expressly authorized by the Plan Administrator or by the Corporations written policy on leaves of absence, no Service credit shall be given for vesting purposes for any period Participant is on a leave of absence.
 
(iv)
 
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the provisions of this Service definition, Participant shall in all events be deemed to cease Service for purpose of this Award immediately upon Participants incurrence of a Separation from Service.
 
FF.
 
Shares
 shall mean the shares of Common Stock which may vest and become issuable under the Award pursuant to the terms of this Agreement and the Award
Notice.
 
GG.
 
shall mean the American Stock Exchange, the Nasdaq Global or Global Select Market or the New York Stock Exchange.
Stock Exchange
 
HH.
 
shall mean any corporation (other than the Corporation) in an unbroken chain of corporations beginning with the Corporation, provided each corporation (other than the last corporation) in the unbroken chain owns, at the time of the determination, stock possessing fifty percent (50%) or more of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock in one of the other corporations in such chain.  The term shall also include any wholly-owned limited liability company in such chain of subsidiaries that is disregarded for federal income tax purposes.
Subsidiary
Subsidiary
 
II.
 
Target Level Attainment
 shall mean the Corporations achievement of each Performance Goal set forth in Schedule I to the Award Notice at the level designated as Target Level attainment for that goal.
 
JJ.
 
shall mean the federal, state and local income taxes and the employee portion of the federal, state and local employment taxes required to be withheld by the Corporation in connection with the vesting and issuance of the shares of Common Stock which vest under the Award and any phantom dividend equivalents distributed with respect to those shares.
Withholding Taxes
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The following examples are for illustration purposes only:
 
1.
 
Participant receives an Award for 2,000 Shares at Target Level and Participant continues in Service until the completion of the two (2)-year Performance Period. If the Performance Goal is attained at the Target Level, Participant shall vest in all 2,000 Shares following the completion of the Performance Period. If the Performance Goal is attained at the Extraordinary Level, Participant shall vest in an additional 1,000 Shares for a total of 3,000 Shares following the completion of the Performance Period, provided he or she continues in Service through the completion of the Performance Period.
 
2.
 
Participant receives an Award for 2,000 Shares at Target Level and Participant ceases Service due to Permanent Disability halfway through the Performance Period.  If the Performance Goal is attained at the Target Level, Participant shall vest in 1,000 Shares.   On the other hand, if the Performance Goal is attained at the Extraordinary Level, Participant shall vest in an additional 500 Shares for a total of 1,500 Shares.
 
3.
 
Participant receives an Award for 2,000 Shares at Target Level and Participant continues in Service through the completion of the two (2)-year Performance Period.   If the Performance Goal is attained at a point halfway between the Threshold and Target Levels, Participant would vest in 1,350 Shares following the completion of the Performance Period.  On the other hand, if the Performance Goal is attained at a point halfway between the Target and Extraordinary Levels, Participant would vest in 2,500 Shares following the completion of the Performance Period.
 
4.
 
 Participant receives an Award for 2,000 Shares at Target Level and Participant ceases Service due to Permanent Disability halfway through the Performance Period.  If the Performance Goal is attained at a point halfway between the Threshold and Target Levels, Participant would vest in 675 Shares following the completion of the Performance Period.  On the other hand, if the Performance Goal is attained at a point halfway between the Target and Extraordinary Levels, Participant would vest in 1,250 Shares following the completion of the Performance Period.
 

The Corporation hereby awards to Participant, as of the Award Date indicated below, an award (the Award) of Performance Share Units under the Corporations 2012 Incentive Compensation Plan (the Plan).  Each Performance Share Unit represents the right to receive one or more shares of Common Stock on the applicable issuance date following the vesting of that Performance Share Unit.  The number of Performance Share Units subject to this Award and the applicable performance-vesting requirement for those Performance Share Units and the underlying shares of Common Stock are set forth below. The remaining terms and conditions governing the Award, including the applicable service-vesting requirements and the applicable issuance date or dates for the shares of Common Stock that vest and become issuable under the Award, shall be as set forth in the form Performance Share Unit Award Agreement.
 
 
Participant understands and agrees that the Award is granted subject to and in accordance with the terms of the Plan and hereby agrees to be bound by the terms of the Plan and the terms of the Award as set forth in the form Performance Share Unit Award Agreement attached hereto as .  A copy of the Plan is available upon request made to the Human Resources Department at the Corporations principal offices at 822 Bishop Street, Honolulu, Hawaii 96813.
Exhibit A
 
. By accepting this Award, Participant hereby agrees that should Participant at this time be, or at any time hereafter become, either an executive officer of the Corporation subject to Section 16 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or a participant in the Corporations Performance Improvement Incentive Plan, then:
Coverage under Recoupment Policy
 
(a)           Participant shall be subject to the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Policy Regarding Recoupment of Certain Compensation, effective as of June 29, 2012, the terms of which are hereby incorporated herein by reference and receipt of a copy of which Participant hereby acknowledges; and
 
(b)           any incentive compensation that is paid or granted to, or received by, Participant on or after June 29, 2012 (including any incentive compensation that is paid to, or received by, Participant on or after June 29, 2012 pursuant to an incentive compensation award made to Participant prior to June 29, 2012, whether by the Corporation or any predecessor entity) and during the three-year period preceding the date on which the Corporation is required to prepare an accounting restatement due to material non-compliance with any applicable financial reporting requirements under the federal securities laws shall, accordingly, be subject to recovery and recoupment pursuant to the terms of such policy.
 
For purposes of such recoupment policy, incentive compensation means any cash or equity-based awards (e.g., any stock award, restricted stock unit award, performance share unit award or stock option grant or shares of Common Stock issued thereunder) or any profit sharing payment or distribution that is based upon the achievement of financial performance metrics.  An additional copy of the recoupment policy is available upon request made to the Corporate Secretary at the Corporations principal offices.
 
. Participant further acknowledges and agrees that, except to the extent the Plan Administrator notifies Participant in writing to the contrary, each subsequent award of Performance Share Units made to him or her under the Plan shall be subject to the same terms and conditions set forth in the form Performance Share Unit Award Agreement attached hereto as , and Participant hereby accepts those terms and conditions for each such subsequent Performance Share Unit award that may be made to him or her under the Plan and hereby agrees to be bound by those terms and conditions for any such Performance Share Unit awards, without any further consent or acceptance required on his or her part at the time or times when those awards may be made.  However, Participant may, at any time he or she holds an outstanding Performance Share Unit award under the Plan, request a written copy of the form Performance Share Unit Award Agreement from the Corporation by contacting the Corporations Human Resources Department at the Corporations principal offices.
Continuing Consent
Exhibit A
 
.  Nothing in this Notice or in the form Performance Share Unit Award Agreement or in the Plan shall confer upon Participant any right to continue in Service for any period of specific duration or interfere with or otherwise restrict in any way the rights of the Corporation (or any Parent or Subsidiary employing or retaining Participant) or of Participant, which rights are hereby expressly reserved by each, to terminate Participants Service at any time for any reason, with or without cause.
Employment at Will
 
.  All capitalized terms in this Notice shall have the meaning assigned to them in this Notice or in the form Performance Share Unit Award Agreement.
Definitions
 
DATED:   _____________, 2013
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
PERFORMANCE PERIOD
 
The Performance Period shall be the two-year period beginning January 1, 2013 and ending December 31, 2014.
 
PERFORMANCE GOAL FOR PERFORMANCE VESTING
 
The performance-vesting requirement for the Performance Share Units subject to this Award shall be tied to the percentile level at which the total shareholder return (including stock price appreciation and reinvestment of any cash dividends or other stockholder distributions) to the Corporations stockholders over the Performance Period stands in relation to the total shareholder return realized for that period by the companies comprising the S&P MidCap 400 Index.
Performance Goal   Total Shareholder Return:
For such purpose, the total shareholder return () for the Corporations stockholders shall be determined pursuant to the following formula:
TSR
TSR  = (            
Ending Stock Price* - Beginning Stock Price**) + Reinvested Dividends***
 
                                                      Beginning Stock Price**
*  Ending Stock Price is the average daily closing price per share of the Common Stock calculated for last thirty-one (31) days within the Performance Period.
**  Beginning Stock Price is the average daily closing price per share of the Common Stock calculated for the thirty-one (31)-day period immediately preceding the commencement date of the Performance Period.
*** Reinvested Dividends shall be calculated by multiplying (i) the aggregate number of shares (including fractional shares) of Common Stock that could have been purchased during the Performance Period had each cash dividend paid on a single share of Common Stock during that period been immediately reinvested in additional shares (or fractional shares) of Common Stock at the closing price per share of the Common Stock on the applicable dividend payment date by (ii) the average daily closing price per share of Common Stock calculated for the last thirty-one (31) days within the Performance Period.
Each of the foregoing amounts shall be equitably adjusted for stock splits, stock dividends, recapitalizations and other similar events affecting the shares in question without the issuers receipt of consideration.
For each company in the S&P MidCap 400 Index, the TSR with respect to its common stock shall be calculated in the same manner as for the Common Stock.
Should a Change in Control occur during the Performance Period, then the attained level of the Performance Goal shall be determined in accordance with the applicable Change in Control provisions of the form Performance Share Unit Award Agreement.
The actual number of Performance-Qualified Shares that results from such certification (the ) may range from 0% to 150% of the number of Performance Share Units subject to this Award, with the actual percentage to be determined on the basis of the percentile level at which the Plan Administrator certifies that the TSR Performance Goal has been attained in relation to the total shareholder return realized for that period by the companies comprising the S&P MidCap 400 Index; , that the maximum number of the shares of Common Stock that may qualify as Performance-Qualified Shares may not exceed 150% of the number of Performance Share Units subject to this Award.
Performance-Qualified Shares:
Within sixty (60) days after the completion of the  Performance Period, the Plan Administrator shall determine and certify the actual level at which the TSR Performance Goal is attained. 
Performance-Qualified Shares
provided, however
The number of shares of Common Stock that may qualify as Performance-Qualified Shares on the basis of the certified percentile level of TSR Performance Goal attainment shall be calculated by multiplying the number of Performance Share Units subject to this Award by the applicable percentage determined in accordance with the following payout slope for the TSR Performance Goal:
Payout Slope for Determining Number of Performance-Qualified Shares Based on Attained Levels of TSR Performance Goal:  
 
 
 
 
    
   
   
   
   
 
                             *
linear interpolation between performance levels, rounded down to the nearest whole share
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
I.           
Establishment and Purpose
 
A.           Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. (the Company) established the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. One-Year Performance Improvement Incentive Plan (the Plan) on June 29, 2012.  The Plan was subsequently amended and restated effective January 1, 2013.
 
B.           The purpose of this Plan is to motivate employees to exceed business plan performance and to provide a reward to individuals for their successful results.  Further, the Plan is intended to:
 
1.           Communicate and reinforce the changing management style and direction the Company is to take.
 
2.           Emphasize current and future profitability, improvement or desirable change.
 
3.           Improve the planning process throughout the Company.
 
4.           Reinforce the implementation of business plans.
 
5.           Reward Company, subsidiary, business unit, division and individual performance above that which is expected.
 
C.           It is further intended that this Plan will complement other compensation program components to assure a sound basis upon which the Company will attract and retain key employees.
 
D.           Payment of incentive compensation under the Plan is conditioned on attainment of specified goals for a performance period and a service retention period that extends through the date of payment of an award for that performance period as described below.
II.           
Administration
 
A.           The Compensation Committee (the Committee) of the Companys Board of Directors (the Board of Directors) shall have responsibility for administration of this Plan.  Under the direction of this Committee, the corporate officer in charge of the compensation programs of the Company and other executives designated by the Chief Executive Officer of the Company shall develop and maintain guidelines for the administration of the Plan and will perform day-to-day administrative details as required.
 
B.           The Committee shall interpret the Plan, make or approve procedures and guidelines relating to it, and make any factual determinations arising in connection with it.  The Committee's interpretations and determinations shall be final and binding.
 
III.           
Eligibility
 
A.           Employees must have served with the Company or its subsidiaries in an eligible assignment for the full Plan Year to be eligible for an award.  A Plan Year is a calendar year.   An eligible assignment is a job categorized as the CEO, Band A, or Band B under the Company's job evaluation program.  Eligible Employees who are hired or promoted after the start of a Plan Year may, at the discretion of the Committee, become eligible for a pro-rata bonus based on their length of service that year.
 
B.           Employees must be on the payroll at the time awards are paid for the previous Plan Year, except that employees who have become Permanently Disabled, taken Early Retirement with the approval of the Company, taken Normal Retirement, or died during the Plan Year for which the award is made shall be eligible to receive a pro-rata award based on their performance and their term of service during that Plan Year.  For purposes of the Plan, the following definitions shall be in effect:  (1) Permanently Disabled shall mean the inability of the participant to engage in any substantial gainful activity by reason of any medically determinable physical or mental impairment expected to result in death or to be of continuous duration of twelve (12) months or more; (2) Early Retirement shall mean the participants termination of employment, on or after attainment of age fifty-five (55) and completion of at least five (5) years of service; and (3) Normal Retirement shall mean the participants termination of employment on or after attainment of age sixty-five (65).
 
C.           Exceptions (additions or deletions) to the eligibility requirements of A above can be made by the Committee.
 
IV.           
Goals (Objectives)
 
A.           The Plan is based on attainment of performance objectives that relate to financial, operational or other criteria with respect to the Company, any of its subsidiaries, business units and/or divisions (Company Goals) and individual performance.
B.           The Company Goals used as the basis of this Plan shall be approved by the Committee and may include, but are not limited to, one or more of the following criteria: (i) cash flow; (ii) earnings  (including gross margin, earnings before interest and taxes, earnings before taxes, earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation, amortization and charges for stock-based compensation, earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, and net earnings); (iii) earnings per share; (iv) growth in earnings or earnings per share; (v) stock price; (vi) return on equity or average stockholder equity; (vii) total stockholder return or growth in total stockholder return either directly or in relation to a comparative group; (viii) return on capital; (ix) return on assets or net assets; (x) invested capital, required rate of return on capital or return on invested capital; (xi) revenue, growth in revenue or return on sales; (xii) income or net income; (xiii) operating income, net operating income or net operating income after tax; (xiv) operating profit or net operating profit; (xv) operating margin; (xvi) return on operating revenue or return on operating profit; (xvii) collections and recoveries; (xviii) property purchases, sales, investments and construction goals; (xix) application approvals; (xx) litigation and regulatory resolution goals; (xxi) occupancy or occupancy rates; (xxii) leases, contracts or financings, including renewals; (xxiii) overhead, savings, G&A and other expense control goals; (xxiv) budget comparisons; (xxv) growth in stockholder value relative to the growth of the S&P 400 or S&P 400 Index, the S&P Global Industry Classification Standards (GICS) or GICS Index, or another peer group or peer group index; (xxvi) credit rating; (xxvii) development and implementation of strategic plans and/or organizational restructuring goals; (xxviii) development and implementation of risk and crisis management programs; (xxix) improvement in workforce diversity; (xxx) net cost per ton; (xxxi) crop yields; (xxxii) compliance requirements and compliance relief; (xxxiii) safety goals; (xxxiv) productivity goals; (xxxv) workforce management and succession planning goals; (xxxvi) economic value added (including typical adjustments consistently applied from generally accepted accounting principles required to determine economic value added performance measures); (xxxvii) measures of customer satisfaction, employee satisfaction or staff development; (xxxviii) development or marketing collaborations, formations of joint ventures or partnerships or the completion of other similar transactions intended to enhance the Companys revenue or profitability or enhance its customer base; (xxxix) merger and acquisitions; (xl) water rights; (xli) entitlement; (xlii); regulatory approvals, (xliii) investment in and acquisition of real estate, (xliv) formation of joint ventures partnerships, and strategic alliances to acquire, develop and commercialize real estate, (xlv) building the pipeline of development projects, including planning, design, permitting and construction thereof, (xlvi) risk mitigation goals, (xlvii) objectives tied to long-term growth and shareholder value creation, and (xlviii) other similar criteria consistent with the foregoing.  In addition, such performance criteria may be based upon the attainment of specified levels of the Companys performance under one or more of the measures described above relative to the performance of other entities and may also be based on the performance of any of the Companys subsidiaries, business units or divisions.  Each applicable performance goal may include a minimum threshold level of performance below which no award will be earned, levels of performance at which specified portions of an award will be earned and a maximum level of performance at which an award will be fully earned. Each applicable performance goal may be structured at the time of the award to provide for appropriate adjustment for one or more of the following items: (A) asset impairments or write-downs; (B) litigation judgments or claim settlements; (C) the effect of changes in tax law, accounting principles or other such laws or provisions affecting reported results; (D) accruals for reorganization and restructuring programs; (E) bonus, incentive, pension or other post-retirement compensation costs or accruals; (F) any extraordinary nonrecurring items; (G) the operations of any business acquired by the Company; (H) the divestiture of one or more business operations or the assets thereof; and (I) any other adjustment consistent with the operation of the Plan.
C.           Performance goals shall be weighted as determined by the Committee and may vary from participant to participant.  For each performance objective, the Committee may establish up to three (3) designated levels of attainment: threshold, target and extraordinary levels of attainment.  The Committee may also establish an alternative formula for determining the bonus potential at various points of performance goal attainment.
V.           
Individual Bonus Awards
 
A.           .  For each Company Goal established pursuant to Section IV, a bonus opportunity for each participant (stated as a dollar amount or percentage of salary) will be set at one or more levels based on corresponding levels of attainment of that goal. For example, a target level bonus may be set for target level attainment of each established goal.  Accordingly, each participants maximum award under the Plan for a particular Plan Year shall be equal to the sum of the maximum level of bonus opportunity set for each goal established for him or her for that Plan Year.
Opportunity
 
B.           .  For each Plan Year, the Committee shall establish a bonus pool, which will be funded based on the actual level of attainment of Company Goals for that year.  The Committee shall determine the formula to be used to fund the bonus pool.  Subject to Committee discretion, a minimum level of achievement must be obtained for each Company Goal to fund the pool.  The Committee may, in its sole discretion, increase or decrease (including to zero) the funding of the pool for any year regardless of performance.  However, the maximum bonus pool for a Plan Year shall not exceed 200% of the aggregate target bonuses for all participants for such Plan Year.  The aggregate bonuses paid for a Plan Year to all participants shall not exceed the bonus pool for that year, and shall not exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000).
Bonus Pool
 
C.           .  Once the bonus pool is funded for a Plan Year, the bonus payable to each participant for that Plan Year shall be determined initially based on attainment of Company Goals and modified based on individual performance as described below.  However, the actual bonus amount to be paid to the participant shall be subject to his or her satisfaction of the employment requirement set forth in Section III.B (or any pro-ration effected in accordance with such section) and any adjustments effected by the Committee pursuant to Section V.C.3.
Individual Bonus Calculation
1.           .  Based on the Committees determination of the attained level of each Company Goal and the participant's bonus opportunity, an initial calculation shall be made of the bonus amount for the participant attributable to that goal, and the participants potential bonus amount for that Plan Year shall be equal to sum of those individually calculated bonus amounts.
Initial Individual Bonus Calculation
2.           .  The amount determined pursuant to Section V.C.1 shall be adjusted by a multiplier (ranging from 0% to 150%) based on the Chief Executive Officers subjective evaluation of the participant's individual performance, provided that the adjustment for the Chief Executive Officers bonus amount shall be conducted by the Committee.  A participant who does not meet his or her performance expectations will not receive any bonus under the Plan.  In no event shall the adjustment pursuant to this Section V.C.2 result in a bonus for a participant in excess of 150% of the amount of bonus determined for such participant under Section V.C.1.
Individual Performance Modifier
 
3.           .  The award calculated for each participant pursuant to Section V.C.1 and Section V.C.2 may be increased or decreased by the Committee in its absolute discretion if such award does not, in the judgment of the Committee, accurately reflect the performance of the Company or of the applicable subsidiary, business unit, division or individual (including, without limitation by reason of circumstances occurring during the Plan Year, which may or may not have been beyond the control of the Company, subsidiary, business unit, division or the individual participant).  Such adjustments by the Committee may be applied uniformly with respect to all participants, or such adjustment may be applied selectively with respect to one or more individual participants.
Committee Discretion
 
D.           
Payments
1.           Approval of the award payments for each Plan Year will be made by the Committee at its first meeting following the availability of the financial results for that Plan Year.  Award payments shall be made as soon as practicable following such approval but in no event later than March 15 of the year following the Plan Year to which the award relates.
2.           Awards shall be paid only in cash, with such cash payment to be made at the time the award is determined.  Participants will not be permitted to receive any portion of their awards in the form of the Companys common stock.
 
3.           All award payments shall be subject to the Companys collection of all applicable income and employment withholding taxes.
 
VI.           
General Provisions
 
A.           Nothing herein contained shall be construed to limit or affect in any manner or degree the normal and usual powers of management, exercised by the officers and the Board of Directors or committees thereof, to change the duties or the character of employment of any employee of the Company or to terminate a participant's employment with the Company at any time, all of which rights and powers are hereby expressly reserved.
 
B.           It is intended that the Plan shall continue from year to year.  However, the Board of Directors reserves the right to modify, amend or terminate the Plan at any time; provided, that no amendment or termination shall affect the rights of participants to receive awards finally determined by the Committee but unpaid at the time of such termination or amendment.
 
C.           The parameters of the Plan shall be construed, administered and governed by the laws of the State of Hawaii without resort to its conflict-of-laws provisions.
D.           No amounts awarded or accrued under this Plan shall actually be funded, set aside or otherwise segregated prior to payment.  The obligation to pay the bonuses awarded hereunder shall at all times be an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company.  Plan participants shall have the status of general creditors and shall look solely to the general assets of the Company for the payment of their bonus awards.
E.           The Plan shall be administered, operated and construed in compliance with the requirements of the short-term deferral exception to Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code (the Code) and Treasury Regulations Section 1.409A-1(b)(4).  Accordingly, to the extent there is any ambiguity as to whether one or more provisions of the Plan would otherwise contravene the requirements or limitations of Section 409A of the Code applicable to such short-term deferral exception, then those provisions shall be interpreted and applied in a manner that does not result in a violation of the requirements or limitations of Section 409A of the Code and the Treasury Regulations thereunder that apply to such exception.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. has caused this Plan to be executed by its duly authorized officers effective this 1st day of January, 2013.
 
 
ALEXANDER & BALDWIN, INC.
 
By
/s/ Son-Jai Paik                                
      Its Vice President
 
By
/s/ Alyson J. Nakamura                  
                      Its Secretary
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALEX/ALEX-8K-20130219162048.txt.gz
TIME:20130219162048
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2.):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.  Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. issued a press release on February 19, 2013 announcing its 2012 fourth quarter earnings.  This information, attached as Exhibit 99.1, is being furnished to the SEC pursuant to Item 2.02 of Form 8-K.
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)           Exhibits
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date:  February 19, 2013
ALEXANDER & BALDWIN, INC.
                                                    
/s/ Paul K. Ito
Paul K. Ito
Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer,
Treasurer and Controller
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
(A&B or Company) today announced full-year 2012 adjusted net income of $32.3 million, or $0.75 per diluted share, which excludes charges associated with the separation of A&B from Matson, Inc. on June 29, 2012, such as professional and other fees and the non-cash impairment of two California development properties. Including these charges, net income was $20.5 million, or $0.48 per diluted share. These results compared to 2011 net income of $23.5 million, or $0.55 per diluted share. Revenues for 2012 were $296.7 million compared to 2011 revenues of $267.7 million.
Honolulu (February 19, 2013) -- Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. (NYSE:ALEX)
1
Full-year 2012 earnings benefitted from the solid performance of our leasing and agribusiness segments and tax benefits from our development of a 6-megawatt solar farm at Port Allen, Kauai, and a land donation. While overall property sales were modest, were encouraged by a pick-up in sales activity we are now seeing in our projects, said Stanley M. Kuriyama, A&B chairman and chief executive officer. In June 2012, A&B completed its separation from Matson, marking a major milestone in the Companys 140-year history. As a separate company, A&B remains focused on both creating value from our extensive Hawaii real estate holdings, and investing in new real estate opportunities. In 2012, we made good progress toward the latter objective by increasing our exposure to Oahus improving residential real estate market through high-rise condominium investments in Honolulus urban core. Our commercial property portfolio also performed well in 2012, achieving a 4% year-over-year improvement in Net Operating Income. Our agribusiness segment produced excellent results in 2012, but will be challenged by sharply reduced sugar prices. In 2013, well continue to invest in our core land businesses, and look for other opportunities to grow the Company in Hawaii.
2
Key shareholder value-creating accomplishments during 2012 included the following:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Fourth Quarter Financial Results
 
Fourth quarter net income was $8.7 million, or $0.20 per diluted share, compared to a net loss for the fourth quarter 2011 of $3.1 million, or $0.07 per diluted share. Fourth quarter revenues were $90.8 million in 2012 compared to $87.3 million in 2011.
Financial performance improved significantly over 2011s fourth quarter as we experienced meaningful increases in development sales and leasing results, said Kuriyama. "Agribusiness results, however, were lower than the fourth quarter of 2011, due in part to lower-than-anticipated sugar production for the year. We also recognized significant tax benefits from the development of our Port Allen solar farm and the land donation.
Real estate leasing operating profit in the quarter of $10.2 million was 12% higher than the $9.1 million recorded in the fourth quarter of 2011. Comparative results benefited from higher occupancy and lower expenses. Fourth quarter 2012 occupancy for the Mainland and Hawaii portfolios were 95% and 92%, respectively, compared to 92% and 91% for the fourth quarter of 2011. Net Operating Income (NOI) for the quarter was $15.5 million, a 2% increase over the fourth quarter of 2011.
2
Operating profit for the real estate development and sales segment was $1.3 million for the quarter, compared to a $10.6 million loss recorded in the fourth quarter of 2011 from the write-off of the Companys investment in the Waiawa joint venture and joint venture losses. Sales for the quarter, inclusive of joint venture sales, consisted of three non-core land parcels on Maui, three club cottage units at Kukuiula, two residential units at Wailea, and three residential units at Ka Milo on the Big Island. Sales were partially offset by joint venture operating costs and general and administrative expenses.
Agribusiness operating profit for the fourth quarter of 2012 was $1.2 million, $6.1 million lower than the fourth quarter of 2011 principally due to the higher cost of sugar sold resulting from lower full-year production, an adjustment for the cost of sugar sold in the prior three quarters due to lower than expected full-year sugar production, and lower power margins due to lower volume of power sold.
Corporate expenses for the quarter were $3.4 million compared to $7.0 million for the fourth quarter of 2011. Corporate expenses declined primarily due to a decrease in professional services fees and lower compensation-related expenses.
During the fourth quarter of 2012, the Company recognized a $2.7 million income tax benefit primarily driven by the construction of the Port Allen solar farm, which was placed into service in December 2012, and donation of land.
 
Refer to page 9 of this release for a discussion of the Companys use of non-GAAP financial measures and a reconciliation of adjusted net income and adjusted diluted earnings per share to net income and diluted earnings per share.
1
 
 
Refer to page 10 of this release for a discussion of the Companys use of non-GAAP financial measures and a reconciliation of leasing operating profit to cash NOI.
2
 
 
 
Analysis of Financial Results
 
Real estate development and sales and leasing revenue and operating profit are analyzed before subtracting amounts related to discontinued operations. This is consistent with how the Company evaluates performance and makes decisions regarding capital allocation, acquisitions and dispositions. Direct year-over-year comparison of real estate development and sales results may not provide a consistent, measurable indicator of future performance because results from period to period are significantly affected by the mix and timing of property sales. Operating results, by virtue of each projects asset class, geography and timing, are inherently episodic. Earnings from joint venture investments are not included in segment revenue, but are included in operating profit.
 
Real Estate Leasing  Fourth quarter of 2012 compared to 2011
 
Real estate leasing revenue and operating profit for the fourth quarter of 2012 were higher than for the fourth quarter of 2011 primarily due to higher occupancy and lower expenses.
 
 
 
Real Estate Leasing  2012 compared to 2011
Real estate leasing revenue for 2012 was 1% higher than for 2011. The increase was principally due to the impact of acquisitions and dispositions, and a reversal of deferred rent in 2011 related to a tenant bankruptcy.
Operating profit was 6% higher in 2012, compared with 2011, principally due to higher occupancy in the Mainland portfolio, lower expenses related to the previously mentioned tenant bankruptcy in 2011, and the favorable impact of the timing of acquisitions and dispositions.
Real Estate Development and Sales  Fourth quarter of 2012 compared to 2011
 
Revenue was $5.4 million, principally due to the revenue recognized from the sale of three non-core land parcels on Maui and a residential unit on Oahu. Operating profit also included joint venture sales of three residential units on Kauai, two residential units on Maui and three residential units on the Big Island, which were more than offset by joint venture expenses.
2012 Fourth Quarter:
Revenue was $2.8 million and the operating loss was $10.6 million. The operating loss included a $6.4 million non-cash reduction in the carrying value of the Companys Waiawa joint venture investment and other joint venture losses, partially offset by the sales of two residential units on Oahu, and a leased fee parcel and two non-core parcels on Maui.
2011 Fourth Quarter:
Real Estate Development and Sales  2012 compared to 2011
Revenue was $32.2 million, principally related to the sale of 286 acres of agricultural-zoned land on Maui, a 4.1-acre parcel at Maui Business Park II, the Firestone office building in California, two leased fee parcels on Maui, three residential units on Oahu, and several non-core land parcels on Maui. Operating profit additionally included joint venture sales of a parcel, a residential lot and six cottages on Kauai, two residential units on Maui, and eight residential units on the Big Island. The margin on the sales described above was partially offset by $9.8 million of non-cash impairment charges in the second quarter of 2012, related to the Companys Santa Barbara and Bakersfield development projects in California, resulting from the Companys change in its development strategy to focus on development projects in Hawaii, as well as joint venture expenses.
2012:
Revenue and operating profit included the sales of the Arbor Park Shopping Center in Texas, two commercial properties, an 86-acre industrial parcel, a leased fee parcel and several non-core parcels on Maui, and one commercial and six residential units on Oahu. Losses from joint ventures included in operating profit consisted of the aforementioned reduction in the carrying value of the Waiawa joint venture and other ongoing joint venture expenses, partially offset by a gain on the sale of the Companys interest in the Bridgeport Marketplace project in California, a four-acre commercial parcel at Kukuiula on Kauai and four residential units on the island of Hawaii.
2011:
  
Agribusiness  Fourth quarter of 2012 compared to 2011
Agribusiness revenue for the fourth quarter of 2012 was $60.9 million, consistent with the fourth quarter of 2011.
Operating profit for the fourth quarter of 2012 decreased $6.1 million compared to the fourth quarter of 2011. The decrease was principally due to an increase in the cost of sugar sold due to lower full-year production, an adjustment to increase the cost of sugar sold in the prior three quarters based on lower than expected full-year production, and lower power margins due to the lower volume of power sold. Full-year sugar production was lower than anticipated due principally to lower water availability.
Agribusiness  2012 compared to 2011
 
Agribusiness revenue increased $24.8 million, or 16%, in 2012 compared with 2011. The increase was primarily due to higher raw sugar sales revenue due to five sugar shipments in 2012 as compared to four sugar shipments in 2011, higher specialty sugar and molasses sales resulting from higher volume and prices, and higher parts and repair revenue in the trucking company subsidiaries, partially offset by lower charter revenue.
Operating profit decreased $1.4 million in 2012 compared with 2011, primarily due to an increase in the cost of sugar sold resulting from lower full-year production and was partially offset by margin improvement resulting from the sale of the Companys coffee assets in 2011, higher power margins from hydroelectric production on Kauai, and a reduction in charitable foundation contribution expenses.
Sugar production in 2012 was 2% lower than 2011 due principally to lower water availability.
About Alexander & Baldwin
 
Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. is a premier Hawaii land company, with interests in real estate development, commercial real estate and agriculture. With ownership of over 87,000 acres in Hawaii, A&B is the states fourth largest private landowner, and is one of the states most active real estate investors. A&B has a diverse portfolio of real estate development projects throughout Hawaii, and a commercial property portfolio comprising nearly eight million square feet of leasable space in Hawaii and on the U.S. Mainland. It is also the owner and operator of the Hawaiian Commercial & Sugar plantation on Maui, and a significant provider of renewable energy on the islands of Maui and Kauai. Additional information about A&B may be found at www.alexanderbaldwin.com.
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Statements in this press release that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements, within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, that involve a number of risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated by the relevant forward-looking statement. These forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance. This release should be read in conjunction with pages 20-38 of the information statement filed as Exhibit 99.1 to Alexander & Baldwin, Inc.s registration statement on Form 10 and other filings with the SEC through the date of this release, which identify important factors that could affect the forward-looking statements in this release. We do not undertake any obligation to update our forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. reports net income and diluted earnings per share in accordance with GAAP and on a non-GAAP basis. Reconciliations of the Companys GAAP to non-GAAP financial measures for the years ended December 31, 2012 and 2011 are presented below.
The Company uses these non-GAAP financial measures when evaluating operating performance because management believes that the exclusion from net income of 1) one-time advisory, legal, equity conversion and other expenses that were incurred to effect the separation of the Company from Matson, Inc., and 2) the reduction in carrying values of two of the Companys Mainland development projects that do not align with the Companys post-separation focus on Hawaii real estate development, provides insight into the Companys core operating results, future cash flow generation, and the underlying business trends affecting performance on a consistent and comparable basis from period to period. A&B provides this information to investors as an additional means of evaluating ongoing core operations. The non-GAAP financial information presented herein should be considered supplemental to, and not as a substitute for, or superior to, financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP.
 
 
 
In addition to adjusted net income and adjusted diluted earnings per share, the Company presents cash NOI, which is a non-GAAP measure derived from real estate revenues (determined in accordance with GAAP, less straight-line rental adjustments) minus property operating expenses (determined in accordance with GAAP). Cash NOI does not have any standardized meaning prescribed by GAAP, and therefore, may differ from definitions of cash NOI used by other companies. Cash NOI should not be considered as an alternative to net income (determined in accordance with GAAP) as an indicator of the Companys financial performance, or as an alternative to cash flow from operating activities as a measure of the Companys liquidity. Cash NOI is commonly used as a measure of operating performance because it is an indicator of the return on property investment, and provides a method of comparing property performance over time. Cash NOI excludes general and administrative expenses, straight-line rental adjustments, interest income, interest expense, depreciation and amortization, and gains on sales of interests in real estate. The Company believes that the real estate leasing segments operating profit after discontinued operations is the most directly comparable GAAP measurement to cash NOI. A required reconciliation of real estate leasing operating profit to real estate leasing segment same store cash NOI is as follows:
 
 
 
Represents the sale of a 286-acre agricultural parcel in the third quarter of 2012 classified as Gain on sale of agricultural parcel in the condensed consolidated statements of income, but reflected as revenue for segment reporting purposes.
1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
1
Excludes non-cash 1031 exchange transactions and capital expenditures for real estate development inventory.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALEX/ALEX-8K-20130228160714.txt.gz
TIME:20130228160714
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D. C. 20549
______________
 
FORM 8-K
______________
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): February 28, 2013
ALEXANDER & BALDWIN, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
822 Bishop Street, P. O. Box 3440
Honolulu, Hawaii 96801
(Address of principal executive office and zip code)
 
(808) 525-6611
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
 
Not Applicable
(Former Name or Former Address, if Changed Since Last Report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2.):
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On February 28, 2013, Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. made its Real Estate Supplement for its real estate operating segments, which provides certain supplemental operating and financial information for the years ended December 31, 2012 and 2011, available on its website. A copy of this Real Estate Supplement is being furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Date: February 28, 2013
 
 
 

 
ALEXANDER & BALDWIN, INC. S REAL ESTATE SUPPLEMENTAS OF AND FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2012 AND 2011(Unaudited)
 
 
About This SupplementThis periodic Supplement is designed to provide current and potential shareholders of Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. with additional information regarding the Companys Real Estate operating segments. This information is supplemental to and does not replace the information provided to shareholders in the Companys periodic filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.The information contained in this Supplement is unaudited and should be read in conjunction with the Companys quarterly and annual reports and other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company intends to provide periodic updates to the information contained herein, but is not required, and undertakes no obligation, to revise or update forward-looking statements or any factors that may affect actual results, whether as a result of new information, future events, or circumstances occurring after the dates on the cover of this Supplement.Feedback and suggestions regarding the contents of this Supplement are welcomed, and should be directed to Suzy P. Hollinger, Director, Investor Relations, via telephone at (808) 525-8422 or via email to shollinger@abinc.com.
 
 
Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Real Estate SupplementINDEX TO REAL ESTATE SUPPLEMENT(Unaudited)AS OF YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2012 AND 2011Forward-Looking Statements 3Basis of Presentation 3Periodic Updates 4About the Company 5Selected Financial Data 7Landholdings 9Landholdings 10Landholdings by Geographic Location (Table 1) 10Landholdings Under Joint Venture Development (Table 2) 10Landholdings by Type and Location (Table 3) 11A&B Ag Zoned Land Sales Data  Maui and Kauai 2007 to 2012 11(Table 4)Real Estate Sales 13Segment Strategy and Operations 14Real Estate Development Overview (Table 5) 15Reconciliation of Acreage Under Development (Table 5) to 17Landholdings (Table 3) (Table 6)Development Project Information Sheets 19Future Development Project Summaries 27Entitlement Activity 30Real Estate Investments 32Real Estate Leasing 33Segment Strategy and Operations 34Acquisition and Disposition Strategy 361
 
 
Asset Descriptions and Statistics 37Property Detail  Hawaii Improved Properties (Table 7) 37Property Detail  Mainland Improved Properties (Table 8) 38Comparable% Occupancy Data by Geographic Region and Asset 39Class (Table 9)Weighted Average Gross Leasable Area by Geographic Region 39and Asset Class (Table 10)Occupancy Analysis Trend - Last Five Quarters (Table 11) 39Real Estate Leasing Cash Net Operating Income (NOI) (Table 12) 40Real Estate Leasing Same Store Cash NOI (Table 13) 40Statement on Managements Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures 41Reconciliation of Real Estate Leasing Operating Profit to Cash 41NOI and Same Store Cash NOI (Non-GAAP) (Table 14)Portfolio Acquisitions and Dispositions 422012 and 2011 Improved Property Portfolio 42Acquisitions/Dispositions (Table 15)Lease Renewal Analysis 43Lease Expirations (Table 16) 43Portfolio Concentrations 44Tenant Concentrations as of 12/31/12 (Table 17) 44Hawaii Commercial Property Information Sheets 45Mainland Commercial Property Information Sheets 572
 
 
Forward-Looking StatementsThis Supplement contains certain forward-looking statements, such as forecasts and projections of the Companys future performance or statements of managements plans and objectives. These statements are forward-looking statements as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Except for historical information contained in this Supplement, such communications contain forward-looking statements. These include, for example, all references to current or future years. New risk factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for the Company to predict all such risk factors, nor can it assess the impact of all such risk factors on the Companys business or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statements. Accordingly, forward-looking statements cannot be relied upon as a guarantee of future results and involve a number of risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those projected in the statements, including, but not limited to the factors that are described in Part I, Item 1A under the caption of Risk Factors of the Companys Form 10-K, as well as factors that are described in the Companys other filings, including subsequent filings, with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The Company is not required, and undertakes no obligation, to revise or update forward-looking statements or any factors that may affect actual results, whether as a result of new information, future events, or circumstances occurring after the date of this report.Basis of PresentationThe information contained in this Supplement does not purport to disclose all items required by accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America (GAAP). The information contained in this Supplement is unaudited and should be read in conjunction with the Companys most recent Form 10-K and other filings with the SEC.3
 
 
Periodic UpdatesThe Company provides quarterly updates, but undertakes no obligation to continue to provide updates, of the information contained in the tables listed below:Table 7: Property Detail  Hawaii Improved PropertiesTable 8: Property Detail  Mainland Improved PropertiesTable 9: Comparable% Occupancy Data by Geographic Region andAsset ClassTable 10: Weighted Average Gross Leasable Area by Geographic Region andAsset ClassTable 11: Occupancy Analysis Trend  Last Five QuartersTable 12: Real Estate Leasing Cash NOITable 13: Real Estate Leasing Same Store Cash NOITable 14: Reconciliation of Real Estate Leasing Operating Profit to Cash NOI andSame Store Cash NOI (Non-GAAP)Table 15: Improved Property Portfolio Acquisitions/DispositionsFor detailed information on past quarters, refer to the quarterly supplements for 2012, which are available on the Companys website at www.alexanderbaldwin.com.The Company currently intends to update all other information contained herein on an annual basis.4
 
 
About the CompanyAlexander & Baldwin, Inc. (A&B or Company) is a Hawaii-based real estate and land company. Founded in 1870 as a sugar plantation, the Company has evolved from its agricultural roots into complementary businesses serving the real estate and agricultural needs of Hawaii. A&Bs operations reach beyond Hawaii to include a U.S. Mainland commercial property portfolio.A&B has significant landholdings in Hawaii; at December 31, 2012, the Company owned over 87,000 acres in the state, primarily on the islands of Maui and Kauai. A&B is responsible for the stewardship of this land and the long-term enhancement of its value. The vast majority of this land was acquired over 100 years ago to support the cultivation of sugar cane.For a significant portion of the Companys core Hawaii landholdings, agriculture and related uses represent the highest and best use for the foreseeable future, providing significant benefits to the community and shareholders alike. In total, roughly 86,500 acres of the Companys land, including land leased to others, are currently designated for agriculture and conservation uses (the latter consisting mainly of the collection and transport of water for irrigation purposes and hydroelectric power production). A&B cultivates sugar on nearly 36,000 acres (including land leased from third parties) in Mauis Central Valley. On Kauai, A&B leases roughly 4,600 acres to third parties engaged in a variety of agricultural activities, including cultivation of coffee and seed corn, and raising of livestock. The Company also utilizes its land assets to produce renewable energy, including biomass combustion, hydroelectric, and solar photovoltaic generation facilities.A&Bs integrated approach to land management ensures that lands suitable for development are employed at their highest and best use by undertaking planning, entitlement and development activities, where appropriate, to enhance the value of the Companys lands, while addressing market demand and community needs. By identifying and pursuing developments and transactions that enhance the value of raw landholdings, and reinvesting proceeds from these efforts into new developments and a portfolio of income-producing properties, A&B creates value for shareholders and diversifies its income stream. The Companys development activities, once limited to its legacy landholdings on Maui and Kauai, have expanded to encompass lands newly acquired for development and the participation in a number of development joint ventures throughout Hawaii. This expansion of the Companys development activities has allowed it to leverage its expertise, market knowledge and capital resources, while also mitigating risk.5
 
 
REAL ESTATEReal estate development and leasing activities are conducted by A&B Properties, Inc. (A&B Properties), a wholly owned subsidiary of A&B, and various other subsidiaries and affiliates of A&B. The Companys real estate business consists of two segments that operate in Hawaii and on the Mainland: sales and leasing. The real estate sales segment creates value through an active and comprehensive program of land stewardship, planning, entitlement, investment, development and sale of land and commercial and residential properties principally in Hawaii. The real estate leasing segment generates significant, stable, recurring cash flows through the ownership, operation and management of a portfolio of high-quality retail, office and industrial properties in Hawaii and on the Mainland. Cash generated by this portfolio serves as an important source of funding for A&B's real estate development activities.AGRIBUSINESSAgribusiness operations are conducted by Hawaiian Commercial & Sugar Company (HC&S), a division of A&B, and certain other wholly owned subsidiaries of A&B. Agribusiness produces and sells bulk raw sugar, specialty food-grade sugars and molasses, and is also a renewable energy provider on the islands of Maui and Kauai through hydroelectric and solar facilities and the cogeneration of electricity from bagasse at its sugar mill. This segment, which operates exclusively in Hawaii, also includes support services for other agricultural operations and includes general trucking services, mobile equipment maintenance and repair services.More information about the Company can be found at www.alexanderbaldwin.com.Corporate Headquarters WebsitesAlexander & Baldwin, Inc. Alexander & Baldwin, Inc.822 Bishop Street www.alexanderbaldwin.comHonolulu, HI 96813 A&B Properties, Inc.Investor Relationswww.abprop.comSuzy P. HollingerDirector, Investor Relations Hawaiian Commercial & Sugar Company(808) 525-8422 www.hcsugar.comshollinger@abinc.com Transfer Agent & RegistrarComputershare Shareowner ServicesP.O. Box 43006, Providence, RI 02940-3006(800) 454-0477http://www.computershare.com/us/Pages/sos.aspx?rocc=1Stock Exchange ListingNYSE: ALEX6
 
 
Selected Financial Data5-Year($in millions) 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 AverageRevenue 1Real Estate Leasing 107.0 102.5 93.8 99.7 100.6 100.7Real Estate Sales 350.0 125.5 131.0 59.8 32.2 139.7Agribusiness 121.6 99.6 165.6 157.5 182.3 145.3Reconciling items 4 - - - - (8.3) (1.7)Total 578.6 327.6 390.4 317.0 306.8 384.1Operating Profit 1Real Estate Leasing 47.8 43.2 35.3 39.3 41.6 41.4Real Estate Sales 5 95.6 39.1 50.1 15.5 (4.4) 39.2Agribusiness (12.9) (27.8) 6.1 22.2 20.8 1.7Total 5 130.5 54.5 91.5 77.0 58.0 82.3Capital ExpendituresReal Estate Leasing 54.5 14.3 16.3 8.6 11.1 21.0Real Estate Sales 79.6 52.7 122.5 43.6 57.6 71.2Agribusiness 3 13.6 4.8 5.9 10.2 34.4 13.8Total 147.7 71.8 144.7 62.4 103.1 105.9Real Estate Leasing Cash NOI 2 67.0 65.9 55.7 60.8 63.1 62.51 Includes real estate discontinued operations and intersegment revenue.2 3 4 5See page 41 for a statement regarding the Companys use of Cash NOI and a reconciliation of Leasing operating profit to Cash NOI.2012 Agribusiness capital expenditures include $23 million for the Port Allen solar project before tax credits.Represents the sale of a 286-acre agricultural parcel in the third quarter of 2012, which is reflected as revenue for segment reporting purposes.2012 includes $9.8 million of charges related to the noncash write down of the carrying values of non-strategic Mainland projects that do not align with the Companys post-separation focus on Hawaii real estate development.7
 
 
THIS PAGE WAS INTENTIONALLY LEFT BLANK.8
 
 
Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Real Estate SupplementLANDHOLDINGS9
 
 
LandholdingsAs of December 31, 2012, A&B and its subsidiaries owned 87,707 acres of land, consisting of 87,240 acres in Hawaii and 467 acres on the Mainland.TABLE 1LANDHOLDINGS BY GEOGRAPHIC LOCATIONDecember 31, 2012Location AcresMaui 66,800Kauai 20,360Oahu 70Big Island 10Total Hawaii 87,240Texas 150California 96Georgia 63Utah 55Colorado 36Washington 27Nevada 21Arizona 19Total U.S. Mainland 467Total landholdings87,707In addition to the landholdings included in Table 1, the Company leases an additional 2,910 acres on Maui, Kauai, and Oahu from third parties. Table 1 also does not include 1,088 acres held under joint venture development.TABLE 2LANDHOLDINGS UNDER JOINT VENTURE DEVELOPMENTDecember 31, 2012Original Acres atProject acres 12/31/12Kukuiula (HI) 1,000 958Bakersfield (CA) 57 57Ka Milo (HI) 31 22Kai Malu (HI) 25 2Santa Barbara Ranch (CA) 22 22Palmdale (CA) 18 18Crossroads (CA) 7 7Waihonua (HI) 2 2Total 1,162 1,08810
 
 
The bulk of the Companys 87,707 acres are used for agricultural, pasture, watershed and conservation purposes. A portion of these lands is used or planned for development or other urban uses, including the development projects described in the following pages. Table 3 details the Companys landholdings by type and location.TABLE 3LANDHOLDINGS BY TYPE AND LOCATIONDECEMBER 31, 2012Description Maui Kauai Oahu Big Island Mainland Total AcresFully entitledHawaii  development/otherActive development/sales 213 - - - - 213Future development 187 44 - - - 231Ground leases to third parties 64 1 - - - 65Land used by affiliates 21 24 - - - 45Other, including land not planned for development 15 33 - - - 48Total Hawaii  development/other 500 102 - - - 602Mainland  development 28 28Hawaii  commercial improved properties 54 8 70 10 - 142Mainland  commercial improved properties - - - - 439 439Subtotal  fully entitled 554 110 70 10 467 1,211Agricultural, pasture and miscellaneousHawaiian Commercial & Sugar Company 33,054 - - - - 33,054Leased to third parties 6,593 5,158 - - - 11,751Other agricultural, pasture and misc. purposes 10,749 1,772 - - - 12,521Subtotal  agricultural, pasture & misc. 50,396 6,930 - - - 57,326Watershed/conservationWainiha Valley - 10,120 - - - 10,120Other Kauai - 3,200 - - - 3,200Maui 15,850 - - - - 15,850Subtotal  watershed/conservation 15,850 13,320 - - - 29,170Total landholdings 66,800 20,360 70 10 467 87,707TABLE 4A&B AG ZONED LAND SALES DATA  MAUI AND KAUAI2007-2012AverageTotal acres price persold acre High Low0-5 acres 10 $107,300 $175,000 $11,5005-20 acres 67 61,300 167,800 24,30020-100 acres 323 29,400 55,700 14,000100+ acres 649 22,800 29,000 11,300Total 1,049 $28,100 $175,000 $11,30011
 
 
THIS PAGE WAS INTENTIONALLY LEFT BLANK.12
 
 
Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Real Estate SupplementREAL ESTATE SALES13
 
 
Real Estate Sales Segment Strategy and OperationsThe real estate sales segment generates its operating profit through the development and sale of pipeline projects, raw lands and commercial properties from the real estate leasing segment portfolio, and the equity in earnings of joint ventures.The real estate sales segment primarily seeks to create shareholder value through an active, comprehensive, Hawaii-centric program of land stewardship, planning, entitlement, investment, development and sale of real estate. The segments primary strategic objectives include:FOCUS ON ENTITLEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT OF LEGACY HAWAII LANDSA&B focuses on the development of a portion of its core landholdings in Hawaii, pursuing appropriate entitlement and development projects that respond to market demand while meeting community needs. The large amount of land that the Company owns on Maui and Kauai provides opportunities for A&B to serve a wide range of markets.INVEST IN HIGHRETURNING REAL ESTATE OPPORTUNITIES IN HAWAIIIn addition to the development of its legacy lands, since 1998, A&B has invested in attractive development opportunities across Hawaii, leveraging market knowledge, development expertise, entitlement experience and financial strength to both create shareholder value and diversify its development portfolio and pipeline.EXPAND PIPELINE PROJECTS FOR MARKET RECOVERYA&Bs pipeline of development projects encompasses a broad range of real estate product types, including residential and commercial properties. A&B works to continuously expand this pipeline to meet the demands of a recovering real estate market.UTILIZE STRATEGIC JOINT VENTURES WITH A WIDE VARIETY OF PARTNERSA&B pursues joint ventures and other strategic relationships, where appropriate, with a wide variety of locally, nationally and globally prominent land owners, real estate planning, development, and financing companies, home builders, and construction firms. In doing so, it supplements its in-house capabilities, accesses third-party capital, gains access to new opportunities in the Hawaii market, diversifies its pipeline, and optimizes risk-adjusted returns.14
-
 
 
Table 5 provides an overview of all of the Companys wholly owned and joint venture development projects, and is further supplemented by project information sheets thatfollow the table.TABLE 5REAL ESTATE DEVELOPMENT OVERVIEWDecember 31, 2012Planned units, (Dollars in millions) Construction timing Sales Closings TimingA&B net A&Bsaleable acres Units/acresAverage Estimated capital Estimatedor gross closed Targeted sales price investmentAcres at leasable square unit or lot through range per square project as of estimated Outstanding Estimated substantial Estimated EstimatedProject Location Product type 12/31/12 feet size 12/31/12 foot or NOI cost1 12/31/12 20132 debt start completion start endACTIVE DEVELOPMENT/SALESWholly owned Agricultural lotsBrydeswood Kalaheo, Kauai 336 24 lots 12.3 acres - $2-$5 20 2 9 - 2013 2014 2013 2015Gateway at Mililani Mauka Mililani, Oahu Retail 4 29,000 sf n/a - $1.0M stabilized NOI 14 7 7 - 2012 2014 n/a n/aMaui Business Park II 4 Kahului, Maui Light industrial lots 175 155 acres n/a 4 acres $38-$60 102 56 12 - 2011 2019 2012 2028The Bluffs at Wailea (MF-11) Wailea, Maui Resort residential 7 60 units n/a - $650 39 9 1 - 2014 2015 2014 2015The Ridge at Wailea (MF-19) Wailea, Maui Resort residential 7 9 lots 0.5 acres - $65-$140 9 9 - - 2007 2009 2009 2015Wailea B-1 Wailea, Maui Commercial/retail 11 60,000 sf n/a - tbd tbd 5 1 - 2014 2016 2014 2016Wailea MF-7 Wailea, Maui Resort residential multi-family 13 75 units 1,700 sf - $450-$1,000 84 9 - - 2014 2016 2014 2016Total 553Joint venturesKa Milo at Mauna Lani Kona, Hawaii Resort residential 22 137 units 2,000 sf 36 units $375-$920 120 10 2 - 2005 2016 2007 2016Kukui'ula Koloa, Kauai Resort residential 948 Up to 1,500 units 20303on 640 saleable 0.42 acres 88 lots $40-$130 785 250 24 - 2006 2006 2030Kai Malu at Wailea Wailea, Maui Resort residential 2 acres150 units 2,800 sf 140 units $540-$1,080 124 2 - - 2004 2008 2006 2013341 units (340Waihonua at Kewalo Honolulu, Oahu Primary residential high-rise 2 salable) 1,000 sf - $450-$970 210 32 1 - 2012 2014 2015 2015FUTURE DEVELOPMENTWholly ownedAina 'O Kane Kahului, Maui Primary res./commercial 4 103 unitsGateway at Mililani Mauka South Mililani, Oahu Retail/office 2 20,000 s.fHaliimaile Haliimaile, Maui Primary residential lots 55 150-215 unitsKahului Town Center Kahului, Maui Primary res./commercial 19 440 units,225,000 s.f.Kai Olino Port Allen, Kauai Primary residential 4 75 unitsWailea SF-8 Kihei, Maui Primary residential 13 90 unitsWailea MF-6 Wailea, Maui Resort residential lots 23 60 lotsWailea MF-10 Wailea, Maui Resort residential/commercial 14 9 lots, 36 units,64,000 s.f.Wailea MF-16 Wailea, Maui Resort residential lots 7 20 lotsWailea, other Wailea, Maui Various 71 400-600 unitsTotal 212Joint venturesBakersfield Bakersfield, CA Retail 57Palmdale Center Palmdale, CA Office/Industrial 18Santa Barbara Ranch Santa Barbara, CA Primary residential lots 2215
 
 
TABLE 5 (CONTINUED)REAL ESTATE DEVELOPMENT OVERVIEWDecember 31, 2012Planned units, (Dollars in millions) Construction timing Sales Closings TimingA&B A&Bsaleable acres Units/acresAverage Estimated capitalor gross closed Targeted sales price investment EstimatedAcres at leasable square unit or lot through range per square project as of estimated Outstanding Estimated substantial Estimated EstimatedProject Location Product type 12/31/12 feet size 12/31/12 foot or NOI cost1 12/31/12 20132 debt start completion start endENTITLEMENTEle'ele Community Ele'ele, Kauai Primary residential 840 tbdKihei Residential Kihei, Maui Primary residential 95 up to 600 unitsWai'ale Kahului, Maui Primary residential 545 up to 2,550 unitsJOINT VENTURE DEVELOPMENTS HELD FOR LEASE Valencia, CA Office/retail 7 56,000 s.f. 100% occup.Crossroads PlazaThe Shops at Kukui'ula Poipu, Kauai Retail 10 78,900 s.f. 78% occup.1 Includes land cost at book value and capitalized interest, but excludes sales commissions and closings costs.2 Estimated 2013 capital is dependent on a number of factors, including timing of sales proceeds, project costs and construction progress. Construction progress, even on fully entitled projects, depends on additional government approvals, such as building permits. As a result, estimated capital expenditures, sales or leasing timing are subject to change.3 Represents estimated completion date for major project infrastructure and amenities. Construction activities related to parcel development will be ongoing.4 Acreage for Maui Business Park II includes adjacent bulk parcels.16
 
 
TABLE 6RECONCILIATION OF ACRES UNDER DEVELOPMENT (TABLE 5) TO LANDHOLDINGS (TABLE 3)December 31, 2012AcresActive development/sales - wholly owned (Table 5) 553Less:Brydeswood agricultural-zoned lots included in Kauai other ag, pasture and misc. purposes in Table 3 (336)Gateway at Mililanu Mauka acres included in Hawaii-commercial improved properties in Table 3 (4)Active development/sales (Table 3) 213Future development - wholly owned (Table 5) 212Less:Kahului Town Center redevelopment acres included in Hawaii-commercial improved properties in Table 3 (19)Gateway at Mililani Mauka South acres included in Hawaii-commercial improved properties in Table 3 (2)Add:Ele'ele acres already entitled included in Kauai fully entitled future development in Table 3 40Fully entitled Hawaii-development/other- future development (Table 3) 23117
 
 
THIS PAGE WAS INTENTIONALLY LEFT BLANK.18
 
 
Development Project Information SheetsACTIVE DEVELOPMENTWholly OwnedBrydeswood 20Gateway at Mililani Mauka 20Maui Business Park II 21Wailea 22The Bluffs at Wailea (MF-11) 23The Ridge at Wailea (MF-19) 23Wailea B-1 23Wailea MF-7 23Kai Malu at Wailea (MF-8) 23Joint VentureKa Milo at Mauna Lani 24Kai Malu at Wailea 24Kukuiula 25Waihonua at Kewalo 26FUTURE DEVELOPMENTSWholly OwnedAina O Kane 27Gateway at Mililani Mauka South 27Haliimaile Subdivision 28Kahului Town Center 28Wailea Parcels 28Joint VentureBakersfield 29Palmdale Center 29Santa Barbara Ranch 29ENTITLEMENT ACTIVITYKihei Residential 30Waiale Community 31Eleele Community 31INVESTMENTSONE Ala Moana 32Kakaako High-rise Condominium 3219
 
 
Active DevelopmentBRYDESWOODLOCATIONKalaheo, KauaiACQUISITIONDATEHistoric landsACRES336LOTS24PROJECT OVERVIEW Planned development of 24 large estate lots (average size is  Pre-development activities continuing12 acres) Final subdivision approval received in 2011 Construction plans for roads and utilities approved Oceanview and pasture lots Pre-sales commenced in 2012 Final subdivision registration expected in 2013 Construction of water system improvements pending acceptable conversion of reservations to binding contractsGATEWAY AT MILILANI MAUKALOCATIONMililani, OahuACQUISITION DATEDecember 29, 2011ACRES4.35GLA (IN SQ. FT.)29,000  future5,900  existing (see page 51)PROJECT OVERVIEW Fully zoned for commercial development Well-located within the only retail shopping area in the Mililani Mauka community (pop. 20,000) in Central Oahu Existing, fully leased 5,900 square-foot multi-tenant retail building (see page 51) Additional 29,000 square feet of retail space development planned Existing retail and land acquired with 1031 exchange funds Onsite and offsite infrastructure completed by seller in 3Q2012- Construction of 11,500 square-foot building commenced in 2012, scheduled for completion in 2Q2013 Pre-leasing in progress for 16,900 square-foot building Targeting restaurant, neighborhood retail and medical and office tenants20
 
 
Active DevelopmentMAUI BUSINESS PARKIILOCATIONKahului, MauiACQUISITION DATEHistoric landsACRES (includes adjacent bulk parcels)Original: 179 (155 salable)Remaining: 175 (151 salable)PROJECT OVERVIEW Zoned for light industrial use (commercial, retail, office) Well-located in Central Maui near Kahului Airport, Harbor and Mauis primary residential districts Adjacent to 76-acre Maui Business Park I project, Mauis primary retail destination Primary source of Mauis future commercial development lands Increment I- Onsite improvements completed in 2012- 4-acre parcel sold to Costco in January 2012 for $38 per square foot- 93 acres (including adjacent bulk parcels) available for sale Potential development or use of a portion or all of Increment II, consisting of 58 acres, will be evaluated at a later date depending on sales absorption for Increment I21
 
 
Active DevelopmentWAILEAA&B was the original developer of the Wailea Resort on Maui, beginning in the 1970s and continuing until A&B sold the resort to a Japanese company in 1989. In October 2003, A&B re-acquired from the same Japanese company all of the remaining undeveloped land in the resort, consisting of 270 acres of fully zoned, residential and commercial land, for $67.1 million. The Resort encompasses a number of specific development sites, which are described below. This map shows the sites (outlined in red) that were reacquired in 2003. Since that time, sites MF-15, the Golf Vistas, B-II, MF-9, MF-5 and MF-4 were sold or developed, and MF-8 was contributed to the Kai Malu joint venture. A&B has approximately 170 acres of developable land remaining in the Wailea resort planned for up to 700 units; 40 acres are for sale and in active development.Active development Future development or Sale SoldACTIVE DEVELOPMENTWHOLLY OWNEDThe Bluffs at Wailea (MF-11), The Ridge at Wailea (MF-19), B-1, MF-7JOINT VENTURESKai Malu at Wailea (MF-8)FUTURE DEVELOPMENTOR SALEMF-6, MF-10, MF-12, MF-13, MF-16, SF-8, SF-7, SF-S22
 
 
WAILEA ACTIVE DEVELOPMENTTHE BLUFFS AT WAILEA (MF11)The Bluffs at Wailea (MF-11) is a 12-lot development, currently being considered for a 60-unit multi-family joint venture development.THE RIDGE AT WAILEA (MF19)The Ridge at Wailea (MF-19) consists of nine, half-acre, oceanview estate lots situated on 6.7 acres. The estimated sales price range is $65 to $140 per square foot, with an average list price of $1.6 million.WAILEA B1The 11-acre B-1 parcel, which contains the only approved gas station site within the Wailea master plan, is planned for a retail commercial center with approximately 60,000 square feet of leasable space. Planning and design work is underway and a joint venture is being considered for the project.WAILEA MF7The 13-acre MF-7 parcel is fully designed and permitted for the development of a 75-unit multi-family project. The project has secured the required affordable housing credits and water meters. Depending on market conditions, construction could commence in 2014.KAI MALU AT WAILEA (MF8)The 25-acre MF-8 parcel was contributed to the Kai Malu joint venture, which is detailed on the following page.23
-
-
-
-
-
 
 
Active Development - Joint VenturesKA MILO AT MAUNA LANILOCATIONKona, HawaiiACQUISITION DATEMay 2004ACRES31 (22 remaining)UNITS / HOMES137 total (36 sold)PROJECT OVERVIEW 137-unit resort residential community, with a mix of single-family and paired homes The first phase consisted of 27 single-family and multi-family units, and was completed in 2008 Onsite resort amenities include two pools, spa, exercise room, function pavilion Construction of second phase is underway, focusing on single-family unitsPROJECT 150 single-family paired units Construction completed 2008 Eight units closed in 2012 at an average price of $1.1 million Units are constructed in two- to 20-unit increments, based on buyer demand Ten units are projected to be completed in 2013KAI MALU AT WAILEALOCATIONWailea, MauiACQUISITION DATEOctober 1, 2003ACRES25 (2 remaining)UNITS150 total (140 sold; 10 unsold) as of December 31, 2012OVERVIEW Two units closed in 2012 at an average sales price of $1.1 million As of February 17, 2013, 142 units have closed; 8 units were available24
 
 
Active Development - Joint VenturesKUKUIULALOCATIONPoipu, KauaiACQUISITION DATEHistoric landsACRES1,000 (958 remaining)UNITSUp to 1,500PROJECT OVERVIEW Luxury resort residential community in Poipu, Kauai Development of up to 1,500 residential units on 1,000 fully entitled acres Joint venture with DMB, developer of premier master-planned residential communities 75,000 sq. ft. private club, including spa, golf clubhouse, beach bar and grill 78,900 sq. ft. retail center (The Shops at Kukuiula) on 10 acresFINANCIAL All resort amenities completed (a Weiskopf-designed championship golf course, owners and golf club houses, pools, world-class spas, fitness center, movement studio, and a community lake and farm) Increasing vertical construction activity, including 23 homes built and 10 under construction by the joint venture, owners or third party developers Six cottages (average sales price $1,300 psf) and one vacant lot ($1.6 million) sold in 2012 89 lots closed; 84 lots available as of February 17, 2013& CAPITAL OVERVIEW Kukuiula is a long-term, master planned project, designed to accommodate high-end resort residential growth on Kauais south shore over the next 15 to 25 years, and significant fluctuations in annual absorption over that time frame can be expected. The Company experienced similar absorption fluctuations over the course of its earlier, highly successful Wailea project. Sufficient project infrastructure is in place today to sell about 280 additional acres (500 to 800 units). Future infrastructure requirements would be paid for from project cash flows. GAAP accounting for the project will differ materially from cash flows, due to percentage of completion accounting. Total capital contributions to the venture as of December 31, 2012, were $259 million by A&B, which includes $30 million for the value of land contributed, and $188 million by DMB.25
 
 
Active Development - Joint VenturesWAIHONUAATKEWALOLOCATIONHonolulu, OahuACQUISITION DATEJune 30, 2010UNITS341 (340 saleable)FLOORS43PROJECT OVERVIEW High-rise condominium in urban Honolulu, near the Ala Moana Shopping Center Well located near shopping, restaurants and beaches One-, two- and three-bedroom residences averaging 1,000 square feet Sales prices average approx. $725/sq. ft. Amenities include recreation deck, pool, spa, barbeque dining pavilions, fitness center, private movie theatre and visitor guest suites Joint venture partners, construction loan and general contractor secured Construction underway with completion projected in 2015As of February 17, 2013, 280 units were pre-sold under binding contracts ($31 million in nonrefundable deposits)26
 
 
Future Development Project SummariesHAWAIIAINA O KANE (MAUI)Aina O Kane is planned for 103 residential condominium units averaging 1,000 in square feet and 20,000 square feet of ground-floor commercial space, in Kahului, Maui. The project is situated near the Kahului Town Center redevelopment project. Together, the projects conceptual designs aim to create a vibrant living environment for future residents.GATEWAY AT MILILANI MAUKA SOUTH (OAHU)Gateway at Mililani Mauka South is a 1.6-acre development site planned for 20,000 square feet of retail and office commercial space in the well-established Mililani community in Central Oahu. The project currently has two existing fully-leased office buildings that occupy 18,700 square feet on 3.6 acres, which are included in the Hawaii commercial leased portfolio.27
 
 
HALIIMAILE SUBDIVISION (MAUI)Haliimaile is a 55-acre residential subdivision planned for Haliimaile (Upcountry, Maui), including up to 215 units. Ten acres are allocated for a park. In 2012, an additional 80 acres, adjacent to this subdivision, were approved by the County Council for future urban growth in the Maui Island Plan.KAHULUI TOWN CENTER (MAUI)The redevelopment plan for the 19-acre Kahului Shopping Center block reflects the creation of a traditional town center, consisting of up to 440 residential condominium units, as well as approximately 225,000 square feet of retail/office space. The project is being re-evaluated to meet market needs.WAILEA PARCELS (MAUI)  SEE PAGE 22 FOR DESCRIPTION28
 
 
MAIN LANDA&B made several development investments in California between 2003 and 2007. During 2012, the Company changed its strategy to focus on development projects exclusively in Hawaii, where management believes it can create the most value. As a result, in the second quarter of 2012, the Company recognized a $5.1 million noncash reduction in the carrying value of its Santa Barbara development property and a $4.7 million noncash reduction in the carrying value of its joint venture investment in Bakersfield.BAKERSFIELD (CALIFORNIA)A&B entered into a joint venture with Intertex P&G Retail, LLC for the planned development of a 575,000 square-foot retail center on a 57.3-acre commercial-zoned parcel in Bakersfield, California. The parcel was acquired in November 2006. Development plans remain on hold due to current market conditions.PALMDALE CENTER (CALIFORNIA)A&B entered into a joint venture with Intertex Palmdale Trade & Commerce Center LLC for the development of a planned 315,000 square-foot mixed-use commercial office and light industrial condominium complex on 18.2 acres in Palmdale, California, located 60 miles northeast of Los Angeles and 25 miles northeast of Valencia. The parcel was contributed to the venture in 2008. Development plans remain on hold due to current market conditions.SANTA BARBARA RANCH (CALIFORNIA)The Company invested in a joint venture that owns two parcels totaling 22 acres located 12 miles north of the City of Santa Barbara. The parcels are being marketed for sale.29
 
 
Entitlement ActivitySuccessful land entitlement is a challenging, yet critical step in the development process. Similar to other high-demand, high-quality locales with a limited supply of land suitable for development, the entitlement process in Hawaii is complex, time-consuming and costly, involving a variety of state and county regulatory approvals. For example, conversion of an agriculturally zoned parcel to residential zoning usually requires the following approvals: County amendment of the county general plan and community plan to reflect the desired residential use; State Land Use Commission (SLUC) reclassification of the parcel from the Agricultural district to the Urban district; and County rezoning of the property to the precise residential use desired.A&B actively works with regulatory agencies, commissions and legislative bodies at various levels of government to entitle lands. A&B designates a parcel as fully entitled or fully zoned when all of the above-mentioned land use approvals have been obtained.Ongoing planning and entitlement efforts are focused on the following projects:KIHEI RESIDENTIAL (MAUI)A primary residential subdivision situated on 95 acres in Kihei, on Mauis south shore, planned for up to 600 housing units, plus complementary commercial uses. In January 2009, the SLUC approved the projects district boundary amendment application for urban designation. Applications for zoning and community plan amendment were filed with the County in 2010. In December 2010, the Planning Commission recommended approval of the change in zoning and community plan amendment applications, and the applications were transmitted to the County Council for review and final approval. A revised traffic impact analysis report was prepared in 2012 and discussions continue with the State Department of Transportation to address traffic-related concerns.30
 
 
WAIALE COMMUNITY (MAUI)Waiale is a master-planned community located in Central Maui. Approximately 545 acres of the project have been proposed for urban growth in the ongoing Maui General Plan Update to accommodate up to 2,550 primary housing units, together with parks, school, civic and commercial uses. In 2010, A&B submitted an application for SLUC Urban designation of the site. In 2011, the projects final Environmental Impact Statement was completed and accepted by the SLUC. In 2012, the SLUC approved Urban designation for the project. The Company is preparing County land use applications for project district zoning and community plan amendments with the County.ELEELE COMMUNITY (KAUAI)The Eleele Community Master Plan is an 840-acre new primary residential community east of Port Allen on Kauai. The 260-acre first phase is being pursued through Kauais multi-year General Plan Update Process, which will commence in 2013. This process will take approximately two to three years, after which applications for state and county zoning would be pursued.31
 
 
Real Estate InvestmentsIn addition to the development of its legacy lands, since 1998 A&B has invested in attractive development opportunities across Hawaii, leveraging market knowledge, development expertise, entitlement experience and financial strength to both create shareholder value and diversify its development portfolio and pipeline.ONE ALA MOANA (OAHU)ONE Ala Moana is a 23-story condominium tower consisting of 206 luxury residential units that is being developed by a partnership of the Howard Hughes Corporation and The MacNaughton and Kobayashi Groups. A&B has committed to a $20 million preferred investment with profit participation. The tower will be developed atop the Nordstrom parking structure in the Ala Moana Center. As of February 17, 2013, all of the 205 units available for sale were pre-sold, 97% of which are under binding contracts.KAKAAKO HIGH-RISE CONDOMINIUM (OAHU)A&B secured a high-rise condominium site in urban Honolulu near downtown under a long-term option agreement. Building on the success of Waihonua and the strength of the Kakaako submarket, A&B is completing design and planning for a 470-unit condominium and expects to begin presales in 2013. The spectacular ocean views from the site, and the developments convenient location are expected to appeal to the local buyers the Company is targeting.32
 
 
Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. Real Estate SupplementREAL ESTATE LEASING33
 
 
Real Estate Leasing Segment Strategy and OperationsThe real estate leasing segment owns, operates and manages commercial properties. It focuses on acquiring high-quality retail, office and industrial properties in good locations, effectively managing those properties to increase margins through higher occupancies and cost management, and positioning these assets for potential sale when full market value has been achieved.1 Real estate leasing income also includes revenue from a variety of land leases, licenses and other agreements related to real estate in Hawaii. From a strategic perspective, the relatively stable, recurring cash flows generated by the real estate leasing business act to counterbalance the cyclicality inherent in real estate sales results, as well as support development activities.A&B strives to increase the value of its commercial property portfolio through active management. Periodically, when A&B believes it has maximized the value of a select asset, it may market the asset for sale, or sell in response to an unsolicited offer. Upon sale, A&B will seek to redeploy the proceeds on a 1031 tax-deferred basis into a new asset with a higher return potential. Income taxes that are deferred utilizing the 1031 exchange process represent an interest-free source of capital that is used by the Company to generate incremental cash flow. Given the low historical cost basis of the Companys lands, the strategy is particularly appealing to A&B. Over the years, the Company has deferred over $200 million of income taxes on the sale of raw land and improved properties. The tax benefits of the 1031 program also allow the Company to compete effectively for acquisitions, and earn attractive returns.As of December 31, 2012, A&Bs portfolio, which includes 45 income-producing properties comprising 7.9 million square feet of gross leasable area (6.5 million on the Mainland and 1.4 million in Hawaii), is well balanced among retail, office and industrial sectors and is geographically dispersed in eight Mainland states and Hawaii. While a disproportionate amount of total portfolio square footage is located on the Mainland, Net Operating Income (NOI) is more balanced, with Hawaii properties generating over 40% of the $63.1 million2 in total portfolio NOI.1 Any financial impact from such a sale would be reported in Real Estate Sales segment results.2 See page 41 for a statement on the Companys use of NOI and a reconciliation of Leasing operating profit to Real Estate Leasing Cash NOI34
 
 
PORTFOLIO SEGMENT DESCRIPTIONHAWAII IMPROVED PROPERTIESA&Bs Hawaii improved property portfolio consists of 22 retail, office and industrial properties, comprising approximately 1.4 million square feet of leasable space. The majority of the commercial properties are located on Maui and Oahu, with smaller holdings in the area of Port Allen, Kauai, and the Big Island of Hawaii.HAWAII UNIMPROVED PROPERTIESThe Company leases and licenses a relatively small portion of its legacy lands on Maui and Kauai to third parties. These leases and licenses cover a wide variety of urban and agricultural lands, ranging from ground leases covering the fee interest in land underlying commercial properties, to farming and pasture leases, to licenses of remnant parcels and easement areas, to sand and aggregate quarry leases whose lease or royalty payments are based on extraction rates. Accordingly, both period-to-period results and rental revenue per land unit may be highly variable.MAINLAND IMPROVED PROPERTIESOn the Mainland, A&B owns a portfolio of 23 retail, office and industrial properties acquired primarily by way of 1031 tax-deferred exchanges. The Companys Mainland portfolio comprises approximately 6.5 million square feet of leasable space.Summarized information for the Companys portfolio as of and for the year ended December 31, 2012 follows.Hawaii Mainland TotalGLA (in millions) at 12/31/12Industrial 0.5 4.5 5.0Office 0.2 1.3 1.5Retail 0.7 0.7 1.4Total 1.4 6.5 7.92012 Average OccupancyIndustrial 93% 97% 96%Office 88% 85% 86%Retail 92% 86% 89%Total 92% 93% 93%2012 Cash NOI (in millions)1 $26.82 $36.3 $63.11 See page 41 for a statement on the Companys use of NOI and a reconciliation of Leasing operating profit to Real Estate Leasing Cash NOI2 Includes $3.5 million of NOI from unimproved Hawaii properties35
 
 
Acquisition and Disposition StrategyThe Company believes that Hawaii is poised for growth, and further believes that given A&Bs combination of local market knowledge, relationship, and financial strength, it has a sustainable competitive advantage in investing in Hawaii commercial properties. As a result, it will seek to increasingly focus the portfolios geographic concentration to Hawaii over the long run. Given the relatively small number of suitable investment properties available in Hawaii at any given time, and the significant transactional restrictions that accompany the 1031 process, it is likely that the pace of commercial portfolio property sales in the future will be dictated largely by the availability of suitable Hawaii replacement investment opportunities.36
 
 
Real Estate Leasing Segment  Asset Descriptions and StatisticsTables 7 and 8 provide detail on the Companys commercial real estate portfolio.TABLE 7PROPERTY DETAIL HAWAII IMPROVED PROPERTIESFor the Year Ended 12/31/12Gross Annual Cash% cash netleasable operating1 net operatingarea at Leased income toincome (NOI)2Number of 12/31/12 2012 Outstanding total HawaiiProperty properties Island (sq. ft.) (percent) debt ($in 000s) portfolioIndustrial:Komohana Industrial Park 1 Oahu 238,300 90.5 $- $3,165 11.8P&L Building 1 Maui 104,100 86.8 - 974 3.7Port Allen 3 Kauai 63,900 96.0 - 618 2.3Waipio Industrial 1 Oahu 158,400 98.4 - 1,860 6.9Subtotal  Industrial 6 564,700 $- $6,617 24.7Office:Gateway at Mililani Mauka South 1 Oahu 18,700 100.0 $- $377 1.4Judd Building 1 Oahu 20,300 100.0 $- $221 0.8Kahului Office Building 1 Maui 58,300 87.0 - 1,357 5.1Kahului Office Center 1 Maui 32,900 83.6 - 707 2.6Lono Center 1 Maui 13,400 83.5 - 207 0.8Maui Clinic Building 1 Maui 16,700 93.1 - 351 1.3Stangenwald Building 1 Oahu 27,100 81.0 - 217 0.8Subtotal  Office 7 187,400 $- $3,437 12.8Retail:Gateway at Mililani Mauka 1 Oahu 5,900 100.0 $- $273 1.0Kahului Shopping Center 1 Maui 46,400 83.2 - 330 1.2Kaneohe Bay Shopping Center 1 Oahu 123,900 97.5 - 1,791 6.7Kunia Shopping Center 1 Oahu 60,400 94.6 - 1,915 7.1Lahaina Square 1 Maui 50,200 62.9 - 445 1.7Lanihau Marketplace 1 Hawaii 88,300 94.3 - 1,921 7.2Maui Mall 1 Maui 185,700 94.2 - 3,174 11.9Port Allen Marina Center 1 Kauai 23,600 77.0 - 421 1.6Waipio Shopping Center 1 Oahu 113,800 97.8 - 2,989 11.2Subtotal  Retail 9 698,200 $- $13,259 49.6Hawaii ground leases- - - 3,462 12.9Total Hawaii 22 1,450,300 $- $26,775 100.01 Represents the average percentage of space leased during the period referenced or A&Bs ownership period, whichever is shorter. Space is considered leased when a tenancy agreement has been fully executed or the space is revenue producing.2 See page 41 for a statement regarding the Companys use of Cash NOI and a reconciliation of Leasing operating profit to Cash NOI for the total portfolio.Note: For portfolio asset class and geographic occupancy see Table 9. In January 2013, A&B acquired the 170,300 square-foot Waianae Mall located on Oahus west shore.37
-
 
 
TABLE 8PROPERTY DETAIL MAINLAND IMPROVED PROPERTIESFor the Year Ended 12/31/12% cash netGross Annual cash operatingleasable income toOutstanding net operatingarea at totalLeased1 income (NOI)2Number of 12/31/12 debt MainlandProperty properties Location (sq. ft.) (percent) ($in 000s) ($in 000s) portfolioIndustrial:Activity Distribution Center 1 San Diego, CA 252,300 100.0 $- $2,378 6.5Centennial Plaza 1 Salt Lake City, UT 244,000 95.0 - 838 2.3Heritage Business Park 1 Dallas, TX 1,316,400 99.9 - 5,288 14.6Midstate Hayes 1 Visalia, CA 789,100 86.5 11,531 2,443 6.7Northpoint Portfolio 1 Fullerton, CA 119,500 100.0 - 646 1.8Republic Distribution Center 1 Pasadena, TX 312,500 100.0 - 926 2.6Savannah Logistics Park 1 Savannah, GA 1,035,700 100.0 - 2,697 7.4Sparks Business Center 1 Sparks, NV 396,100 94.2 - 1,807 5.0Subtotal  Industrial 8 4,465,600 $11,531 $17,023 46.9Office:Concorde Commerce Center 1 Phoenix, AZ 137,500 86.0 $- $951 2.6Deer Valley Financial Center 1 Phoenix, AZ 126,600 70.6 10,106 469 1.3Gateway Oaks 1 Sacramento, CA 58,700 49.9 - 162 0.5Issaquah Office Center 1 Issaquah, WA 146,900 100.0 - 2,099 5.8Ninigret Office Park 1 Salt Lake City, UT 185,500 100.0 - 1,895 5.21800 and 1820 Preston Park 1 Plano, TX 198,700 89.3 - 1,821 5.02868 Prospect Park 1 Sacramento, CA 162,900 68.4 - 587 1.6San Pedro Plaza 1 San Antonio, TX 172,000 82.7 - 1,041 2.9Union Bank 1 Everett, WA 84,000 100.0 - 1,305 3.6Subtotal  Office 9 1,272,800 $10,106 $10,330 28.5Retail:Broadlands Marketplace 1 Broomfield, CO 103,900 91.0 $- $856 2.4Little Cottonwood Center 1 Sandy, UT 141,600 94.0 6,281 1,436 4.0Meadows on the Parkway 1 Boulder, CO 216,500 77.8 - 2,209 6.1Rancho Temecula Town Center 1 Temecula, CA 165,600 93.3 - 3,512 9.7Royal MacArthur Center 1 Dallas, TX 44,200 85.0 - 706 1.9Wilshire Shopping Center 1 Greeley, CO 46,500 57.0 - 190 0.5Subtotal  Retail 6 718,300 $6,281 $8,909 24.6Total Mainland 23 6,456,700 $27,918 $36,262 100.01 Represents the average percentage of space leased during the period referenced or A&Bs ownership period, whichever is shorter. Space is considered leased when a tenancy agreement has been fully executed or the space is revenue producing.2 See page 41 for a statement regarding the Companys use of Cash NOI and a reconciliation of Leasing operating profit to Cash NOI for the total portfolio.Note: For portfolio asset class and geographic occupancy see Table 9. In January 2013, A&B sold the 119,500 square-foot Northpoint property.38
-
 
 
 
 
 
TA
 
 
Statement on Managements Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Cash net operating income (NOI) is a non-GAAP measure derived from real estate revenues
(determined in accordance with GAAP, less straight-line rental adjustments) minus property
operating expenses (determined in accordance with GAAP). Cash NOI does not have any
standardized meaning prescribed by GAAP, and therefore, may differ from definitions of cash NOI
used by other companies. Cash NOI should not be considered as an alternative to net income
(determined in accordance with GAAP) as an indicator of the Companys financial performance, or
as an alternative to cash flow from operating activities as a measure of the Companys liquidity.
Cash NOI is commonly used as a measure of operating performance because it is an indicator of
the return on property investment, and provides a method of comparing property performance over
time. Cash NOI excludes general and administrative expenses, straight-line rental adjustments,
bad debt expense, interest income, interest expense, depreciation and amortization, and gains on
sales of interests in real estate. The Company believes that the real estate leasing segments
operating profit after discontinued operations is the most directly comparable GAAP measurement
to cash NOI. A required reconciliation of real estate leasing operating profit to real estate leasing
segment same store cash NOI is as follows:
T ABLE 1 4
RECONCILIATION OF REAL ESTATE LEASING OPERATING PROFIT TO CASH NOI
AND SAME STORE CASH NOI (NON-GAAP)
(in millions)
1 Cash NOI related to properties that were operated throughout the duration of both periods under comparison.
(Dollars in millions) 2012 2011 2010 2009 2008
Real Estate Leasing segment operating profit before
discontinued operations 41.6 39.3 35.3 43.2 47.8
Less amounts reported in discontinued operations (0.7) (2.2) (3.3) (8.0) (4.2)
Real Estate Leasing segment operating profit after
subtracting discontinued operations 40.9 37.1 32.0 35.2 43.6
Adjustments:
Depreciation and amortization 22.2 21.7 21.1 21.2 19.2
FASB 13 straight-line lease adjustments (3.6) (3.8) (4.1) (2.0) (2.4)
General and administrative expense 2.9 3.6 3.4 3.5 2.4
Discontinued operations 0.7 2.2 3.3 8.0 4.2
Real Estate Leasing total cash NOI 63.1 60.8 55.7 65.9 67.0
Acquisitions/ disposition adjustments/ other (4.1) (3.2)
Real Estate Leasing segment same store cash NOI1 59.0 57.6
 
41
 
TABLE 1 2REAL ESTATE LEASING CASH NET OPERATING INCOME (NOI)(in millions)2012 2011 Percentage ChangeLocation Industrial Office Retail Total Industrial Office Retail Total Industrial Office Retail TotalHawaii improved $6.6 $3.4 $13.3 $23.3 $7.2 $3.1 $12.7 $23.0 (8.3) 9.7 4.7 1.3Hawaii ground leases - - - 3.5 - - - 3.5 - - - -Total Hawaii $6.6 $3.4 $13.3 $26.8 $7.2 $3.1 $12.7 $26.5 (8.3) 9.7 4.7 1.1Mainland improved 17.0 10.4 8.9 36.3 15.8 9.4 9.1 34.3 7.6 10.6 (2.2) 5.8Total $23.6 $13.8 $22.2 $63.1 $23.0 $12.5 $21.8 $60.8 2.6 10.4 1.8 3.8TABLE 1 3REAL ESTATE LEASING SAME STORE CASH NOI1(in millions)2012 2011 Percentage ChangeLocation Industrial Office Retail Total Industrial Office Retail Total Industrial Office Retail TotalHawaii improved $6.6 $3.1 $13.0 $22.7 $6.6 $3.0 $12.6 $22.2 - 3.3 3.2 2.3Hawaii ground leases - - - 3.5 - - - 3.6 - - - (2.8)Total Hawaii $6.6 $3.1 $13.0 $26.2 $6.6 $3.0 $12.6 $25.8 - 3.3 3.2 1.6Mainland improved 17.0 6.9 8.9 32.8 15.8 7.6 8.4 $31.8 7.6 (9.2) 6.0 3.1Total $23.6 $10.0 $21.9 $59.0 $22.4 $10.6 $21.0 $57.6 5.4 (5.7) 4.3 2.41 Same Store Cash NOI relates to properties that were operated throughout the duration of both periods under comparison.Note: See page 41 for a statement on the Companys use of NOI and a reconciliation of Leasing operating profit to Real Estate Leasing Cash NOI and Real Estate Leasing Same Store NOI.40
 
 
 
 
 
 
Statement on Management's Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures Cash net operating income (NOI) is a non-GAAP measure derived from real estate revenues (determined in accordance with GAAP, less straight-line rental adjustments) minus property operating expenses (determined in accordance with GAAP). Cash NOI does not have any standardized meaning prescribed by GAAP, and therefore, may differ from definitions of cash NOI used by other companies. Cash NOI should not be considered as an alternative to net income (determined in accordance with GAAP) as an indicator of the Company's financial performance, or as an alternative to cash flow from operating activities as a measure of the Company's liquidity. Cash NOI is commonly used as a measure of operating performance because it is an indicator of the return on property investment, and provides a method of comparing property performance over time. Cash NOI excludes general and administrative expenses, straight-line rental adjustments, bad debt expense, interest income, interest expense, depreciation and amortization, and gains on sales of interests in real estate. The Company believes that the real estate leasing segment's operating profit after discontinued operations is the most directly comparable GAAP measurement to cash NOI. A required reconciliation of real estate leasing operating profit to real estate leasing segment same store cash NOI is as follows: TABLE 14 RECONCILIATION OF REAL ESTATE LEASING OPERATING PROFIT TO CASH NOI AND SAME STORE CASH NOI (NON-GAAP) (in millions) 1 Cash NOI related to properties that were operated throughout the duration of both periods under comparison. 41
 
 
Portfolio Acquisitions and DispositionsTABLE 1 52012 IMPROVED PROPERTY PORTFOLIO ACQUISITIONS/DISPOSITIONSAcquisition date Acquisition price Gross leasable area Leased percentageProperty acquired in 2012 (month/year) ($in millions) (sq. ft.) at acquisitionGateway at Mililani Mauka South 6/12 1 18,700 100.011.4Disposition date Disposition price Gross leasable area Leased percentageProperty disposed in 2012 (month/year) ($in millions) (sq. ft.) at dispositionFirestone Boulevard Building 3/12 4.2 28,100 100.02011 IMPROVED PROPERTY PORTFOLIO A CQUISITIONS/DISPOSITIONSAcquisition date Acquisition price Gross leasable area Leased percentageProperty acquired in 2011 (month/year) ($in millions) (sq. ft.) at acquisitionUnion Bank 6/11 10.9 84,000 100.0Issaquah Office Center 9/11 19.9 146,900 100.0Gateway at Mililani Mauka 12/11 2 5,900 100.08.2Total39.0 236,800Disposition date Disposition price Gross leasable area Leased percentageProperty disposed in 2011 (month/year) ($in millions) (sq. ft.) at dispositionApex Building 1/11 9.0 28,100 91.0Arbor Park Shopping Center 6/11 22.5 139,500 94.0Wakea Business Center 9/11 8.5 61,500 98.0Total 40.0 229,1001 $11.4 acquisition price includes two existing buildings totaling 18,700 square feet and a 1.6-acre development parcel.2 $8.2M acquisition price includes an existing 5,900 square-foot building and a 4.3-acre development parcel.42
 
 
Lease Renewal AnalysisThe weighted average lease terms of our Hawaii and Mainland portfolios are 90 and 91 months, respectively, for a total portfolio lease term of 90 months. The weighted average remaining lease terms for the Hawaii and Mainland portfolios are 35 and 46 months, respectively, for a total portfolio remaining lease term of 39 months. The following Table 20 details portfolio lease expirations by year.TABLE 1 6LEASE EXPIRATIONSDecember 31, 2012PercentagePercentage of Annual gross Percentage of Percentage change inannual grossExpiration Sq. ft. of total leased 2 total annualrenewed orrent expiring rent onGLA1 gross rent2year expiring leases ($in millions) re-leased renewed leases2011 791,686 70.0 (3.0)2012 577,581 60.0 (1.4)2013 699,317 9.9 7.4 10.52014 477,349 6.7 6.9 9.82015 1,197,584 16.9 12.3 17.72016 974,963 13.8 10.6 15.12017 2,007,353 28.3 14.8 21.22018 469,888 6.6 3.7 5.22019 125,870 1.8 2.0 2.82020 197,154 2.8 2.9 4.22021 161,607 2.3 1.5 2.22022 97,839 1.4 2.0 2.82023 20,861 0.3 0.4 0.6Thereafter 652,965 9.2 5.5 7.97,082,750 100.0 $70.0 100.01 Gross Leasable Area2 Annual gross rent means the annualized base rent amounts of expiring leases and includes improved properties only.43
 
 
Portfolio ConcentrationsTABLE 1 7TENANT CONCENTRATIONS AS OF 12/31/12Largest Tenants (In-Service Properties) Based Upon Annualized Gross RevenuePercentage Percentageof annualAnnualized gross 2 of totalgross GLArevenue1 GLA2Tenant Primary industry Lease expiration year revenue (sq. ft.)Matson Global Distribution Services, Inc. Logistics 2017 $4,376,700 4.7 1,035,676 13.1Safeway Inc. Supermarket & Grocery Store 2014, 2019, 2027 1,828,716 2.0 152,128 1.9Siemens Corporation Electronics & Electrical Engineering 2016 1,738,116 1.9 146,877 1.9International Paper Paper Packaging/Distribution 2013 1,445,628 1.6 302,040 3.8Teleperformance USA Call Center/Communications 2015 1,418,460 1.5 92,036 1.2Nestle Waters North America Inc. Manufacturing 2026 1,333,032 1.4 312,522 4.0Foodland Super Market, Ltd. Supermarket & Grocery Store 2017, 2020 1,289,964 1.4 60,691 0.8Cisco Systems, Inc. Technology 2016 1,196,688 1.3 56,660 0.7The Coast Distribution System, Inc. Wholesale/Distribution 2015 1,159,920 1.3 230,300 2.9Rackspace DAL 1 DC Management Technology 2022 1,155,312 1.2 144,423 1.8Total $16,942,536 18.3 2,533,353 32.11 Annualized GAAP revenue less straight line rent adjustments for the indicated period. Does not include FASB and% rent.2 Gross Leasable Area44
 
 
Hawaii Commercial Property Information SheetsIndustrialKomohana Industrial Park 46P&L Building 46Port Allen 47Waipio Industrial 47OfficeGateway at Mililani Mauka South 48Judd Building 48Kahului Office Building 49Kahului Office Center 49Lono Center 50Maui Clinic Building 50Stangenwald Building 51RetailGateway at Mililani Mauka 51Kahului Shopping Center 52Kaneohe Bay Shopping Center 52Kunia Shopping Center 53Lahaina Square 53Lanihau Marketplace 54Maui Mall 54Port Allen Marina Center 55Waipio Shopping Center 5545
 
 
($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 *Gross Revenue 3,997 3,726 1,730Cash NOI 3,165 2,883 1,363Capital Improvements 135 167 -Average Occupancy (%) 91 77 74* Partial yearKOMOHANATYPEIndustrialLOCATIONOahuACQUISITION DATEJuly 20, 2010ACQUISITION PRICE $37.7millionDATE CONSTRUCTED1990OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2100%Real Estate Leasing - HawaiiINDUSTRIALPARKGLA (IN SQ. FT.)238,300Plus 23.0 acres leased to third-partiesTOP TENANTSDellew CorporationGP/RM Prestress LLCSimmons ManufacturingS&K Sales Co.($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 1,222 1,292 1,276Cash NOI 974 1,032 1,029Capital Improvements 11 23 3Average Occupancy (%) 87 96 89P & L BUILDINGTYPEIndustrialLOCATIONMauiDEVELOPMENT DATE1970OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 290%GLA (IN SQ . FT.)104,100TOP TENANTSA-American Self StorageAlltemp Air Conditioning CompanyHonsador Lumber CorporationMary Charles & AssociatesMaui Laminates46
 
 
Real Estate Leasing - HawaiiPORTALLENTYPEIndustrialLOCATIONKauaiDEVELOPMENT DATE1983 through 1993OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2100%GLA (IN SQ . FT.)($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 2 0 1 0 2 0 0 963,900Gross Revenue 799 684 683 683 688TOP TENANTSAloha Professional Auto BodyCash NOI 618 508 527 527 518Kauai Island Brewing CompanyCapital Improvements 46 57 17 KIUC 17 22Lapperts Inc.Average Occupancy (%) 96 94 90 Paradise Sports90 Wear 98WAIPIO INDUSTRIALTYPE TOP TENANTSIndustrial ArcadiaIndustries for the BlindLOCATION OfficeMaxOahu USC InternationalACQUISITION DATEMarch 4, 2009ACQUISITION PRICE$28.3 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 1988-1989Gross Revenue 2,532 2,849 2,742 OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2Cash NOI 1,860 2,154 2,078 98%Capital Improvements 73 33 82 GLA (IN SQ . FT.)158,400Average Occupancy (%) 98 98 9747
 
 
Real Estate Leasing - HawaiiGATEWAY AT MILILANI MAUKA SOUTH($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 511 n/a n/aCash NOI 377 n/a n/aCapital Improvements - n/a n/aAverage Occupancy (%) 100 n/a n/aTYPEOfficeLOCATIONOahuACQUISITION DATEJune 7, 2012ACQUISITION PRICE $11.4 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED1992, 2006, 20082 0 1 0 2 0 0 9OCCUPANCYAT674 6691 2 / 3 1 / 1 2100% 372 379G L A ( I N - S Q . F T .) -18,700  current20,000 100projected 100TOP TENANTSAllstateHawaii State Federal UnionKumonMililani VeterinaryTitle GuarantyWayland Baptist University1 Acquisition price includes a 1.6-acre development parcel. See development project information on page 27.JUDD BUILDINGTYPEOfficeLOCATIONOahuACQUISITION DATEJune 26, 2000ACQUISITION PRICE$3.1 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 1898, renovated 1979Gross Revenue 540 691 674 OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2Cash NOI 221 372 372 100%Capital Improvements 6 - - GLA (IN SQ . FT.)20,300Average Occupancy (%) 100 100 100TOP TENANTSCoffman EngineersDavis, Levin, Livingston,Grande AttorneysRIM Architects48
 
 
Real Estate Leasing - HawaiiKAHULUI OFFICE BUILDINGTYPEOfficeLOCATIONMauiDEVELOPMENT DATE1974, renovated 1996OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 283%($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 GLA (IN SQ . FT.)58,300Gross Revenue 2,408 2,163 2,006Cash NOI 1,357 1,115 1,100Capital Improvements 27 502 9Average Occupancy (%) 87 92 85TOP TENANTSBistro CasanovaCentral Pacific BankHawaii Medical ServiceAssociationMancini, Welch & GeigerLaw FirmMorgan Stanley Smith BarneyStifel Nicolas($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 1,071 1,007 1,148Cash NOI 707 648 818Capital Improvements 32 79 11Average Occupancy (%) 84 85 91KAHULUI OFFICE CENTERTYPEOfficeLOCATIONMauiDEVELOPMENT DATE1991OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 285%GLA (IN SQ . FT.)32,900TOP TENANTSFinance FactorsHawaiiana ManagementTutti Frutti Yogurt49
 
 
TYPEOfficeLOCATIONMauiACQUISITION DATEJanuary 9, 1991ACQUISITION PRICE$1.4 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 1973Real Estate Leasing - HawaiiLONO CENTERTOP TENANTSDr. James Hattaway D.C.Hawaii Dental GroupU.S. Coast GuardGross Revenue 506 438 477 OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2Cash NOI 207 164 196 83%Capital Improvements - 7 (8) GLA (IN SQ . FT.)13,400Average Occupancy (%) 84 84 83MAUI CLINIC BUILDINGTYPE TOP TENANTSOffice Maui Clinic PharmacyMaui Diagnostic ImagingLOCATION Physical Therapy and WellnessMaui CenterACQUISITION DATEDecember 1, 2008 (alreadyowned, but ground leased totenant, A&B took over at leaseexpiration on 12/1/08)DATE CONSTRUCTED($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 1958, renovated 2010Gross Revenue 663 690 721 OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2Cash NOI 351 370 397 91%Capital Improvements 17 36 450 GLA (IN SQ . FT.)16,700Average Occupancy (%) 93 98 9250
 
 
Real Estate Leasing - HawaiiSTANGENWALD BUILDINGTYPE TOP TENANTSOffice Burke McPheeters and EstesLaw FirmLOCATION Leather SoleOahu Mason ArchitectsACQUISITION DATEDecember 10, 1996ACQUISITION PRICE$2.8 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 1901, renovated 1980Gross Revenue 645 762 761 OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2Cash NOI 217 351 384 74%Capital Improvements 251 - 10 GLA (IN SQ . FT.)27,100Average Occupancy (%) 81 94 99GATEWAYATMILILANIMAUKA($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 * 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 422 nm n/aCash NOI 273 nm n/aCapital Improvements 5 nm n/aAverage Occupancy (%) 100 nm n/a* Acquired at year endTYPERetailLOCATIONOahuACQUISITION DATEDecember 29, 2011ACQUISITION PRICE $8.2 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED2008, renovated 2011OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2100%GLA (IN SQ . FT.)5,900  current29,000  projected11 Acquisition price includes a4.3-acre development parcel. See development project information on page 20.51
 
 
Real Estate Leasing - HawaiiKAHULUI SHOPPING CENTERTYPERetailLOCATIONMauiDEVELOPMENT DATE1951OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 294%($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 GLA (IN SQ . FT.)46,400Gross Revenue 773 679 433 TOP TENANTSCash NOI 330 231 29 Ah Fooks MarketAsian CuisineCapital Improvements - 10 385 Ichiban RestaurantAverage Occupancy (%) 83 80 91KANEOHE BAYTYPERetailLOCATIONOahuACQUISITION DATEJune 8, 2001ACQUISITION PRICE$13.3 million (leasehold)DATE CONSTRUCTED1971, renovated 2008($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 2 0 1 0 2 0 0 9OCCUPANCYATGross Revenue 4,427 4,465 4,269 4,269 3,8791 2 / 3 1 / 1 2Cash NOI 1,791 1,853 1,472 98% 1,472 1,942GLA (IN SQ . FT.)Capital Improvements 126 88 12 123,900 12 44Average Occupancy (%) 98 97 99 99 100SHOPPING CENTERTOP TENANTSCentral Pacific BankFirst Hawaiian BankKinkosLongs Drug Store/CVSSafewaySubwayVitamin Shoppe52
 
 
($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 2,931 2,849 2,791Cash NOI 1,915 1,842 1,821Capital Improvements 336 36 -Average Occupancy (%) 95 90 90Real Estate Leasing - HawaiiKUNIA SHOPPING CENTERTYPE TOP TENANTSRetail Bank of HawaiiCole AcademyLOCATION DennysOahu Jack In The BoxJamba JuiceDEVELOPMENT DATE Starbucks20041OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 294%GLA (IN SQ . FT.)60,4001A&B was the original developer of the shopping center.LAHAINA SQUARETYPE TOP TENANTSRetail Ace HardwareLOCATION Maui TacosMauiACQUISITION DATENovember 5, 2010ACQUISITION PRICE$4.9 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 * 1973Gross Revenue 833 900 147 OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2Cash NOI 445 446 86 67%Capital Improvements 30 159 - GLA (IN SQ . FT.)50,200Average Occupancy (%) 63 67 70* Partial year53
 
 
($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 *Gross Revenue 3,090 3,427 2,178Cash NOI 1,921 2,224 1,380Capital Improvements 218 26 78Average Occupancy (%) 94 99 98* Partial year($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 4,973 4,538 4,270Cash NOI 3,174 2,736 2,388Capital Improvements 442 660 1,402Average Occupancy (%) 94 94 92Real Estate Leasing - HawaiiLANIHAU MARKETPLACETYPE TOP TENANTSRetail American Savings BankBaskin RobbinsLOCATION Kentucky Fried ChickenHawaii Longs Drug Store/CVSSack N SaveACQUISITION DATE SupercutsApril 9, 2010 Verizon WirelessACQUISITION PRICE$22.5 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED19872 0 1 0 * 2 0 1 0 * 2 0 1 0 * 2 0 0 9OCCUPANCYAT2,178 147 147 n/a1 2 / 3 1 / 1 289% 1,380 86 86 n/aGLA (IN SQ . FT.)78 - - n/a88,30098 70 70 n/aMAUIMALLTYPERetailLOCATIONMauiDEVELOPMENT DATE1971, renovated 2010OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 293%GLA (IN SQ . FT.)185,700TOP TENANTSCheckers AutomotiveIHOPLongs Drug Store/CVSWallace TheatresWhole Foods54
 
 
Real Estate Leasing - HawaiiPORTALLENMARINA CENTERTYPERetailLOCATIONKauaiDEVELOPMENT DATE2002OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 277%GLA (IN SQ . FT.)($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 023,600Gross Revenue 630 623 590 4,538 4,270TOP TENANTSBlue Dolphin ChartersCash NOI 421 421 383 2,736 2,388Captain AndysHolo Holo ChartersCapital Improvements 22 13 - 660 1,402Kauai Chocolate CompanyAverage Occupancy (%) 77 77 78 Port Allen94Bar & Grill 92WAIPIO2 0 1 0 2 0 0 94,270 3,7942,388 2,0751,402 52492 91SHOPPING CENTER($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 4,256 4,174 3,874Cash NOI 2,989 2,863 2,603TYPERetailLOCATIONOahuACQUISITION DATESeptember 4, 2009ACQUISITION PRICE $30.9 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED1986-2004OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 298%TOP TENANTSAloha GasBig City DinerFoodlandJack-In-The-BoxOutback SteakhouseCapital Improvements 39 67 88 GLA (IN SQ . FT.)113,800Average Occupancy (%) 98 98 9855
 
 
THIS PAGE WAS INTENTIONALLY LEFT BLANK.56
 
 
Mainland Commercial Property Information SheetsIndustrialActivity Distribution Center 58Centennial Plaza 58Heritage Business Park 59Midstate 99 Distribution Center 59Northpoint Industrial 60Republic Distribution Center 60Savannah Logistics Park 61Sparks Business Center 61OfficeConcorde Commerce Center 62Deer Valley Financial Center 62Gateway Oaks 63Issaquah Office Center 63Ninigret Office Park 641800 and 1820 Preston Park 642868 Prospect Park 65San Pedro Plaza 65Union Bank 66RetailBroadlands Marketplace 66Little Cottonwood Center 67Meadows on the Parkway 67Rancho Temecula Town Center 68Royal MacArthur Center 68Wilshire Shopping Center 6957
 
 
($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 2,872 2,573 2,183Cash NOI 2,378 1,963 1,608Real Estate Leasing - MainlandACTIVITY DISTRIBUTION CENTERTYPE TOP TENANTSIndustrial Beam One LLCCold Pack SystemsLOCATION Regal-Piedmont PlasticsSan Diego, CaliforniaACQUISITION DATEFebruary 24, 2009ACQUISITION PRICE$26.2 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED1991 2 0 1 0 2 0 0 9 *OCCUPANCYAT2,183 2,3631 2 / 3 1 / 1 2100% 1,608 1,825GLA (IN SQ . FT.)Capital Improvements 61 275 544 252,300 544 28Average Occupancy (%) 100 92 85 85 92TYPEIndustrialLOCATIONSalt Lake City, UtahCENTENNIAL PLAZATOP TENANTSJMH InternationalSulzer PumpACQUISITION DATESeptember 4, 2003ACQUISITION PRICE$7.9 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 1979Gross Revenue 1,145 1,219 1,206 OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2Cash NOI 838 909 900 100%Capital Improvements 536 157 6 GLA (IN SQ . FT.)244,000Average Occupancy (%) 95 89 9558
 
 
Real Estate Leasing - MainlandHERITAGE BUSINESS PARK($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 7,331 6,978 6,723Cash NOI 5,288 4,733 4,444TYPEIndustrialLOCATIONDallas, TexasACQUISITION DATENovember 1, 2007ACQUISITION PRICE $102.0 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED1997-20022 0 1 0 2 0 0 9OCCUPANCYAT6,723 7,7651 2 / 3 1 / 1 299% 4,444 5,102TOP TENANTSDallas AirmotiveDal-TileHawker BeechcraftHenry ScheinMitsubishi ElectricSpecialized ProductsRackspaceCapital Improvements 1,009 891 1,379Average Occupancy (%) 100 98 89GLA (IN SQ . FT.)1,379 161,316,40089 86MIDSTATE 99 DISTRIBUTION CENTER($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 3,283 3,349 3,818Cash NOI 2,443 2,530 3,031TYPEIndustrialLOCATIONVisalia, CaliforniaACQUISITION DATEBuildings 2/4:November 14, 2008Buildings 1/3:December 11, 2008ACQUISITION PRICEBuildings 2/4: $19.7 million Buildings 1/3: $15.5 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED2002-2008GLA (IN SQ . FT.)789,100TOP TENANTSCoast DistributionInternational PaperOnTracSarnovaCapital Improvements 17 63 413 OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2Average Occupancy (%) 87 92 96 91%59
 
 
Real Estate Leasing - MainlandNORTHPOINT INDUSTRIAL($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0TYPEIndustrialLOCATIONFullerton, CaliforniaACQUISITION DATEAugust 26, 2009ACQUISITION PRICE $11.2 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED1991 2 0 1 0 2 0 0 9 *TOP TENANTSIron Mountain RecordsManagement, Inc.Meadowbrook Meat CompanyGross Revenue 847 1,049 1,204Cash NOI 646 823 999Capital Improvements - 175 -Average Occupancy (%) 100 100 100OCCUPANCYAT1,204 3941 2 / 3 1 / 1 2100% 999 342G L A ( I N - S Q . F T .) -119,500 100 100Note: Northpoint Industrial was sold in January 2013REPUBLIC DISTRIBUTION CENTERTYPEIndustrialLOCATIONPasadena, TexasACQUISITION DATESeptember 23, 2008ACQUISITION PRICE$17.5 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 2007Gross Revenue 1,284 316 777 OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2Cash NOI 926 (123) 281 100%Capital Improvements - 20 1,607 GLA (IN SQ . FT.)312,500Average Occupancy (%) 100 100 60TOP TENANTSNestle Waters North America60
 
 
Real Estate Leasing - MainlandSAVANNAH LOGISTICS PARK($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 3,743 4,491 3,956Cash NOI 2,697 3,483 2,977Capital Improvements - 5 131Average Occupancy (%) 100 100 80TYPEIndustrialLOCATIONSavannah, GeorgiaACQUISITION DATEBuilding A: February 7, 2008 Building B: March 3, 2008ACQUISITION PRICEBuilding A: $32.9 million Building B: $15.1 million2 0 1 0 2 0 0 9DATE CONSTRUCTED2008 3,956 3,427OCCUPANCYAT2,977 2,4621 2 / 3 1 / 1 2100% 131 2,00880 76GLA (IN SQ . FT.)1,035,700TOP TENANTSMatson Logistics WarehousingSPARKS BUSINESS CENTERTYPE TOP TENANTSIndustrial BSI Inspectorate America Corp.St. Marys Health GroupLOCATION State of NevadaSparks, Nevada($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 2,319 1,982 1,903Cash NOI 1,807 1,482 1,347ACQUISITION DATEDecember 23, 2002ACQUISITION PRICE $20.1 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED1996-1998OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 292%Capital Improvements 318 309 466 GLA (IN SQ . FT.)396,100Average Occupancy (%) 94 80 4861
 
 
($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 2,013 2,730 2,741Cash NOI 951 1,360 1,368Capital Improvements 2,194 301 -Average Occupancy (%) 86 82 79Real Estate Leasing - MainlandCONCORDE COMMERCE CENTERTYPE TOP TENANTSOffice Fiserv SolutionsJan-ProLOCATION United Healthcare GroupPhoenix, AZACQUISITION DATEDecember 22, 2006ACQUISITION PRICE$24.7 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED1998 2 0 1 0 2 0 0 9OCCUPANCYAT2,741 2,6881 2 / 3 1 / 1 2100% 1,368 1,364G L A ( I N - S Q . F T .) 119137,50079 78DEER VALLEY FINANCIAL CENTER($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 1,505 1,364 477Cash NOI 469 328 (662)Capital Improvements 585 228 1,465Average Occupancy (%) 71 68 73TYPEOfficeLOCATIONPhoenix, AZACQUISITION DATEJune 7, 2005ACQUISITION PRICE $22.3 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED2001OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 275%GLA (IN SQ . FT.)126,600TOP TENANTSBlackboard CampusViridian Health Management62
 
 
($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 610 1,273 1,304Cash NOI 162 677 753Capital Improvements 504 9 -Average Occupancy (%) 50 86 88TYPEOfficeLOCATIONSacramento, CaliforniaACQUISITION DATEJune 14, 2006ACQUISITION PRICE $12.3 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED1999 2 0 1 0 2 0 0 9 *OCCUPANCYAT541 121 2 / 3 1 / 1 257% 484 12G L A ( I N - S Q . F T .) -58,700 100 100Real Estate Leasing - MainlandGATEWAY OAKSTOP TENANTSFortune Schools IKONURSISSAQUAH OFFICE CENTER($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 * 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 2,338 630 n/aCash NOI 2,099 626 n/aCapital Improvements - - n/aAverage Occupancy (%) 100 100 n/a* Partial yearTYPEOfficeLOCATIONIssaquah, WashingtonACQUISITION DATESeptember 13, 2011ACQUISITION PRICE $19.9 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED1994OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2100%GLA (IN SQ . FT.)146,900TOP TENANTSSiemens63
 
 
Real Estate Leasing - MainlandNINIGRET OFFICE PARK($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 3,117 2,983 2,441Cash NOI 1,895 1,893 1,307Capital Improvements 68 671 -Average Occupancy (%) 100 99 97TYPEOfficeLOCATIONSalt Lake City, UtahACQUISITION DATEJanuary 26, 2006ACQUISITION PRICE $21.4 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED1999 & 2002, renovated 20102 0 1 0 2 0 0 9OCCUPANCYATn/a n/a1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2100% n/a n/aGLA (IN SQ . FT.)185,500 n/a n/an/a n/aTOP TENANTSFedExSilicon Valley BankSun ProductsTeleperformance USA1800 AND 1820 PRESTON PARK($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 3,423 3,107 2,678Cash NOI 1,821 1,401 1,021TYPEOfficeLOCATIONPlano, TexasACQUISITION DATEJune 30, 2006ACQUISITION PRICE $24.3 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED1997-1998, renovated 2010OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 189%TOP TENANTSAmerican Flood ResearchArrow ElectronicsBatrus Hollweg InternationalCMAPepsi Cola CompanyCapital Improvements 665 499 373 GLA (IN SQ . FT.)198,700Average Occupancy (%) 89 83 8264
 
 
Real Estate Leasing - Mainland2868 PROSPECT PARK($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 1,813 2,258 3,276Cash NOI 587 1,064 1,868TYPEOfficeLOCATIONSacramento, CaliforniaACQUISITION DATEAugust 25, 1998ACQUISITION PRICE $20.6 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED1998, renovated 20082 0 1 0 2 0 0 9OCCUPANCYAT2,678 3,2851 2 / 3 1 / 1 286% 1,021 1,725TOP TENANTSCiscoGEIGLA (IN SQ . FT.)Capital Improvements 870 1,070 82 162,900 373 482Average Occupancy (%) 68 77 100 82 82TYPEOfficeSAN PEDRO PLAZAGLA (IN SQ . FT.)163,900 (office)8,100 (retail)($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 2,374 2,270 1,927LOCATIONSan Antonio, TexasACQUISITION DATEJune 4, 1998 (office) September 14, 2000 (retail)ACQUISITION PRICE $15.3 million (office)$1.1 million (retail)DATE CONSTRUCTED1985TOP TENANTSCricket CommunicationsReata Real EstateRicoh AmericaSouthwest Home Health CareStarbucksUnion Pacific Railroad Co.Cash NOI 1,041 875 507 OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2Capital Improvements 1,840 419 780 86%Average Occupancy (%) 83 77 6765
 
 
Real Estate Leasing - MainlandUNION BANK($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 * 2 0 1 0TYPEOfficeLOCATIONEverett, WashingtonACQUISITION DATEJune 7, 2011ACQUISITION PRICE $10.9 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED1993 & 20082 0 1 1 2 0 1 0TOP TENANTSUnion Bank2 0 1 0 2 0 0 9Gross Revenue 1,497 749 n/aCash NOI 1,305 727 n/aCapital Improvements - - n/aAverage Occupancy (%) 100 100 n/a* Partial yearOCCUPANCYAT2,270 1,927 1,927 2,8241 2 / 3 1 / 1 2100% 875 507 507 1,347GLA (IN SQ . FT.)84,000 419 780 780 38977 67 67 70BROADLANDS MARKETPLACE($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 1,503 1,485 1,466Cash NOI 856 714 732Capital Improvements 40 80 2Average Occupancy (%) 91 90 90TYPERetailLOCATIONBroomfield, ColoradoACQUISITION DATEOctober 15, 2003ACQUISITION PRICE $10.8 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED2002OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 291%GLA (IN SQ . FT.)103,900TOP TENANTSH&R BlockMuttz Pet FoodsSafewaySubway66
 
 
Real Estate Leasing - MainlandLITTLE COTTONWOOD CENTERTYPE TOP TENANTSRetail Black Bear RestaurantChase BankLOCATION Fresh MarketSandy, Utah McDonaldsACQUISITION DATE StarbucksOctober 26, 2010ACQUISITION PRICE$20.8 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED1998-2008($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 * 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 2 0 1 0 2 0 0 9OCCUPANCYATGross Revenue 2,112 2,106 353 1,485 1,466 1,466 1,3261 2 / 3 1 / 1 2Cash NOI 1,436 1,405 239 94% 714 732 732 1,039GLA (IN SQ . FT.)Capital Improvements - 79 - 141,600 80 2 2 143Average Occupancy (%) 94 95 96 90 90 90 88* Partial year($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 *Gross Revenue 3,687 4,159 3,456Cash NOI 2,209 2,661 2,169MEADOWS ON THE PARKWAYTYPE TOP TENANTSRetail Michaels StoresREMAX Real EstateLOCATION Rite-Aid DrugsBoulder, Colorado SafewayACQUISITION DATE SubwayJanuary 21, 2010ACQUISITION PRICE$30.8 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED1989OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 278%Capital Improvements 581 221 60 GLA (IN SQ . FT.)216,500Average Occupancy (%) 78 79 83* Partial year67
 
 
Real Estate Leasing - MainlandRANCHO TEMECULA TOWNTYPERetailLOCATIONTemecula, CaliforniaACQUISITION DATENovember 24, 2010ACQUISITION PRICE$48.9 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 * 2007Gross Revenue 4,660 3,882 387 OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2Cash NOI 3,512 2,721 298 96%Capital Improvements 196 15 - GLA (IN SQ . FT.)165,600Average Occupancy (%) 93 95 97* Partial yearTOP TENANTSBev-MoBrueggers BagelFirst BankHenrys Farmers MarketLA FitnessRite-Aid DrugsStarbucksROYALMACARTHUR CENTER($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0Gross Revenue 1,229 1,212 1,298Cash NOI 706 675 750TYPERetailLOCATIONDallas, TexasACQUISITION DATEMarch 1, 2007ACQUISITION PRICE $13.5 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED2006OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 285%TOP TENANTSAndalous Mediterranean GrillCitibankFive Guys BurgersJamba JuiceLa MadeleinePie FiveCapital Improvements 195 184 430 GLA (IN SQ . FT.)44,200Average Occupancy (%) 85 81 9168
 
 
Real Estate Leasing - MainlandWILSHIRE SHOPPING CENTERTYPE TOP TENANTSRetail Dollar TreeKentucky Fried ChickenLOCATION McDonaldsGreeley, Colorado Sherwin-WilliamsACQUISITION DATEMarch 19, 1997ACQUISITION PRICE$2.5 millionDATE CONSTRUCTED($INTHOUSANDS) 2 0 1 2 2 0 1 1 2 0 1 0 1970Gross Revenue 340 367 386 OCCUPANCYAT1 2 / 3 1 / 1 2Cash NOI 190 223 257 57%Capital Improvements - - - GLA (IN SQ . FT.)46,500Average Occupancy (%) 57 66 7769
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALEX/ALEX-8K-20130412205903.txt.gz
TIME:20130412205903
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2.):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
As previously disclosed, on June 8, 2012, the Board of Directors of Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. (the Company) declared a dividend of one preferred stock purchase right (a Right) for each share of Company common stock.  The Rights, which are subject to the terms of a Rights Agreement, dated June 8, 2012, were issued in the context of the Company's separation from Matson, Inc. and were intended to be a short-term measure. The Rights are scheduled to expire on June 8, 2013. The Company does not intend to renew the Rights Agreement or extend the term of the Rights, and will allow the Rights to expire on June 8, 2013 in accordance with the terms of the Rights Agreement.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
ALEXANDER & BALDWIN, INC.
______________
/s/
Paul K. Ito
Paul K. Ito
Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer,
Treasurer and Controller
Dated:           April 15, 2013
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALEX/ALEX-8K-20130502213449.txt.gz
TIME:20130502213449
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2.):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.07.  Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
On April 30, 2013, the Company held its Annual Meeting of Shareholders at which: (i) three Class I directors to the Companys Board of Directors were elected, (ii) the Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. 2012 Incentive Compensation Plan was approved, (iii) executive compensation was approved in an advisory vote, (iv) an advisory vote was taken on the frequency of future advisory stockholder votes on executive compensation, and (v) the appointment of Deloitte & Touche LLP as the Companys independent registered public accounting firm was ratified.  The number of votes for, against, or withheld, as well as the number of abstentions and broker non-votes, as to each matter voted upon at the Annual Meeting of Shareholders, were as follows:
 
 
The Companys Board of Directors has considered the voting results with respect to the frequency of advisory votes on executive compensation, and determined that the Company will hold an annual advisory vote on the compensation of named executive officers until the next required vote on the frequency of advisory votes on the compensation of executives.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
ALEXANDER & BALDWIN, INC.
______________
/s/
Paul K. Ito
Paul K. Ito
Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer,
Treasurer and Controller
Dated:           April 30, 2013


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALEX/ALEX-8K-20130509161800.txt.gz
TIME:20130509161800
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2.):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01.  Regulation FD Disclosure.
On May 9, 2013, Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. made its Real Estate Supplement Update for its Real Estate operating segments, which provides certain supplemental operating and financial information for the quarters ended March 31, 2013 and 2012, available on its website. A copy of this Real Estate Supplement Update is being furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report.
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)           Exhibits
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date:  May 9, 2013
ALEXANDER & BALDWIN, INC.
                                                    
/s/ Paul K. Ito
Paul K. Ito
Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer,
Treasurer and Controller

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALEX/ALEX-8K-20130530204612.txt.gz
TIME:20130530204612
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2.):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.03  Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
On May 24, 2013, A & B Properties, Inc. (A&B Properties), a wholly-owned subsidiary of Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. (A&B), issued a notice to proceed (Notice to Proceed) with the purchase of a 415,000 square-foot, fee simple retail center in Pearl City, Oahu (the Property) for $82.2 million in cash and the assumption of a $59.3 million loan (the Loan), pursuant to the terms of the Real Estate Purchase and Sale Agreement, dated April 9, 2013, between PHSC Holdings, LLC and A&B Properties. The Loan, which is currently held by The Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Company (the Lender), is secured by a Mortgage and Security Agreement, bears interest at 5.9 percent, and requires monthly payments of principal and interest totaling $371,792. A final balloon payment of $56.4 million is due on September 15, 2016. The closing of the transaction, including assumption of the Loan by A&B Properties and/or other entities related to A&B that may acquire title to the Property, is subject to various conditions, including the Lenders approval of such assumption.
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date:  May 31, 2013
ALEXANDER & BALDWIN, INC.
                                                    
/s/ Paul K. Ito
Paul K. Ito
Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer,
Treasurer and Controller
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALEX/ALEX-8K-20130607160734.txt.gz
TIME:20130607160734
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
x
         
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
           
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
           
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01              Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
Agreement and Plan of Merger
 
On June 6, 2013, Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. ("A&B"), A&B II, LLC, a Hawaii limited liability company and a wholly owned subsidiary of A&B ("Merger Sub"), Grace Pacific Corporation, a Hawaii corporation ("Grace"), GPC Holdings, Inc., a Hawaii corporation and a wholly owned subsidiary of Grace ("GPC Holdings"), and David C. Hulihee, in his capacity as the shareholders' representative, entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger (the "Merger Agreement"), providing for the merger of GPC Holdings with and into Merger Sub, with Merger Sub surviving as a wholly-owned subsidiary of A&B (the "Merger").  Prior to the Merger, Grace will undertake a restructuring (the "Restructuring") in order to separate its natural materials and construction businesses ("Grace Businesses") from its petroleum and retail gasoline businesses, so that A&B will acquire only the Grace Businesses in the Merger.
 
Pursuant to the Merger Agreement and subject to the terms and conditions thereof, at the effective time of the Merger, the shareholders of Grace (the "Grace Shareholders") will, in the aggregate, receive $235 million, subject to adjustment at closing, composed of 85% A&B common stock and 15% cash (subject to adjustment at closing).  The number of A&B shares to be issued at closing will be determined by the 20-day volume weighted average price ("VWAP") of A&B common stock shortly prior to closing, subject to a collar of $31.50 and $37.50.  Accordingly, A&B will issue at closing not more than approximately 6.341 million shares and not less than approximately 5.327 million shares.  Approximately 71% of the shares issued at closing will be subject to a six-month lockup from the effective time of the Merger.
 
The Merger Agreement contains customary representations, warranties and covenants of A&B, Grace and GPC Holdings.
 
An amount of cash equal to 12% of the aggregate merger consideration otherwise deliverable to Grace Shareholders at the effective time of the Merger will be withheld pro rata from Grace Shareholders and retained by A&B to secure any closing adjustment to the aggregate purchase price and certain indemnification obligations of Grace Shareholders pursuant to the Merger Agreement. These funds will be released by A&B in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth in the Merger Agreement.
 
Pursuant to the Merger Agreement, the Grace Shareholders have agreed to indemnify A&B for a number of items, including, among others, losses resulting from breaches of representations, warranties and covenants and certain identified liabilities. These indemnification obligations are in certain cases limited to claims that in the aggregate exceed a specified "deductible" amount and are limited to 10% of the aggregate merger consideration.
 
The Merger Agreement and the other transactions contemplated thereby have been approved by the special committees and the boards of directors of A&B and Grace.  Walter A. Dods, Jr., a director of A&B and Grace and holder of approximately 12% of Grace shares, will receive greater than 1% of the currently issued and outstanding shares of A&B common stock in the Merger.  Accordingly, pursuant to the NYSE rules, A&B will hold a special meeting at which the shareholders of A&B will be asked to approve the issuance of A&B common stock in the Merger ("A&B Shareholder Approval").  GPC Holdings also will hold a special meeting at which the Grace Shareholders will be asked to approve the Merger ("Grace Shareholder Approval").
 
In addition to obtaining the A&B Shareholder Approval and the Grace Shareholder Approval, the consummation of the Merger is subject to various customary closing conditions, including, among others, expiration of the waiting period under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act.
 
The Merger Agreement also contains certain termination rights for both A&B and Grace, including that Grace may terminate the Merger Agreement if the VWAP of A&B common stock is less than $29.00, and A&B may terminate the Merger Agreement if the VWAP of A&B common stock is greater than $40.00.  The Merger Agreement further provides that, upon termination of the Merger Agreement under specified circumstances, a party would be required to pay the other party's expenses in an amount up to $3 million.  In certain circumstances, Grace would be obligated to pay A&B a termination fee of $7 million plus A&B's expenses up to $3 million.
 
Voting Agreement
 
Concurrently with the execution of the Merger Agreement, and in consideration thereof, RCCI Management, LLC, Waikoloa Heights Investment Partners, David C. Hulihee, Walter A. Dods, Jr. and Bill D. Mills, principal shareholders of Grace ("Principal Shareholders") and, in the case of Messrs. Hulihee, Dods, and Mills, directors of Grace, holding approximately 71% of Grace shares, have entered into a voting agreement with A&B and Merger Sub. Pursuant to the terms of the voting agreement, the Principal Shareholders have agreed to vote their shares of common stock of Grace and GPC Holdings, as applicable, in favor of the holding company reorganization as part of the Restructuring, in favor of the Merger, and against any proposal that would interfere with the Restructuring or the Merger or any of the other transactions contemplated by the Merger Agreement.
 
Subject to certain exceptions described in the voting agreement, the Principal Shareholders have also agreed, among other things, not to offer for sale, sell, transfer, tender, pledge, encumber, assign or otherwise dispose of their shares of common stock of Grace and GPC Holdings, as applicable, or to enter into any agreement related to any of the foregoing transactions.
 
Lock-Up Agreement
 
Concurrently with the execution of the Merger Agreement, and in consideration thereof, each of the Principal Shareholders also has entered into a lock-up agreement with A&B and Merger Sub pursuant to which each of the Principal Shareholders has agreed, subject to certain exceptions, not to offer, sell, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise transfer or dispose of, directly or indirectly, any shares of A&B common stock issued to such Principal Shareholder pursuant to the Merger Agreement for a period of six months following the effective time of the Merger.
 
Item 8.01              Other Events.
 
On June 6, 2013, A&B issued a press release announcing execution of the Merger Agreement.  A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated by reference into this Item 8.01.
 
On June 7, 2013, A&B held a conference call to provide information regarding the proposed transaction to analysts and investors.  On the call, A&B discussed certain financial and other information relating to the Merger and the Merger Agreement. Slides made available in connection with the conference call are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated by reference into this Item 8.01.
 
Information contained herein, including Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2, shall not be deemed filed for purposes of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, nor shall such information and Exhibits be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Statements in this press release that are not historical facts are "forward-looking statements," within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, that involve a number of risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated by the relevant forward-looking statement.  These forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance.  This release should be read in conjunction with A&B's 2012 Annual Report on Form 10-K and other filings with the SEC through the date of the press release, which identify important factors that could affect the forward-looking statements in this release.  We do not undertake any obligation to update our forward-looking statements.
 
Participants in Solicitation
 
A&B and its directors and officers may be deemed to be participants in the solicitation of proxies from A&B's shareholders with respect to the special meeting of A&B shareholders that will be held, at which shareholders will be asked to consider the proposed issuance of A&B shares in the transaction.  Information about A&B's directors and executive officers and their ownership of A&B's common stock is set forth in the proxy statement for A&B's Annual Meeting of Shareholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 2, 2013.
 
Shareholders may obtain additional information regarding the interests of A&B and its directors and executive officers in the proposed transaction, which may be different than those of A&B's shareholders generally, by reading the proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant documents regarding the proposed transaction, when filed with the SEC.
 
Where to Find Additional Information
 
This communication does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities or a solicitation of any vote or approval.  A&B will file a registration statement on Form S-4 that includes a proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant documents in connection with the proposed transaction.  INVESTORS ARE URGED TO CAREFULLY READ THE PROXY STATEMENT/PROSPECTUS WHEN IT BECOMES AVAILABLE BECAUSE IT WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROPOSED TRANSACTION, A&B AND GRACE.  Investors may obtain a free copy of the proxy statement/prospectus and other filings containing information about the proposed transaction, A&B and Grace, free of charge, at the website maintained by the SEC at www.sec.gov after such documents have been filed with the SEC.  In addition, after such documents have been filed with the SEC, copies of the proxy statement/prospectus and other filings containing information about the proposed transaction, A&B and Grace can be obtained without charge by sending a request to Alyson J. Nakamura, A&B corporate secretary, c/o A&B Law Department, 822 Bishop Street, Honolulu, Hawaii  96813; or by accessing them on the Company's web site at http://www.alexanderbaldwin.com.
 
Item 9.01              Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
                 
Increases A&B's investment in Hawaii's growing development and construction sector
                 
Complements A&B's real estate and land stewardship activities
                 
Further strengthens A&B's financial profile and flexibility
                 
Modest quarterly dividend expected to be initiated
 
Honolulu (June 6, 2013)  Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. (NYSE:ALEX)
("A&B" or "Company") and Grace Pacific Corporation ("Grace") today announced that they have entered into a definitive merger agreement for A&B to acquire the privately held Grace for a combination of stock and cash valued at $235 million. A&B also will be assuming projected net debt of approximately $42 million at closing. Grace is the State's preeminent infrastructure company, providing aggregate, hot mix asphalt and road construction and paving services. Grace was founded in Hawaii in 1931, and its operations are based exclusively in Hawaii.
 
"A&B has long been involved in building communities in Hawaii. The addition of Grace to the Company will extend our capabilities to encompass infrastructure development and replacement work, for which we see a steady and growing need in Hawaii. Grace's strong, difficult-to-replicate business model, diverse payer base and steady and growing cash flows will increase our local market presence, provide A&B with additional financial capacity to execute on new real estate opportunities in Hawaii, and allow us to initiate a modest quarterly cash dividend," said Stanley M. Kuriyama, A&B's chairman and chief executive officer.
 
"The opportunity to acquire a leading materials and infrastructure firm represents not only an attractive investment in its own right, but an ideal complement to our existing Hawaii-focused real estate business," continued Kuriyama. "There are very few opportunities to acquire a business in Hawaii that is as large and successful as Grace and we look forward to this next important step in the future growth and success of Alexander & Baldwin."
 
"Given our strong financial performance as an independent, employee-owned entity, we were not actively looking to sell Grace," noted David C. Hulihee, chairman and chief executive officer of Grace Pacific Corporation. "However, by joining forces with A&B, we will be better able to leverage our combined
 
market knowledge, expertise, asset base and financial strength to capitalize on growth opportunities presented by the improving performance of Hawaii's economy. An equally important consideration for the Grace shareholders and our employees is that Grace is being acquired by a 142-year old Hawaii-based and managed company that has the highest reputation for integrity and commitment to our community. It is doubtful we would have even considered a sale to another company were it not for the respect and confidence we have in A&B and its leadership team and their ability to embrace Grace's Hawaiian roots and corporate culture."
Grace has approximately 550 employees and 135 shareholders. Seventy-one percent of Grace's shares are held by five shareholders, including A&B Director Walter Dods, who owns about 12% of Grace. Another A&B director, Jeff Watanabe, holds a 1% interest in Grace. The transaction was unanimously approved by special committees and the boards of directors of each company, consisting of directors who did not have interests in Grace.
 
Subsequent to closing, A&B anticipates that it will initiate a quarterly cash dividend of $0.04 per share, subject to board approval.
 
Hawaii's outlook for infrastructure construction is positive resulting from both announced infrastructure replacement projects and anticipated commercial and residential development activities. The Honolulu City & County, for example, recently announced its intent to perform $120 million to $150 million in road repairs to the city's streets in each of the next five years. Grace's revenue increased by over 20% for the six months ended March 31, 2013, compared to the same period last year, reflecting this growth. (Grace has a fiscal year of October 1 to September 30.)
 
As measured by revenue, Grace is one of Hawaii's largest construction firms. Grace's trailing 12-month revenue through March 31, 2013 totaled $212 million. Grace's vertically integrated, wholly-owned and joint venture operations include quarries on Oahu and Molokai, a liquid asphalt import terminal on Oahu, and hot mix and paving operations on all of Hawaii's major islands. Grace provides paving services to a wide variety of customers, including federal, state and county governments, private developers and other construction firms. Grace's operations also include Hawaii's largest road safety and transportation construction services contractor and Hawaii's only precast/prestressed concrete building materials manufacturer. Grace also currently owns and operates Mid Pac Petroleum, a fuel distribution and retailing company, which will be spun off to Grace's existing shareholders prior to the close of the transaction and, thus, will not be acquired by A&B. Jim Yates will continue to serve as Mid Pac Petroleum's president and
 
chief executive officer post spin-off. (All financial and other information for Grace contained in this release excludes Mid Pac Petroleum.)
In addition to leveraging Hawaii's prospects for growth in development and infrastructure construction, A&B is expected to benefit from:
 
                 
Grace's unique assets
, which include fee simple ownership of 800 acres in Hawaii, encompassing 532 acres on Oahu's growing leeward coast. The Oahu landholdings include a 50-acre former processing site located in the heart of Oahu's second city, Kapolei, with mid-term redevelopment potential. Grace's Makakilo, Oahu quarry facility is nearing completion of a multi-year, $30 million capital improvement program, including three new crushing and finishing plants, which is expected to result in greater operational efficiencies going forward. The Oahu quarry reserves are adequate to meet most of Grace's projected needs for at least two decades.
 
                 
Grace's significant, reliable and growing cash flow stream
, which will not only enhance A&B's ability to expand its real estate investment activities in Hawaii, but will enable A&B to initiate a quarterly dividend.
 
                 
Grace's expanded opportunities for growth
that will be further enhanced by leveraging A&B's strong balance sheet and relationships.
 
                 
Grace's expertise in quarry management and operations,
which is expected to help A&B realize greater value, over time, from quarries it already owns on Maui and Kauai.
 
                 
Grace's modest capital needs
over the next several years, due to the completion of the recent capital investments made by Grace in its business.
 
No reduction in Grace's workforce is anticipated as a result of the transaction, and David Hulihee will continue to serve as Grace's chief executive officer.
 
Transaction Terms
 
The purchase price of $235 million is subject to adjustment at closing. Consideration will consist of 85% A&B common stock and 15% cash, subject to adjustment at closing. A&B also will assume approximately $42 million of debt, net of cash on hand, at closing. The number of A&B shares to be issued at closing will be determined by the 20-day volume weighted average price of A&B shares shortly prior to
 
closing, subject to a $31.50 to $37.50 collar. Accordingly, A&B will issue at closing not more than approximately 6.34 million shares and not less than approximately 5.33 million shares. Approximately 71% of the shares issued at closing will be subject to a six-month lockup from the closing date. The transaction is expected to be accretive to A&B's per share earnings for the first full year following closing.
The transaction is subject to the filing and effectiveness of a registration statement on Form S-4 with the Securities and Exchange Commission, the satisfaction of customary closing conditions and approval of both parties' shareholders. Grace shareholders owning approximately 71% of Grace shares have agreed to vote in favor of the transaction. The transaction is expected to be completed in the fourth quarter of 2013.
 
Webcast
 
The Company will host a webcast on Friday, June 7, 2013, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time, to discuss the transaction. The webcast presentation will be followed by questions from investors invited to participate in the interactive portion of the discussion. Parties listening via the webcast will be in a "listen-only" mode. Access to the webcast will be via a link called "Grace Pacific Corporation Transaction" on the home page and the investor relations page of A&B's corporate website at www.alexanderbaldwin.com. Presentation slides will be available for download from A&B's website at 7:30 a.m. EDT.
 
About Alexander & Baldwin, Inc.
 
Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. is a premier Hawaii land company, with interests in real estate development, commercial real estate and agriculture. With ownership of over 87,000 acres in Hawaii, A&B is the state's fourth largest private landowner, and is one of the state's most active real estate investors. A&B has a diverse portfolio of real estate development projects throughout Hawaii, and a commercial property portfolio comprising eight million square feet of leasable space in Hawaii and on the U.S. mainland. It is also the owner and operator of the Hawaiian Commercial & Sugar plantation on Maui, and a significant provider of renewable energy on the islands of Maui and Kauai. Additional information about A&B may be found at www.alexanderbaldwin.com.
 
About Grace Pacific Corporation
 
One of Hawaii's largest locally owned construction companies and its largest asphalt paving contractor, Kapolei-based Grace Pacific Corporation has roughly 550 employees and an 88-year history of serving Hawaii. Throughout the years, Grace Pacific has constructed and maintained the roads and highways that have become an integral part of Hawaii's transportation infrastructure. Grace Pacific also offers a wide range of construction-related materials and services including prestressed and precast concrete products, metal framing systems for construction, custom specialty signage, and traffic and roadway safety products. Additional information about Grace Pacific may be found at www.gracepacificcorp.com.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Statements in this press release that are not historical facts are "forward-looking statements," within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, that involve a number of risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated by the relevant forward-looking statement. These forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance.
 
This release should be read in conjunction with of Alexander & Baldwin, Inc.'s 2012 Annual Report on Form 10-K and other filings with the SEC through the date of this release, which identify important factors that could affect the forward-looking statements in this release. We do not undertake any obligation to update our forward-looking statements.
Participants in Solicitation
 
Alexander & Baldwin and its directors and officers may be deemed to be participants in the solicitation of proxies from the Company's shareholders with respect to the special meeting of A&B shareholders that will be held, at which shareholders will be asked to consider the proposed issuance of A&B shares in the transaction. Information about Alexander & Baldwin's directors and executive officers and their ownership of Alexander & Baldwin's common stock is set forth in the proxy statement for Alexander & Baldwin's Annual Meeting of Shareholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 2, 2013. Shareholders may obtain additional information regarding the interests of Alexander & Baldwin, Inc. and its directors and executive officers in the proposed transaction, which may be different than those of A&B's shareholders generally, by reading the proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant documents regarding the proposed transaction, when filed with the SEC.
 
Where to Find Additional Information
 
This communication does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities or a solicitation of any vote or approval. A&B will file a registration statement on Form S-4 that includes a proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant documents in connection with the proposed transaction. INVESTORS ARE URGED TO CAREFULLY READ THE PROXY STATEMENT/PROSPECTUS WHEN IT BECOMES AVAILABLE BECAUSE IT WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROPOSED TRANSACTION, THE COMPANY AND GRACE. Investors may obtain a free copy of the proxy statement/prospectus and other filings containing information about the proposed transaction, the Company and Grace, free of charge, at the website maintained by the SEC at www.sec.gov after such documents have been filed with the SEC. In addition, after such documents have been filed with the SEC, copies of the proxy statement/prospectus and other filings containing information about the proposed transaction, the Company and Grace can be obtained without charge by sending a request to Alyson J. Nakamura, A&B corporate secretary, c/o A&B Law Department, 822 Bishop Street, Honolulu, Hawaii 96813; or by accessing them on the Company's web site at http://www.alexanderbaldwin.com.
 

Exhibit 99.2
 


</DOCUMENT>
